      "identifier" : [
         "8_06251_251"
      ],
      "text" : [
         "PRICE~ 25 CE.NTS TORONTO",
         "Always Ready Mooney's Sugair Wafers are made with double layers of crisp, spicy biscuit crusts. *Each layer is a delight-between is a rich delicious cream, a com- bination of sweets that can't be duplicated. This luscious cream is made in many flavors-from real fruits. At luncheon or dinner to-day instead of serving the usual dessert try Mooney's Sugar Wafers. Let their delicious taste to-day decide your desserts for the future. In Tin Boxe\u0026 10e and 25c Sizes The Mooney Biscuit and Candy Co., Lirrited, Stratford, Canada",
         "C.\u0026NÂDIÂN MAGAZINE ADVERTI8 I 'Sanatogen Will Do for Your Health. JF you take Sanatogen regunlarly, three timies a day, Sir H. Hseh Bed, yon wilI have gaiined, in a short timne, a fnlnd of health, -.G, strength and nerve force which will be of inestimable 9oenradCmadr ilad in.cbkE of the Leeward value to you-and you will have gailied it easil n IlanBIds, wrl,\"o a Pleasantly, at a very nominal cost. -Why not set aside nan doiug had mntal somue of your spare nickels iii orçier to acquire that greatest wokina eervatizig of ail blessings, Health, lby a short course of Sanatogen c iae herc isaccoe4ing bettrr invigorator than A Genuine and Safe Invigorator. aaoe, VouwlU mid that the good which here are types of thousalnds of Sanatogetl does s lasting and pro- people who have been quick to Sr jkaý Pittr4 y-C.B., gressive-aot a fleeting stimulus, recognise the mnerits of Sanatogenl. CM such as the old-tinle - tonies - gave, Why not follow their example te emiiint anthorlty on but regular daily inaprovemnent, withl why not send for a NItppY ly W tc, Boae 0 1 r Rthnu, no reaction and no wearing off of and at on$ce commence to enrichi youir Pittar derives constant its effeets. htealtht by a course of iSantogen ? bellefit from sntgn \"l- Tt is so sa1ftn not.,e,,,...i ~~toe .-, R e o COmmene-4 4, \".. if",
         "Canaclian Magazine Contents. Tanuarv, 1914No3 Hamilton - Frontispiece Muddiman -- - - 239J - 248 - 251 - 95 4 G 0F THE X SKETCHiES DS. VERS",
         "CANÂDIÂN MAGAZINE ÂDVERTISER a Wh' London Remember that the World's Greatest Hotel offers ail the amenities and luxuries, conveniences and facilities which ônly Europe's largest and most completely equipped ménage can offer. Pictur.5qe SitUatioIN-The Cecil has a broad and noble frontage overlooking the river Thames with entrance giving on to the Strand, London's principal thoroughfare. ConvenienCe-The Ceci is conveniently situated, mid- way between East and West London, within easy reach of the Theatres, Termini and large business establishments of the Metropolis. E-quioMenrt-~The Cecil is the most comprehensively equipped residential establishment in the World-Bed- rooms quiet and restful ; Bathroom contigious to everyone. Radiation in rooms and corridors. Telephone in every room, Orchestra througbout the day in handsome Iofty Louis Quatorze Palm Court. Garage free for ail Visitor's Cars. Triff--Strictly moderate, meals in the beautiful Empille Rest- auatmay be had à la carte at Prix-Fixe.",
         "The \"CANADIAN\"*' For FEBRUARY Will celebrate the completion of its Twenty-First Year as Canada's Leading Lite rary Publication with A REVIEW Dr. A. H. U. Colquhoun, Deputy Minister of Education for Ont.ario. of the progress of Canadian letters as shown iu the steady and consistent advaincement of this par- ticular magazine. LOUISBOURG TO-MORROW By Beekles Wulsàon, author of \" Quebec,\" \"The Romance of Canada,\"~ Etc. -an article dealing wilh the remnarkable history of this romantic fortress, together with an outline of a scheme to restore it as a national historical shrine. Profusely illustrated. THE PRICE 0F BEEF By Norman Lambert. Not a very roniantic topic, and yet Mr. Lambert presents what might well be called a great national drama. Wh is beef so high in price ini Canada? The answer is given in ibis article. THE \"SALADIN\" PIRATES By Archibald MacMechau. This true accourit of a bloody pirating adveniture that ended on the gallows at Halifax la worthy of Stevenson. It is a narative of intense interest. BEHIND A FOUR-IN-HAND By E. Paulinue Juhnson. Perhaps the only unpublished sketch in existence by this gifted Indiali atithor whose pen is now at reat forever. FROM MIRROR LANDING TO SOTO By Mr*. Arthur Murphy. A racy account of this imposing portage, in which a \"od chilled, case-hardened northener- discourses incidentally on the deviltries of the bull-dog fly. BYGONE DAYS IN TORONTO By Mrs, W. Foreyth Grant. Dealing with the genteel games of cricket and croquet and somne of thc dandies and galla1nts of Toronto\u003e fifty years ago. The second sketch of a delightftil serles, A fine seasonable poern by Marjorie Pickthall, whose book of poetry, published last autuinn, \"The Drift of Pinions,\" was a",
         "CÂANÂDIN MÂAGÂZINE ÂDVEBTISER 5 The Secret of Beauty Ma a clear velvey ski and a youthfl niComplexion. If you \"ale your uood looks and deaire a m fet opexion. you must use Beeamds -oa Itpossesses unequalled qualities for imparting a youthful appearance to the skin and complexion of its usera. La-rola ia delicate and fragrant, qite greaseleas, and ia very plean to use. Get a boule to-dy. and thus Meonaure a pleasinit anti attractive Comph-Xion. Obtainable from ail Stores \u0026 CIhemuisa BL DIZTHAM \u0026SON, CHELTENIIAM ENG.",
         "6 CANAI3IAN MAGAZINE ADVERTTSFER Benger's Food is specially pre- pared to build u pthe weakened digestive systemn, and to pro- mote, a Ligh state of bodily nutrition while doing so. It is the only food enabling rest and regulated exercise to be gii'en to the digestive functions. Benger's is net a predigested food nor does it contain dried millc. It is miade with fresh mulk, and fornis a dainty and delicious cream, with a delicate biscuit flavour. Patients never tire of",
         "CÂNADIAN MAGAZINE AJYVEBTISER à a 'd THE H~ALL MARK OF 25 Royal Warrantsà ALL PURE WOOL CLOTHINO FARRICS APE RIENTr. Do.. not disturb the liver or kidnmy, and its effectivenesa do.. not wear off by regular use. IN BMALL. TABLE1s OF PLEASANT FLAVOUR. 0f riats, 30 c. par box (or postage paid fo\u003er 35 c. dir'ect) from h L YMNS Ltd., cnting alarge at prioes fron2 Der yard, mail.. I desigr BooktvlatE FLUXIT",
         "8 CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER The London Clove Compa Mail Orcers Car _ DAL PA7ELLU - ,er,ureyznnaues Black Pique wn, 2 press but- tons. 71 cents ron. 85 cents per pair iS in Black, tons. Lfly' Glo es. nequallsd for QuaitY, ny's Cloves. St\"e ,\"I\",a\"...Val. efully Exocuted. The BLENHEIM Tan Cape BUCKSKIN FINISH Best quality The \" Canadian bite, 1 an, k, Grey or .ck; Spear ats, Prix- tn Sewn, 2 !s Buttons, illustration, c e nts p e r cn,\" Real Kid, 4 buttons. 3 cents pr pair. ,ni\" Pigue Sewn Strong ;loves, ia Tans, Browns -eys and Black, 3 rows its, 2 Large Pearl But cents per pair. LONC CLOVES The \"Oneretta\" Ladies' Real Kid Gloves, in White, Cream or Black. 8-Button Length Mousque- taire. 79 cents per pair. DittoinWhite, washable. 91 centsa Men's ditto, in Tan or Grey, Button. 95 cents per pair. LADIES' SUEDE CLOVES The \"R al\" Ladies' French S Glolves, in Iak, White and all Co Buttons 71 cents, 4 Buttons. 79 cen ,dies' , Wool es, in Lovat",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ýADVERTISER __ VANISHING CREAM A Perfect Tonie for the Skin and Complexion D ELIATEluxurious, ' Dsoothing and refreshing, -' restoring elasticity, while vanishing quickly and com- pletely through its rapid absorption by the pores. It is especially welcome, to those who dislike the feeling of anything heavy or oily. It is absolutely non- m.. ~greasy, and will not cause .m growth of hair. Soothes and refreshes I the most delicate skin. Used by gentlemen alter shaving, it promptly allays the irritation from the razor. Supplied in a convenient, patent, collapsible tube, having the advantage that the user can- not lose the cap. . Can also behad in glassjar pric., çrtube or jar', with screw top. s.Wd bg ai duggisia and slorea V VINOLIA Co., LIMITED SOAF MAKERS TO H.M. THE KING LONDON PARIS TORONTO",
         "10 CÂNADXAN MAGAZINE ADVEBTISER A FORE WORD READERS OF THEi CANÀDIÂN MAGAZINE THIS MONTH: WILL FIND*THE EDGES OP THE IEVES TRIMMED UNWFORMLY, S0 THÂAT TUEY 0ÂA! OPEN IT TO ÀNY PAGE WITHOUT THE TROUBLE OF CUTTING BY HANiD. HuEREOiFOi THE LEÂVES HÂVE NOT PEEN TRIMTLED BECÂUSE THE RIGI!\u003e EDGE HAS 'BEEN CONSIDEED NO? SO PLEASING IN APPEARÂNCE. ]BUT THE RIGfl) EPTEOT RAS BEEN OVERCOME BY TWO TRIMMINGS IN THE BINDERY INSTEÀD OF ON-E. THÂAT IS, THE MAGAZINE IS TI1MMED PIES? M-ITHQUT THE COVER. THEi COVER 1$ CUT SEPÂRATELY, A ITTLE LARGER THÂN T'HE REST WITH THE RRqUlT THÂT WREN THE COVER IS PUT ON THERE IS AN OVELAPING MAR- NUM",
         "CÂNÂDIÂN MAGAZINE ÂDVERTISHR i m4r pou he1, nfig your dontzs't to ie p you.? 0-OPE RATE dentist in k, teeth sound. RIB.BL'N DE erm- with mi ý 4",
         "CÂNÂDIÂN MAGAZINE ADVERTIBER The New Flavfl this new sauce from England is. simply deli- cious and such a welcome change to the old-fashionied kinds of sauces. Stores sel H.P.-4ire The Original an.d ony G enuine",
         "CÂNAPIÂN MAGAZINE ÂDYERTIBER 1 TORONTO CONSERVATORY 0F'MUSIC __A. S. VOGT, Mus. Doc., Musical Director Hatablished in 188. one ofýtbe fornoat and rnost splendidly equibped Schools ot Music an the ANationa Institution devOted ta tue higbest inter-sts of Canadil\"' Musical Art. Pre-eminent In the Intern 'ttonaI dstntii of its teaching personnel, its ltigh artistic aims and the superlr character af its buildng and general the Wonient. vesidethe frYear Bok f ,\"4 an parnph. destive Woe'stsieS CONSERVATORY SCHOOL OF EXPRESSION SPECIAL CALENDAR F. H. KIRKPATRICK. l\u003eh.D., Principal public Readng. Oratery, Physical and Vocal Culture, Dramatic Art anid Literature. RIDLEY COLEE Si. Catharines, Ont",
         "14 CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER STr. Ont.",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE AI)VERTISER 1 Bisho p'FRYSVNH EA WYKEHAMI HALL, COLLEGE STREET, TORONTO. Str c a A Chtwcl' R.sidential and l3ay Séhool For Girl. Fui! Matriculation Course, Elemcutaty Work, Douio*tic At~ Scnoondianfng Schoo Miss Walsh - Principal 1 Miss Nation - VicePincipal \u003cPreparatory Departmeflt, 423 Avenue Road, under the. mnaigement of Bishop Strachan School. Head Mistres: Miss R,. E. Churchard, FIigher Certificate. National FmSbel Union. Re-opOIIS ifter Christmas vacation January 12tL. U'ý WESTBOURNE SCHOOL FOR GIRLS 278 Blocs' Street West, Torontoi, Caniada. A resldentia and day scliool, well appointed, well managcd, and convenieat. Studenits prepared for University Examinations. Specilift in each depart- ment. Affliated with the Toot Cnevtory of Music. F. \u003eIcGillivray Knowiai. R.C.A., Art Dirqector. For annoufli1cmet and informeation add4ess the, Pri- clpalt MISS M. CURLErrE, B.A.",
         "16 CANÂDIÂN MAGAZINE ÂDVERTISER BUSINESS \u0026 EDUCATION Coflege Builing is the best pa8sport te a successful future fo'r all young men and women. Ican be acquired under best con- ditions and at sinall cost in1 time and money at oui' well-known School,e A termn of six or eight menths i8 the average time required $0cmpee a practical definite course of tann and $0 qualify for a business situation For those who cannot attend \u003colDege weprovide Home Study work by means of our excellent",
         "GÂNÂDIÂN MÂGÂZINE - DVIMTI$Blt i v«C C.SF ster,.A MONTREAL TI gulu tary",
         "QÂNADIAN MAGAZUR ADVYTISUIB ARTJSTS, COLLEGES and STUDENTS Using Qil and Water Colors should write for our Catalog EIr- Special Discounts ta out of town Customers. Trade discount to Dealers. We are Agents for- CAMBRIDGE COLORS (Maddoeton \u0026 Co.) MEDICA\u003c PRINTS (Medicl Society) MANSELLS COLORED and PL~AIN PL.ATINUM and CA1R8ON PJI=1RES of Od Muter\u0026 ARTITS'SL PLYCo. 77à YORK STREET Art Association",
         "CÀNADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISEjR Î9 Retain, The Charnu Nature Gave You That alluring, Pearly White complexion wo uch admired by the womnen of fashion can easily be obtained by ?rou. Even if you have, by negject and indiscrebion rurned the b-eauty nature has be- stowed upon you, you can regain your charma by the consistent use of For over 65 years this article has bee\" used by a\u003cCtre3bua, $tieua and wou'en of fashion. It reuders the si like the sotneu of velvet leaving it clear and pearly white and is highy desrable when preparing for dm117 or evening atire. As it is a, lquid andnn- gras pepraio, t emin unoicd.When attending dances, complexion causetu by the skin becominheae.65YAS Ferd. T. Hopkins \u0026 Son, ?Iropep, r a te okof perf1med 37 Great Jones Street - - NEW YORK CITY ,pure ~ NOTICE OFtEOVAL I",
         "OÂNADIÂN MAGAZINEK ADVEIRTISER Four Seasons.11g. D-the Springtime of life-is the period icky irresponsibility. ent i ac- fleeting seasons.- . which the heavy of: For the *É 'f",
         "CANÂDIÂN MAGÂZ1N4 ýADVE]RTISEB 21 58 Years Since the year of its incorporation, 1855, the policy of The Banik of Toronto has been to provide a f'ull service to its many customers. Its affairs have been soundly administered and its prosperity and service have kept pace with Canada's development. moi Banking Service Letters of Credit issued for Importers; Drafts, Money Orders, and ;Foreign Cheques sold. Ç Travellers' Cheques and Letters of Credit issued. Savings Department ati every Branch. Current Accounts opened. General Banking Business transacted. BANK oFTORONTO ASSET$ - - - $60,000,000 nwinQTr - - - 41.000.000",
         "CANÂDIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISEIL THE METROPOLTAN BANK Capital Pald Up Reserve Fund Undivided Profits Head Office: S. J. Moore, President. 3i000,000.00 I,250,000.00 I8 I ,888.26 - Toronto W. D. Rosa, General Manager",
         "Ailipenema petisetion r agains Esthbis tena stan",
         "24 CANM)IAN 'MAGAZINE ADVERTISER The Canadian Bank of Commerce PAID UP CAPITAL $15,000,000 RESERVE FUND $12,500,000 HEAD OFFIC E: TORONTO SIR EDMUND WALKER, C. V O., L.L. D., D. C. L., Preidet. ALEXANDER LAIRD. Genea Manager. JOHN AIRD, Aset. Cener lManager. Travellers' Cheques Issued by the Canadian Bank of Commerce enable the traveller to provide himself with funds without delay at each point of his journey in a convenient yet inexpensive manner. They are issued payable in every country in the world in denominations of] $10. $20. $50. $100. $200. with the exact equivalent in the moneys of the principal countries stated on the face of each cheque. They are economical, absolutely safe, self-identi- fying and easily negotiated. LONDON, ENGLAND OFFICE, 2 LOMBARD STREET, E.C. New York Agency: 16 Exchange Place. Mexico City: Avenida San Francisco, No. 50 THE ROYAL BANK",
         "CÂNADIAN MAGAZINE 'ADVERTISER rfaOMMzoo IM Cber i ht TeKalamlaZoel - LeseLeaf Binder has -\u003ce Nlq note the un,' usual strain Bonds for $ 100 Many people of small' means are possibly flot aware of the opportunity for safe investment offer- ed by our $100 Bonds. The smal! investor has looked upon owning Bonds as rather beyond him-thinking of Bonds as being only in denominations of $ 1,000, or some other equally impossible sum. But $100 will buy one of our Bonds, giving the holder of it prec~Iey the saine security as E claim that the \" Kalarnazoo \" W Loose Leal B*nder is not ooly the simplest, lightest end most convenient b rider on the rnarket, but that -it is also the strongest, inost durable and mont economnical..' Flexible leather thongs are used in place of metal posts, and the sheets are held by clamping bars along the fuit length of the sheet. The wearing parts are not rigid but flexible. thus rellevina the strain end 1 IU[Nu)",
         "20 CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTrISER' You are considering your Wife's Christmas Present We wiII provide it. Give her a Policy which will insure lier an -income for life. She may require it before next Christmas cornes around. the Inquire from any representative of THiE NORTH AMERICAN LIFE ASSURANCE CO, -SOLID AS TUIE CONTINENT\" Head Office ÎBOND OFFERINOS Liais oj bonds whlch «'e offer sent on appication. Ev'ery Securil posa-. uises the qualliles essential ln a sauna invesiment, comblnlng SAFETY Oh PRINCIPAL AND INTERES? w'ith THE MOST FA VORABLE INTEREST RETURN Oovernmont - Municipal Corporation and Proven -Induastria1l Bonds. TORONTO, CAN, LOOK AHEAD TWENTY YEARS 1 Will old your age be comnfortable? Provide for comfort ýand ease in old age by AN £4 EXCELSIOR ENDOWMENT AT ÂGE 50 or 60 secu whal flot mon",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER 27 '/ Tbis is the Mayor of Spotless Towni, S The brightest mani for miles around' J t The shining light of wisdom cah; Reflect fromi such a polished, man, S And so he says to high and 'low: \"The brightest use Some housekeepers use three or four different kitchen cleansers. Economical house- keepers use only Sapollo. Why? Because the many economical uses of Sapolio are simply aston- ishing. *Not a particle of Sap- ohio scatters or wastes. _Use Sapolio if you would onve -il tinware a brilliant polish be had with cleansers). (fot to coarse Sapollo' will quickly scour knives, forks, and ail kitcheri utensils and metal household appliances. It thoroughly cleans ont dirt, grime and grease from forty -and- one lurking places. Sapolio is the brisk hiouse- keeper'5s stand-by for ail- around household cleaning. It is quick to Polishi and scour - slow to, use up. It cannot waste. FREE TOY for the CHILDREN On request, we will mail a Spotless Town Cut-Out for children. 'It cons ists of the Spotless Town background, 8Y4 juches long, and nine Spotless Town characters in, color, which cut out to stand as placed in front of the Town. This makes a very attractive miniature town for the playroom. s onsNew York City s Sons",
         "28 CÂNADIÂN MAGAZINE ÂDVERTTSER LLIES, JAMS and CATSUP of E. D. Smith \u0026 Son, Ltd. Ô are exclusive high grade, th.e ver-y finest of pure food quality. Their kitcliens are situated right in the midst of the fruitf ul Niagara Valley, the ripe fresh fruits are picked ini the 3orning, made intoe ither delicious Jams, Jellies or Catsup the saute night, no long rail hauls, no chance for dust and decay ini transit, no need to pick fruit green to ripen on the way, they are picked just when ripe and ready. These goods are for sale ai ail first-class grocers in Canada-Ask for them. \u0026 SON, Uimited - WINONA, ONT.",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE",
         "THE GOOSE-GIRL From the Painting by Mary Riter Hamilton",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE XLII TORONTO, JANUARY, 1914 No. 3 THEBARTLETT DRAWINGS A roview of \"Canadlan Sconery,\" a Pictureaquc presontation of Canada as It appearcd to an Engiah draughtsman about 1840 BY BERNARD MUD)DIMAN AMONG the early works on Cii.. ada issiled in England, e are more sumiptuons than the volume publishied by the Victoria Art Publishers (Virtue of London) entit- led \"Canadian Scýenery-.\" The date of this publication is given by Phileas Gagnon in his \"Bibliographie Cana- dienine\" as 1842. It was publishcd ini two large quarto volumes. The lit- erary portion of these tomes is the 'work of N. P. Willis, a compiler of art books, who has done his haekwork in a good honest way in accordance with fris light, and of this I will speak in a moment. But by far the moat interesting portion of the work are the numierous engravings taken front drawings by W. H. Bartlett. They are as far as 1 know the most coma- plete picture of the Canada of that tixue in existence, and no collectioxi, of Canadiana would be complete without thcm. it was the time of the ?apixxeau and Mackenzie risings and the Lord Durhiam report-day-, of hot strivings and long-forgotitii ani- 1-239 mnosities, davs of the infancv or re- sponsible Glovernmnent and (hai1adian c'ivilization. On this Acceount thlese engravings, apart froin other inerits, have an historical value that ig al- inost untold. Leaflng themn, wev can see the Canada of the first years a! the reign of Queen Victoria. Rail. ways had not yet woven, spider-like, their cobweb if trtacks over the land front Halifax to Vancouver. The West was almost unknowNv. Toronto and .Montreal were tiny towns. Ot- tawa hardly existed, to say notbing of Winnipeg and Calgary, The (,os- turnes uf the figures in these, e\u003engra:v- ings. with their peg-topped trouseorts their old-fashioned hats and cri no- liues, have ail the quaint piquancy of our grandtather's days. Tt is ail su remote. \"Was it,\" we asic ouirselves9, rubbing oui- eyes,\"psil\" The literary inatter, too, la just as quaint and ridiculously old-fashioned as the engravings. Tt commences with a chapter on what the author terin \" the aborig'inal inhabitaut, \" by 'I",
         "THE CANADIA4N MAGAZiNE THE MIARICET-PLACE. TOItONTO, FROMI A BARTLETT DRAWING OF~ AB3OUT i84O. which h. means the Indian. A con- siderable amount of really informa- tive matter for thoso days la labori- ougly comrpiled into a regular trea- tise on the habits, history, and ways of the red skin. Every now and ten one cornes across a picturesque re- mark. For example, on the question of the exact colour of the skin of the American we read that the author la \"not prepared to express a de- cided opinion ... but it obvious- ly requires a dloser investigation than it lias yet received.\" Curions anecdotes abound in the text, affording the best part of the reading. The Ursuline nuns, having edueated a Huron girl (we are told), presented lier on lier marriage with a complete outfit of clothes in the I\u003earisian style. \"They we mucli surprised, some days after, to see the husband, wlio liad ungenerously seiz- ed on the whole of the bride's at- tire and arrayed himself in it, parad- ing back and forward in front of the convent and betraying every symp- tom of the meut extravagant exulta- tion.\" Again there la the tale of the In- dian chief, in the French reginie, who attended the Governor's feast, and seelng the general use of mustard, took and put a whole spoonful in his moutli, \"out of euriosity. \" \"On feel- ing its violent efforts lie made inered- ible efforts to conceal it, ...but severe sneezings and tears starting to his eyes, raised a general langli. Noti- ing could ever iuduce hlm after tliat to allow the \"boiling yellew,\" as he ternied it, to enter lis lips. There is aise tlie gruesome story of an Indian Montagnier, by naine Mocantagan, or Crooked Xnife, wlio i a drunken fit confessed to having killed and eaten several halfbreeds. Starvation drove hlm to kil and eat tlie first man. But once having taat- ed human fleali a mad craving for it made hlm slay the others secretly. Another of these Indian anecdotes would make an excellent short story. An Indian laboured under a delus- ion that lie would fail ini everything lie undertook until lic killed soxue one, and in his madness nearly killed his brother.",
         "THE BARTLETT DRAWINGIS QUEBEC. FROMI POINT IRI.FROMI A BARTLETT ORWN F A11OUT 184). The next two chapters contain a history of Canada, its discovery and settlement up to the date of publica- tion. On the -whole thcy formn an ex- cellent accounit, and as far as 1 kniow seexu remnarkably accurate for a work at that date. The tone. of course, i the English point of view, and the outlook ie consequeintly coloured by the purpie windows of a prend,' self- glorification which is at times a littie ridîculous. In certain phases of the later colonial days; the writer is tee strongly partisan. Otherwise I should say lie has put together a singularlY creditable piece of work, The book, however, takes on quite a different value when the writer turne to deseribe the condition of the inhabitants of Canada of his own day. Rememnber, it is the condition of Canada between 1830 and 1840. Remember, too, the author is writing for home consuinption in the old country. 'l\"len yen -will be in a posi- tion to see in the proper light these singularly interesting sketches lie gives us and at the same time place thern nt their proper value. After describjing in somne detail the fendai natuire of the habitant tenures, hie painte the following persenal pic- ture ef thein: \"'They iare talII thin, anud, froDm e ýO9ire to the eliniatel, alitiost as dJark as tIfe In- dians. The 'y bav,-( thin lips Rnud often aquilint. noea wth amail dark and live- IV eyeas. ManyrJ of the. girls are Pretty ovai.-faeedl brunettes, with finie eyes, good teetli and glosy 1lock8. The- dress le near]Y aftPr tii. fash ion of the Frecbc Peasantry. The. men wear the capot, a 'ar ge graY coat or surtout, covering near- ly the whole bodyv, aud tiedl wlth a girdiv of brilliant coloutrs. On the legs they have inoccasFLins, aud on thi. hvad ai straw bat iu 8umuer aud a red bonnet ln winý ter. The hair je still tiedl in a long queue behlad. The. women wear short jackets or bed-gowrim (,uantlets), with petteoatsq distinct, and sometines of a differenit col- our, and cape iustead of bonnets.. . They have long waists and soinetimes4 the. bair tied behitnd iu a large club.- . Rair powder je sometimes woru, aud beet- root employed as rouge.\" -\u003cWilljs. how-ever, notes their con- servative habits: \"The habitants are net a stirring, enterprising, or in- proving race. They tread in the steps of their forefatbers, follomwig the,",
         "THE C,\\NA\\DIAN MAGAZINE NIONTREAL. PROMI THE MOUNTAIN. PROMI A BARITLE\u003erT DRAWING OF ABOUT 18ý40. sanie routine, and wvith difficulty adopting the mnost obvious imnprove- ments. of mnodemz husbandry.\" In speaking of their mnarriages, lhe mnentions a peculiar custom called chaivai,\"of annoying ill-mnatched couples, particularly wlien the ages of the parties differ greatly. The, young people of the district -assern- ble at night ini large bodies, sounding varions discordant instruments - horns, drumns, bles, ketties, accoin- panied by loud shonts, and a contri- bution to the churcli, or somie charit- able purpose, is indispensible to oh- tain a respite fromn this jocular perse- cnt ion. \" The remarks on the Frencli-Cana- dian Sunday still remnain true to this day : C;Binday is to them. their day of gaiety; th ere is thon an assemblage of friendi and relations; the parishehiirrh collecta together ail whom they l\u003cnew, and with whonm they have relations of business or pleasures; the yeung and old, mon and women, elad in their best garments, riding their bout borses, driving ini their gayest caleches, meet there for parposes of buiiai ness, love, and pleasure. The yoiing babi- tanit, dlecked ont in his Most splendid lin. ery, makes hiR court to the niaiden whom he bas ,inglecd out SB tho object of bis affectionis; the maiden exhibiting in ber adorrument, every eolour of the rainbow, there hopes te most her chevalier; the bold rider deseants upon and gives evi- dence of tho menits of Isa unrivalledl pac- or; and in winter the powers of the vari- ons horses are, tnied in sleigh or eariole racing; in short, Bnnday is the grant fête.ee But of the Englieli society in Up- per Canada the wrîter lias quîte a different picture to, paint. VWhether there is aniy tmuth ini what lie says, I arn in no position to judge. I sim- ply put on record his picture of the early Ontario and Western life as an ultra view of colonial life of tliat tume. The statements lie makes are sweeping, and the charges are grave. It mnust be borne in mind lie was writing in 1840. lie commences by saying it breathes rather the spirit of Kentucky than of New England. lHe goes on: \"Disbandod soldions and salons wene net weil eaieulated to improve the broed; and evon tho volnntary enlignants were",
         "TUER n.ARTLE,\"'T IRAWINCQS MONTRFAL, FROMI ST. LAWRENCE,1ý FR011 A HARTLETT RANIN(; (iF ABUTi' 1840. not alwaya composed of thi espcal classes, whom, undor the pressure, of the tinlies, have, lately emTbraced this reqource. Theý removai of the ordinary rv ait of society and tie abseincv of' religious or- dinaLnces and iistratioli, tconcurredl li givineg to thi a rec-k1P4s and unprixii eipled character, Intoxication, eneuur- aged by t1111, pes of spirits, le lin dulged to a lamentable degree, and i, often productive of general ill-conduct and ruin, Little regardl is paid to the Sab. bath and other savred institutions: and the. ear of the stranger is wonenot onlv byv abusive language, but by swearlng to an odjouis and iiSgusting legreg,. Pugi listie cýontests are earriedl on witli a vio- lence rivalling those of Kentucky, a1nti bave neot always beeni unaevomnpaniie ' iv the sava-ge- practioe of geugingr. -Mr. Tal- bot, though lie admits thnt lie net with mnany respectable femnales, charges a large proportion of the. sex witb a dliqregardi and even insensibility to their tiret dlutieg. Âlthough al spry lass, as she is termed, is rertain of repeated offers and ie sure of being early united i n the. bonds of matri- mony, se may frequently befe re that event bave-ý given birth te one or twn ebuldren. Our author was in eoxnpany ivith a lady, who voluntpered te the, com- pany the information thnt 'ber Betty' had been two years vld at ber mnarriage. Tbe corrected] feelings on this subject, of fe- males from the eld country, are condema- cd as4 ridicjulous,. Nayv, where m) lilthi deliracy v aî and tic vhildti are su N aliable a possessiion,. th(, briingti, t wq or tbree inte thg, world in thi, irregulair mnanner, inateadl of' I.cng a bar t) niar- niago, proves, it is saiti, an additional at- traction, b)y inainiig xi., Noulng lady a specviee of heireis. Atter Itliair Sbi, maie1ks an ac(ti%-e anti in11iustriO114 wi ,ut expeevts froin lier linsbanl mueli ,efr- enre, andi even that hi- shouild winli at eccsýionali frailties. Tiws. J'aultsi are do- scribvd by NMr. Gouitrlay. as, rapidlY dlis- appeariug, thongli 'Mr. Tallbot, andi e\\gen Mr. Shinreif, founti themi stili too preval- ent; but the lnereased mevans of inistruc- tion and tii examiple of repcabeci grants, w i ina may lie, liepeti, gradually effect a thorouigli re-fori' The Goiurlay referred te ie, of course, the ecentlric Rlobert tïour.ly, NNh11 waged war agailnet the Famlilly Compact an(d was imprisonied for hie pa i te. 1,dwar(, Al1lanr Talbot pubII. Iished in London iii 18'24, an account of his \" Five Years' Residence in the CanIlad as. \" Patrick Shirreff pub- lished ai Edinburgh, in 183.5. an ac- count of \" Four Years Throughi North Amierica.\" Fortunately, hie bas hetter things to",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE RAFT ON TlHE ST. LAWVRENCE. FROM.% A BARTLETT D)RAWVING 0F ABOUT l840. say: \"No people i the world live better than the inhabitants of Upper Canada\" He gives us a lavish pic- ture ef the becs and junketinga in this land of plenty, though he malici- ously adds that \"M.Talbot, during a residence of five ycars, neyer saw above two individuals with books i Ltheir hands; and in one case It was a medical treatise consulted for health. \" The citation of these authorities, instead of personal statements, la an easy method of shifting the odinin £rom Nathaniel Parker Willis himseif to the books he read. Indeed, as to how widely Willis travelled i Can- ada, 1 have no information. He is dcscribed as a poet ini Cousin'. Die- tionary of English Literature, but it is rather an ambitious titie to apply to one who was essentially an oppor- tuniat iu literature. Hie studied the publie taste and complied with it. In faet, he gave the public what it want- ed. lie was boru at Portland i 1806, and educated at Yale, aeeording te the ever-useful Cousin, and edited sev- eral miagazines in the States; but he also wrote short pocins, short stonies, and books, for which there was a great demand in his day, such as \"Pencillings by the Way,\"ý \"People I Have Met,\" and \"The Slingsby Papers, \" etc. For a time he was at- tached te the American Embassy at Paris, and wandered widely iu search of copy. In tact, he was oue of the first of the moQdern type of journal- ista. Cousin sums him upin his usual admirable way: \"Ue was a t avourite in society, and cujoyed a wide popu- larity in uncritical circles, but is new distinctly a spent force. \" Death over- took hlm in 1867. His sumnxary on the West and its barbarous inhabitauts la really per- hapa best cousidcred as a journalistie write-up, with the colours laid oit thick for European censumption. Probably, like others, Mr. Willis kucw his market well. Yet, perhaps, one should not grum- bic, for his citations are extremely in- tercstiug. In retailing the opinions of various travellers, whe, lik Tal- bot, published accounts of their jour-.",
         "THE BARTLETT DRAWINGS TORONTO HARBOUR. FROX A BARTLETT DRAWING 0F ABOUT 140. of a man who has read up ail hie could on his subjeet. le does not speak fromn personal knowledge. Ile will flot commit himself. It would be ungracious to deny that hiii book makes excellent reading. For example, lie seemes te have gar- nered a large ainount of statistlokl information and otherwise, on the condition of the Redskin. We read of the general use lin summer of ice in Canada-the very thing the newly- arrived Englishman nowadays writes home about. Me hear how Lord and Lady Dalhousie held a grande lev-e in a Montreal inn. We are told that a considerable number of Indians ixsed te walk Montreal streets with mocasins for sale. 0f Montreal it- self. he writes (remember the year in whieh lie was writing) : \"The city built on the southeau border of thie fine islandl t. not crewded, like Quebec, into a liuuited spaca, 'whicii eau aloue bc covered with streets and habi- tatieus. Jt ha. a wide levai surface te extend over, se that aven the 01\u003c1er streets are of tolerable breadth, and severai of t hQu oeeCp IIY tS eutiro length. Tliv prie- (\"Pal One, Rue Notre Dame, ceusiderably extendu hait a mile in exteut, and containr s mnu of the rhiai publie building . Thera i. an upper sudf lower towu, tWough tha differene of elvtien ig ver\u003e' sligbt; but the formier is muuch more the handeenie of the twvo. The seven subhurbs are net, s iu tha. oider Capital, daetacbed snd ex- traneena, but on the samne lavai and im- niediataly adjacent. Their strpetsq, cou- tinued iu the dlirection ot these in the body of the placeara ragzular sud dluplayv asu handsoma boumas. The viclulty 18 adoruad with beautitul villaq.\" Again, ef the societ\u003e' of Qulebec, for instance, Willis tels USi: \"The soriety et Quebec ig more gay' sud polished than t. usual in colonieal rtias, where the pureuit et weeith tenus tee otten tha ie \u003cabject ot the luhabitauts. liera, besicles marchants, thara ara a num- ber of British civil sud militar\u003e' offcar., and a body of French noblesse, living on their domaine. These differaut classes (lo net ' it t. sald, always amalgamata. The Preuch, though otten superior iu manuers and habits, are in some dae dlsdalned b\u003e' tha Englieh peo-pla, wblcb the y do net well brook, ÂAueng the Enizlieh thein. selves, the ehiai test of rank is au intro- duction at the castle, wltheut wblch . . .... ..... ..",
         "TUIE CANADIA'N MAGAZINE 11 I CITADEL. 0F KINGSTON. FRoMl A PARTLETT D)RA'WING 0F ABOUT 1M4. btran1gers will find thimilves placed he- low tiiose wiiom tiiey wol have bei, elagsed ahovv in thi. Mother Country. The hotels are good, and after the. fashion of the. Unitedl States, the. jamates eommonly dine at a table d 'bote, whlih often affords to the visitor the opportunlty of meeting witii interesting characters.\"y -Willis, o! course, lias suggestions on emnigration fromn the old country. Tliey are very precise and full of warnings of whiat not to do. Tralking of wliat lie quaintly eafls \"Sporting in Canada,\" lie lias somne wild bear yarns to spin, xnostly taken from Taibot 's letters. Aýnd, o! course, lie lias to quote at length on the beau: lies of tlie Niagara FaLR. No writer on Ainerica escapes it, any more. as 'Mr. Cha ries Roberts once reinarked, thian thie writer on Italy forgets Venlice. Willis aiso quotes from the saine writer the following description o! Toronto: 4'Y ork (Toronto) is the. seat of goveru- ment for Ijpper Canada, and i s ituated on the, nortii side of Lake Ontario. Its bar- bour, wiiieh is a very extensive one, ' i formed by a long, narrow peninsula, corn- monly called Gibiraltar Point. Its defeneo- less situation, wiiicii cannot b. much im- proved, renders it of littie importance in tune of war. . . The. garrison is about \" mile west of the. town, and consists of a barrack for the. troope, a residence for the conmmanding officer, a battery, and two block-houses. whicii are intended for the. protection of the. harbour. In the, year 1793 tiiere was only one wigwam on the present site of the. town. . Tih. streets of the. capital are regularly laid out, iu- tersecting each otiier at right angles. Only one of tiiem, however, îs yet completely built; sud in wet weatber, thie uufinisii.d streets are, if possible, muddier and dir- ier than tiiose of Kingston. The, situation of the. town is very uniiealtiiy, for it stands on a piece of low marsiiy ]aud, wiiich is better ealculated for a frog-pond. or beaver meadow, than for the. residence of iiumau beings. Tiie inhabitants are, on tuis secouint, mucii subjeet, particularly- in spring and autumin, to agues and inter- mittent fevers; aud, probably, five-seventiis of the. people are annually affiied writh tii... complaiuts. He wiio fiust fixed uponi this spot as the. site of the. Capital of Uipper Canada, wbatever predileetion be may have iiad for tiie roarlng frogs, or for the. effluvia arisiug from stagnant wa- ters and puitrid vegetables, can eertainly hiave bil no very great regard for pre- serviug the. lives of His Majesty 's su)\u003e- jects. The. towl possesses oue great ad- vantage, iiowever, 'wih la that of a good, thougii defenceless, harbour.\"1",
         "TrIE BARTLETT DAIG THE FIWAi FT ORONT0. FROM A BARTLET 1RWN FAOT14 From these quotations iny readers wýill sue whiat a splendid anthology of Englisli grumblings and -grousing- Mr. N. P. Willis has collected ini hiq * Picturesque Canadaý.\" But it is al] so long ago by now that we cari af- ford to laugli at it, and, if 'Mr. WVilis and Bartlett iniseif could corne back in the flesh and stand at the bottomn of Yonge Street, they would have cause to rub their astoulnded eyes, The work as a whole la valuabie motybecause of the drawings, W1110.h, ileve r thl, c anot be ri.- gardled as examples of art. Tliey serve for thieir own lime about the- saine purpose as photographs serve iii our tùnei. They have every iip- peatrance of having been drawn froin actual observwation, and thierefore they are of xnueh topographical and gene(ral interest and valuie. The work includes a large number of thiese, drawings, but the ones reproduced herewitb will give a good idea of their character.",
         "THE WAGRAM 0F MAJOR WARFORD BY F. C. LEEDER Nt O, sire., tii. risig generation vill never learn to play check- onr,\" the Major said vith filnality, addresaing in general the. cornpany, grouped i attitudes of de- jection round the big stove in Ezra Gook's store at Caldon West. Tiies. remarks, r.ceived witii that prof ound attention and respect al- ways accorded the. obit(?r dicta of a master, Major Warford adjust.d his spectacles, tilted backhi usaquirrel-fur cap, strok.d uis white wbiskers, straightened hii, formn to its accus- tomed six feet, and strode to the vin- dow overlooking Main Street. \"I wonder if that checker man is coming or nlot? A niee boy-de-do, \" lie continued, with mingled fierceneus and benevolence, \"expecting me te go te Bearninster House, and play hum there. I 'd like him to under- stand, 1 amn cheeker champion of Pal- grave county, and, as sucb, it's up to me to naine place and time, and 1 always namne Ex. Gook's store.\" It vas generally believed. in local checker circles that the. Major play- ea better game in a store, axmd an oU.apodiida of fragrant and homely smeUts \"T1L.y tell me,\" the. Major resum- cd, \"he makea it a rule te play but one gae; quit. young, too, they say.'Y, The. \"lie\" Major Warford referred to, vas a young man, one of a party detained in Caldon by a snow-bound train, and, according to the companyv assembled in the. store, be w as \"some\" cheeker-player. On the. prev- ions evening this \"lie\" had met four of the. leading checker enthusîasts of the town in friendly games, and, te use an expression current in .local cheeker circles, had \"skunked\" them. To miake matters worse, one of the stranger's companions had remarked with a knowing amile that Smiith could mtake short work of any tvo of the. Caldon men with a bandage over his ,yes. Then it vas that the Ma- jrs naine was mentioned with sub- dued, sinful pride, and, after mucli haggling, and cadling up on 'phiones, and riging of 'phone bells, the strange Mr. Smithi iad agreed to go the. next day to Gook's store sud play the, Major a gaine, providing his train did not leave in the~ interim. This aceptance of their challenge pleased the. chllengers mightily, for the. Ma- jor vas the. most belov.d man in the viiole fair county of Palgrave. Steep- ed in ail the, 1oe and literature of checkers, lie loved the. gaine. To him it vas a sacrament, a communion of intellect. For miles round Caldon, on theiill settiements, sud on the rolling plains, lie vas acknowledged te b. the. one person i the county who knewr vhat vas \"«ruleable\" i cii.èkers sud what vas not. Strang- ers frein neigbbouning counties, and even from Toronto, writiiing und.r defeat, administer.d i masterly fash-",
         "THE WAGRAM 0F MAJOR WARFORI\u003e ion by the Major, consoled theinselves by misquoting Spenser, to the effeet that skill in cheokers argued a mis- spent youth, whereat Major Warford smiled winningly and gently correct- ed the maisquotation. The Major had attained bis major- ity, not on the snowy-teuted, emierald fields of Niagara, but in a far more ereditable way, by popular favour. H1e had, lu days long gone, been iu the crack mnilitia regimient, the 200th Foot, (Coon-catchers);- but, owing, it is poptilarly believed in the county, to grosa dereliction of duty ou the part of officiais lu the 'Militia Depart- ment at Ottawa, he liad neyer risen beyond the rauk of sergeant, aud bis frienda and neighboura, with one voice, gave himi bis liouourary coin- mission with the rank of major, and major lie hadl stayed ever since. \"And you have not been able to find out wlio thia checker-playing atrauger ia, Nosey, eh?\" Ez. Gook queatioued. \"No; I aiu't, Ez.; but you bet I will, if there is any fiud-out to it,\" reaponded Nosey Willet, whoae uick- naine did flot hinge ou bis persoual appearance, but rather ou his belief lu the irrevocable and inalienable riglit of every good citizen to poss a full and profound knowledge of his neighbour's business. \u003c'There they corne,\" someone ven- tured timidly, as a niuffied stampiug of aiioes was heard on the stoop. The M ajor shivered slightly, a close atudent of hiatory, and an ardent ad- mirer of the great Napoleon, lie was wont to say that every man met his Waterloo or hii. Wagrami, and often, in moments of reverie lie wondered if a checker-player -would ever appear ini Caldon wbo would defeat him; for in hie lieart of hearta, and lu apite of the enthualastie belief of hie admir- ers, lie knew lie was flot a strlctly sclentific cheeker-player. If thia man Smith ahould be the Wellington of the local ehecker world-lie trembled at the thouglit. As befitting a cham- pion, however, he bore himseif s a mlaster, wlien the great MNr. Smlltih surrouuided by a sycophautic groupl of fellow-travellers was cou)Iveyed( fioer to Ilhe big stove and iIrduc o the old master. \"Tliey tell mie you play a goodJ gaine of dia-I--er ---mean cheekers, Major-, ehf\"' Smith queried, Iu a deep musical Voice. The Major disclaimed Rny abilityV as a cheeker-player, but admitted hie played the gaine. l1e adjuisted( bis spectacles, and surveyed tile yourig mau thoughtfully. W;here lHi lie, seen thiat face before? The coininand- inig forehead, the widle-set., lwninous black eyes, and the dlownward, coin- pelling aweep) of thle nose.. The face remniuded hlmii atranigely, whether in features or expression, heteould not decide, of anl engraving of Burn8 thit liung lu the study of thle old miause where lie was bori, lu a hill-flanlced hamilet, iu the beart of old Ontario. ITls heart warmed to the lad. They aliook bauds. A board was solemnly produced, the checkers arranged, and the gaine commneuced. The strauger's4 opeuing appeared te the Major commnoulplace. WVitli tremblng handa tlie old man made each move-he feared bis Waterloo. As tbe gaine progreased, however, hae confidence returned, and with two men more than bis opponent, lie knew that by judiciouslyv \"msunnng off\" lie would wiu; the stranger waa flot se formidable, after ail, lie told bimaelf. Wbeni Smuith, sbortly after- warda, feil into a trap, the Caldn champion was inclined te be patron- izing. The spectatora guffawed. Out- aide the snow fell beavily. Iu a room at the rear of tbe store, Hetty Gook, the storekeeper's daugliter, borne frein boardingachool, at the county town, played old Scotch melodies, aweet and penetrating as the odour of crali blossnnma. The Major's baud fluttered hawk-like over the board. about to give bis opponent a man, and lead him into another trap, when looking up lie saw the young man 's brilliant, magnetie eyem, searching",
         "THE CANADIAN MIAGAZINE bis face with a curious, sad, yearning expression. Ile Iooked more like Burns than ever, the M[ajor thouglit. Ilis heart smnote hinm. I1e was a man of the world, lie retlected; hie could read faces, the lad was meeting hi, Water- loo, knew,% it, and was sorry for hlm- self, Ohi, thec bitterness of defeat! Softly fromn the back roomn floated out thie strains of \"Afton Water.\" The stlranger mnade a haif-turn toward thie roomr, ais if lu mnute protest; again his ey, searehied the Mao sface. Mýajor Wiarford paused, lie with- drew his hand fromn the man; hie was thr-ee Inen fo thle good. S-'houild he do it? Aniother covert giance at the ead fae--yesq, lie would. 11e purposely bunigIed a move, and gave his oppon- ent a mani. There arose a mnurmur of disap- provai, ahxiost drowning the haunt- ing melody of the pianio-the black eyes of the stranger flashied a puz- zled question. The Major frowned; was the ac- tion of a master to ho criticized by ain ignorant erowd? Soon the frown- wrinkles faded from his face, and hie forgot his ixnnanIy weaknese. Stretch- ing out a steady band he gave hie opponient a man, took three, 8nd the gaine was won. The stranger congratuiated hlm, a curions sinile adorning his deeply- ehiselled face. \"A verra gude maon, \" he said af- fably and anibîguou-sly, speaking in the Seottish dialeot for the first time since hie arrivai at the store, and after putting on his fur overcoat, le shook bands warmly with the Major, and stepped out into the twilight, fol- lowed by Mis dejected friends and Nosey Willet. TIen arose a mighty rosir of cheer- ing from the boys. They seized the Major 's chair, and up to the rafters he went. They were preparing for a second elevation, when lu rushed Nosey Willet. \" Major, Major, \" lie shouted, \"that Young mnan you played check- ers with is Willie Woderson, the pro- fesslonal eeker champion of Scot- ]and, on his way from the North to Toronto to play a serions of exhibi- tion gamies,.\" From the ceiling the old mani gazed down through blurred glasses at iPete. \"Series, Pete, my boy-s-e-r-I-e-s,\" le eorrected. Rlis happiness was complete. Ont- side a train crashed southward tîrougli the gathering storm.",
         "A81T THE PARTING 0F THIE RIVERS BY MRS. ARIHUR MURPH-Y AUTHOR 0F \"JANEY CANUCK IN THE WESF.- \"OPEN TRIS\"ETC. The Thtrd of Six Sketches. M IROIILAN'DTNG, whlere ýw\u003c ileave Cie boat 10 mnake the Mportage to Soto Landinig, is ouý Ille Little Slave River, at, ils con- fluience with thle Athabaisca. lis naiuiw lias bveen well chosen, for the LiIlil Slie River le a clear streaim aild t iïss kindly portrait Io al[ whio look therein. A telegrapli office, an officiai residence, a stable, and sloi'- age skodas are the onlly buildings. Whiat le Wo be donc withi thle port- aglng party whom, we hiave met, here and who go back 10 Athabasca Land- ing on oui' boat 7 That le a question beyond more, woman. Bolli parties muet spend the niglit here; there la only one bunk 10 ev-ery Iwenty per- sons, and those who hold possession -Liteirly refuse to sleep oulaide wilh thle mosquitoes and bulldog flics. Oucr- 1 read a story ln the Talmud which I considered wholly fabulons. It was about a mosquiWo saving the lfe of David when Saul kunted hlm upon t1 tî mounitains. I no longer doubt ilhis story, my credulity having van- quished this day with my courage. À iosquito le big enougli lo do any- ling. A member of the Royal Northwojkt Mvj'unîted Police, lrulv a most formid- able-Iooking man, insisted on 8earcbi- ing oui' luggage for conîraband h quoi'. I was sorely displeased and coiild have deait hlmi a clout with all xny iniglt for the forward maainer ]n whlich he lurnud out rnyv tinlgai lo tlite puiblic - view lUc gll mih have klxiw if 1 are ilisk, lt Nolld ho in ii xy coat poekel. 1lie onily find %vas an nboclo bottle of eidelr- berry N wýi1e, w ieh ranlchetr's wife was briniging hiome for lier dinner- party next Christmnas. Be ilt sid to thie y-ouI1's crodit that uipon Ille cir- cumaitanice being eýxplained to imi hie returned the wviie to lier, Hoe had 110 autkiiority for so doing, but assiiredly lie hald the cuenneof al great examnple, Yahveh of thle Jewas having aforetime - winkod at!\" certain breaches of the law which he con- sidered Io be the botter kept lu their nion-observ-ance. The liquor taken by thle police le either given o thle hospital ait Grou- ard or poured on the grouind as a libation Wo Bacchus and his woodland troop. It is very foolisli to ask the officer ln commnand if his imon ever drink it themaselves, for lie will say, \"Pooh! Plooh!' and uise other argu- mientative exclamations that wil friglit you out of your wlts. You w%%ould aimost think the subjeet wau loaded, and it takes a soft look and a wondrously sof1t answer to turn away his wrath, Early in the evening, 1 was invited to \"browse\" aI the officiai residenco, axid I had a good time; that is Wo say, 1 found it distinctly entertaining. \"'I would say that you are very wel-",
         "THE CANADIAIN MAGAZINE corne,\" remarked my hostess as skie held out both ber bands, \"were it not that it seemas au understating of the tact, I have read your Sowing \u0026eeds in Darnny, and feal that 1 kuow you extrernely well.\" [t was fortunate 1 did flot teil her, skie had confused nie witb Mrs. Me- Clung, for skie gave mie eggs to cat that were most cunningly scrambled with cheese; also rny bot rolis sopped iu butter, aud yailow bonay ln its cornb. Thiis is a ramblesome bungalow aud very comifortable. Musical ini- strumnents, couches, big cuablons, book-sbelves, and pictures take on a peculiar attractivcnesa wheu they are the ouly onies in a hundred miles or more. Aftar supper, we read \"Pbil-o-rum JTuneau,'\u003e by William Henry Drum- moud, sud discuused its relation to the Frencb-Canadian legeud, La Chasse-\u003c7allrie. 0f ail our Canadian legends, 1 like it the best, aud it may happen that you wilU, too. It tells bow on eseki New Yaar '8 Night the spirits of the woodsmen and river- meu are carrled ln phautom canoas from thesa lonely Nortblands back to the old horuasteads lu the South, whare, nsean sud ndlsturbad, thay iigle witb thair friands. Tha fa- ther embraces his cbildren; the lover bis maiden; the busband kils wife, and, once more, the son lays bis head on bis xnotbar's lap. Ail of the voy- ageurs join the fast, the soug, and the dance, s0 that no mari is lonely lu thosa hours, naithar la ha weary or sad. Itis a btter thiug,I1makebe- liave, than even the commniuon of saints. But just before the dawn cornes, the wraitb men find theniselves back ou the Athabasca, the Macken- zie, sud the Slave, sud noG oue spaaks of whera ha bas beau, or of wbat ha expariauced, for ail this ha mnust keap hiddeu iu bis haart. Wban, over a century ago, the legend firat sprang to life, thare were noue save meu to travel like this, but uow, of timas, a worn m.ay travel. too. 1 kuow this for a certainty in th at eacb New Year 's Nigbt 1 go rny- self. In my dug-out canoe-delved f rom wistful tbougbts aud thîngs like that-I take my burried way across prodigious seas of ice where neyer living foot bas fallen; adown ili.noted trails, tbrougb siîlver tracs; by kiidden caverns that are the laîrs of the run- ning wluds; over dark forests of pine and acrose uncouuted leaguas of white prairies whicb ligkit op the darkuess, tiil I corne to the warmer' soutbland wbere youtkis and rnaidens make wreaths of greeuery, aud( wbere meilow-voiced beils ring out the dy. ing year. And wbeu those wbo are mny owu people feel their bearts to ba of a suddeu rifled of love; that some one bas brnsbed their ckieak, or that a head la resting on their shoulder, then do thay kuow the exile bas corne back, for I bave told tbem it wlll be thus. And you, O my readars of the Seven Seas, uow that we are frieuds aud know each othar elosely, will you of New Year's Nigkit be keanly watcbful, too. It was hare that our conversation whaeled off from the cousideration of thia legend to the uortberu postman. Iu the fiuai summary ha must ba classad amoug those peerless feilows wbo, because of their courage sud in- cradible endurance, bave won for Canada this myriad-acred, but bithar- tb, waste beritage. No man who bere puts bis baud to the mail-bags must ever look back; be must bave thxe quality of keeping ou agaluat the odds. Ha la tbe modern young Lord Lochinvar wbo stays not for' brake sud stops not for stoue. Often kils route la stretched ont to bundreds of miles, and there ia no corner gro- cary where ha may tbaw ont bis ax- tremnitieas wblle mumbling driftless tbings about the weatber sud the Goverumeut. Presently, tha railways will bava taken over bis pariions profession sud ha will exist only as a memory of",
         "AT THE PARTINGOP THE RIVERS pioneer days. For this reason 1 took great hieed while xny host talked con- cerning him and of the qualities which go into makîing a successful 'piostie\" under the aurorai. Ho must ho agile, liglit of wveight, obstemni- eus, trustworthy, tireless, thewed and sinewved like a lynx, and, above ail, hie miigt have wire-strung nerves. In a word, bis profession requires aù stronig will in a sound body. \"Does it ever happen that the mail is not delivered?\" 1 asked, My host hesitated and made three rings of smoke while lie cousidered the ausw-er, as though ho would b. sUre-footed as to hiii facts. \"Sometimes it is not delivered, madamn,\" said ho; \"thoro may be an untoward happening, ini which event, its delivery depends upon the recov-. ery of the carrier 's body.\" When he made anothor three rings of smoko he procoeded with the story: \" Yeal1 the mail-carrier in this coun- try is a special person and must flot be judgod as general. Hie deservos a much botter reward than ho gets. To nxy thinkiug, it is a vast pity poetie justice so froquently fails. It may bo that some day you will write a story about us northmen, and if you do, ho sure you set dowu how Destiny so, often blue-pencils our lives in the wvreng places. We wili rend your book do-wn here, al] of us, just to see if you have been true to us, instead of Iaying up for yourself royalties on earth. \" \"And where do you bury a poot- man who dies with hie mail-bagai\"' I f urther pursued. \"HoIy Patriarch 1\" ho ejaculated, \"iyou don't think ho is carried baek to Athabasca Laudingi Hie body is cached in a tree and the police are notifled. When they give their per- mission, and when the ground is thawed out i the sprulg, we bpry him just where ho died. It may, however, interest you to know that the letters, '0HMS\"are eut on hie tombstone. \" you Ien'is 'I lu ominumn SaIvator, the saine as w rite over. our altars and on our baptismnal fonts? 1\" \"No!\" he replied. -I mnean 0Q. HS.;the s'aue ais thiey stamlp on Goverrment letters wicih are frarik- ed 'Oni Iis M0ujM,st's Service.' Yoil see, the work of delivering the mails dowu this way, ilie ext reniely ard- uouls, muitst noever for a moment ho cousidered as, uxienial. The carrier is a servant te none sanie Ilia limperial Majesty, George thie Fifth, of Eng- land. \" They are al] gamiblers, these North- inou; they play for love, for money, or for the moere pleasuire of tho play, and Boys of our Hleart. liko the mail- couriers and the striplings of the Mounted Police, gamble withi the oie- monta for life it8elf. \"Ah, well 1\" remiarked my hout, as ho put away hie pipe for tho night, \"thes. fellows kniow the ruies and dangers of the gamne when they 'ait in,' and while twenty-six of the carde are black, it is just as well to boar in mind that thero, are an equal num- ber of roda. \" Ou my return te fixe ship at mid- night, 1 found that someone had moiz- ed and was eccupying nxy stateroom on the nine-tenths of tlie law idea. 8h. aeemed to be a womn turbulent in spirit, and, accordingly, 1 Ieft her in possession; aise, I left lier dloor open te the mosquitoes who are evil whelps and more tutoured in crime than yen could bolieve, The. purser, a very agroeable and well-behaved man, gave up his office terne, but T did flot rest well, in that a whirligig of jubilant inosquitees was orccupying it coujuuectively, Be- iug fulI-blooded and sometimes in- eliuied te he rather mean, I endeavour- ed te accept this retribuitery plague as a chastening which mniglit prove heneficial te both body and soul. In the. morning, ahl the reckoning.q of the trip were settled at a desk bo- side my bunk, the mon moving around",
         "TUE CANADIÂN MAGAZINE with thie prehiensile tr-ead of thxe vit- lain who goe round a corner in the mnovinxg-pictuire films. 1 pretanded they had not awakened me, and breathied with mnuehi regularity, but all the while I was stealthily peep- inig. They would not biave under- stood if 1 ha(] made objections to their entering for here, at the edge of thinge, ail mnen are gentlemen or, are( eupposedl Io ho. Convent ionral ity Would bo acetual boori.shiess, anid a womiain muet try and earn for lier- self Ilhe titie of \"a good scout,\" it being the higliet eneomiiumi the North eaui pasq uipon lier. lef ore leavinig the ehip for the portage, we backed into the Atha- baea and after travelling two or fhree miles, unloaded a vast deal of freighit at s litf le lent town on the banik. Ilere and there, through this eountry y . on comne uipon these white encalmpmnents whieh mnean that thie iron furrows of fthe railway are stead- ily puishing the frontier farfher and farther~ north. This was the first load of freight to be brouglit down the Athabasca for the building of the Griandl Trunk Pacifie Railway. It was onily rough hardware truck, but, withal, amiable to my eyes, standing, as it. did, for the end of a long rub-. ber between fur and wheat. Yon would like the looks of the young enigîineers who took charge of the stfuf. They were no muiiffish, siekable fellowrs, but brown withi wind and! suli, hairdyv-mioulded and masterful. One of them has written somieltig about life on the right-of-way, whichi hoe intends sending me to \"toueli up a bit\" for a paper. It augure well for a country when its workers love it and %vant f0 write about if. And eveu so, My Canada, ehould I forget tbee, may my peu fingers be- corne saplese and like to polar twigs that are blasted by fire. And ma.N it happen in like manner to any of thy breedl who are drawn away fromn love of thee. The fourth sketeh of this serTies, whieh eoneerns Minna and the chair legs, and a ee baby, will appear ini the February Numnber. RECLAIMED LANDS 1BY PAULINE JOHNSON IIE long, fiat lands out reacli, field affer field, TLow-lying at the hem 0f enarling seas that beat against the ehield 0)f dykes that shelter themn. No more the landward-lifting waves will drown These shores with stormn and tide; The guardian earth they cannot battie down; The sea is shut outside. I hear thxe voices of thxe days, long gone Clainour and cail to me, 0 love, the shelter of your arme alone Shuts out fthe wolflsh sea!",
         "LOUISA From the Painting by William H. Clapp. Exhibited by the Canadian Art Club",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE",
         "PLOTTING WITH ALICIA BY MARGARET BELL A LICI IlSat in the window seat eating peanuts. She waa a À, free lance writer, who paid the rent of lier attic reom on the prom- ises of Sunday editors. Semetime. landiadies require more than a prom- ise. At sucli turnes Alicia would make the round of department Èhops, seeking interviews with advertising managers. The results of thes8e in- terviews usually appeased the land- lady-for a time. Alicia's attie was rather luinriona as atties go, It boasted a couple of Momoul rugi, a Croxnwellian table, and a view of Bradbury Gardens. Alicia would have preferýred a mupper- less niglit to indifference te a bargain in real rugi and antiques. Hence the. soft rugi and the. black oak table. Oftentirnea ahe would turn dovu the. ga, euddle up in the window seat and wateh the. people corne and go. And ah. would dream of the turne when sh. would drive through Brad- bury Gardens iu lier own motor-car, This niglit she was not drearning ef moter-ears. And the. people wlio thronged tlirough the. park gates dld net aeem te interest lier, so mucli. It was the twenty-fourth of December, about eight-thirty. As yet Alicia dlid not knew ef what lier Christmnas din- uer would conit. But tluit was net bothering lier very mueli. Although wlien one iu twenty-four and of the. effemiate gentis, it seeins rather na- turui that one should give smre thouglit of such things. Alieia was plotting a story. 8h. had been respected for lier looksand idealIa and braina. As te leoks and ideals, there miglit have been somne certainty. As te brains-sle must prove thern. The. eating of the. peu- nuts wa8 merely uubsidiary. That is. it served as an occupation for Aliia 's hands. When one's brain singa with thouglit it often requires an accorn- pauiment ef phymical activity. Thns it waa with Alicia. Acres. frein the park gates the Sal- vatien Army were building a booth fer Chriatmnas mrnning oliarity. Alicia ceiild see ragged little urchins bang- ing around expeetuntly. And a great deaire seized lier te, go eut and buy thinga for them. A tey mouse, a elieap stick-pin, uuythlng. For iii. kunew thut the. littie stoclkiugs, even if they were hung up beneath Boe snioky chimney corner, would remulu empty during the long, black uight. But thon aie thouglit ot lier own purs. and the. emptines of it. That was wliy mli. had sat down there te fathom smre plot, Se she cracked anether peanut aud kept lier eyes glued te the, flickerlng lights of the park. But soehlow or ether ides did net seoin te cerne te lier that night. Uer mind woiild go iiopping frei n e subj.ct te another, lik. a hîungry sarrow, te, a few scuttered cmumbs. Very often it weuld concen- trute ou hermeif, and lier minuteness in the. great city. Alicia theught that the. flickering 1lilits and bustie of the. park were a hindrauce, rather than an iwMsira- tion. Sh. gathered the. peanut shella lute a limte pile, wrapped themin ua",
         "TUE CANADIAN MAGAZINE bit of paper and raised the window. It seemcd so alive and Chiristmas-like outaide! Beils were jingling, chl- dren shouting, and on one corner a cbestnut vendor was calling Mia wares. Hlow could a girl of twerity-four be expected to think of plots lu the midst of sucb jubilanceet She threw the littie parcel of peanut shells down sud closed the window. Then she turned up the gas and walked slowly up and down the room, Ned Tliorniton feit somnething on his bead. Ile stopped suddenly aud looked up aud dowu the street. Then he decided to pick up the article whichi had hurtled through the air. Its remnants were sca.ttered ail over the sidewallr. Ned put two or three of the pea- nut sheils in the paper, bundled thern together aud puahed the bulky thîng into has overcoat pocket. Vien he crossed the street and stood staring over toward the big, brick building on the opposite cor- nier. Away np near the room were three windows. A big elm tree wus scraping its branches against the panes, as if exhorting the mistreas of the gable room to corne ont and join In the Christmas fun. Somnebody walked toward the three Windows under the roof, paused, and looked out toward the Bradbury Gar- dens. She had a retroussé nose, liglit browu hair, and eyes of some shade or other. Ned could not make out ex-. actly what colour they were. Tt didu 't matter rnnch, as f ar as lie was concerned. Rie said the expression of one's eyes was ail that lie cared about, anyway. Ned Thornton was an artist. The policeman carne up to hir ndc quietly suggested that he move on. Ned walked up te thechdestuut yen- dor on the corner and bouglit a dîme'% Worth of bis wares. Hie band- ed the pediar a two-dollar bill, ai- thougli there were several dirnes iu his riglit vest pocket. During the tirne the street merdhant took in counting out the change, Ned saw the girl in the house opposite ait down on the window seat and press lier face against the pane. Her chin rested in lier bands and lier whole at- titude did not bespeair bappiess or eontentment. Ned decided that she lived alone in the room witli the gabled windows. Hie was a deeut young fellow wus Ned Tliornton, and lie was biessed with tlie greateet blessing of the gode -a sense of humour. \"By Jove, ahe needs someone te buck lier up. Looks rather alone in the world. And li do it. P'U take the rîsk of gettiug tlirowu ont like the sheils. Christmas Eve is xny ex- cuse.\"0 Hie gave the chestnuts te a zmail urchin, and walkcd over to the big bouse on the corner. This w-as rather a new adventure for hinm. It took two or three trips past the bouse, and a couple of jerks to an inoffending hat, to sunnuon courage enougli tD walk up the steps. How is it that one cau face a criais mucli better if one jerks one 's bat more firmly down toward one 's earal Hie rang the bell. By Joye, what a stupid heart to go thumping around like that! Hie alrnost rau down the steps again. Soneo-ne opened the door. 8cme- one tait and garnt, with an expres- sien which exuded inquisitveness. Ned jerked off bis bat. III carne to me the young lady-o--r -at the top of the bouse. The room with the three gable windows.\" \"Oh, Miss Hnt. Callers usually ask for the young lady they wishi to sec by speaking lier name. I sup- pose yen eau find your way up 1\"' A bit of silver about the aize of a quarter found its way into the thin baud. À bit of silver about this siz. is always known te produce affability in the most callous. \"Jiust corne witli me and PHi show yen the way. I 'm sure Misa Hunt will be glad te see an old friend. 8h. don't seem to churn with anyone. There now-tbere yen are. Yon jiut",
         "1'LOTTINO WITII AlIc1IA go tip thlose stairs and knek on that door. And thaink you, very v h Neýd walke'd slowly 11p the, second iliglit or stairs. Ile wishied fls heart wouild Stop ils stuipid ilturnpinig. 11e knoi-kud at the door leadiyig to the roorn with thie gabled windows. It hadl a kn)oekeur il) thle for-Il of a sphinx. -1'Morn Mn, a VOice one frein thef othier side, of the, brown partition. It Sevrned,4 to corne( ail1 the way acros Ilhe rýoon. Nedi did flot, notice thei two bargalii Mosoffls alid t he ( r 1wl table, That i, lie did lot nlotice thrni i particular. Ile had thie sensation of being hii a place whieh harniionized i:i ai ils parts. Tho girl got up front the window seat and carne toward hiin, 1 hiope nothînig's the inatter,\" site -No, niot at ill. And yel mnust pardon rny intrusion and il that sort of thing, youi know. But I have, a stnall parcel whic(h 1 thiuk yen d rop- ped. Ili fact, I know yen. did.\" Ail this time lie was fumllbling in his oveýrcoat pocket. Finally. , e rew olit the enrrnpled pape'r and hianded it te lier, Alicia'ýs face bpeaine theý colour or the hioily bernies the hawkers were selling on the streets. -\"Don't, you think yeu were a bit presumnptueous toe ore up here on ne pretext whatever?\" Site threw the sheils into hier serap basket. Ned stood under the gas- light. twirling bis cap in his bauds. 'WeIl, yeu know, it waq a pretext. Something bit me on tep liead and how was I to know it was flot soxue thing valuable titat had failen out er your wiudewl\" \"There are other windows below mine. Might it not have corne frein \"Oh, I neyer thouit of that. You see, when I saw you standing before the windew there, yeu seemed se jeily lonesome--and ail that. I juit thouigit titey-the pareel-must be yours. \"Wel, that is a confession. IP'M sure I C 'rni obiiged to yoiu for your opinion of iie. That a one, way of atttrac(.tinig Seleonle's atnin \"(Oh, I say. Youl don 't thinik that, dfo yeu ? 1 rni not quite suci a retter als ail thait. l\u003erobably we haive ai mu1- tuai f riend soinevwhere. 1 'mi Ned T'herton. 1 draw aud dal) and illus- trate, sorne.\" \"lien Yen ever qel i ny of it?\" \"OhI, nlow andi then, wbien rent tîrnle cornles areundit.\" -Yeu 'ne Ilucky-. I alway1q have te svek the advertising ofcsabout rent tirne.\" \"Oh, are yen u artist, too?\" \"No, 1 just scribble. 1 iinighit be au artist at, that, if 1 baad the, chance. Buti there neyer was any panticular science te e-eîm. \"That, depende on the pot. Ilu an- cieut daysvr, the Pesasboiled preet- eus hierbes in very beautifuil pots.\"' -The present dlay lias ne use for anebiaisins, ais! \" \"Buit it's lup te sucit as we te teacit thie présent day.\" Alicia seemiled to realize the awk- wardniess of bier position. They botit stood undenP ici ligitt, while there were five uinoccupiedl chairs ail around thein. \" I suppose we might as well mit down, site said. Tbey did. \"Now, teIl me how yen feund out myi nlaie.\" \"juqt happenied on it. The tail creatune dowustairs who opens and sbutii thte doon is responsible for my knowiedge. \" \"Sunely youi didu't ask bier! Good heaveus!* that was cleven!\" \"Net 1. I sirnply said 1 wauted te see tbe young lady at thte top ef the bouse. She said, 'Miss iunt? Cail- ers uiily ask for thte youug lady tbey widi te secf by speaking ber naine.' Titat 's wbat site said, word for word, \" \"The oid griffin! She's se ini- quisitive! I ut really, yen knew, it is rather refresbing te break tbe eou-",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE ventiona.lities. Stupid conventionali- ties, that is. I don't se. why any Madame Grnndy alionld set up a stan- dard for people who are capable of thinking for themaelves, do yout\" \"My presence is proof of it.1' Alicia seemed to have forgotten bier plot-seeking. _When one is in the company of congeniality, one's am- bitions oftentimes will go soaring out through the window of one 's indiffer- ence. So it was with Alicia. It wus so long since ah. had talked with anyone whose ideas were other than commonplaee that her very soul seeni cd to cry ont its satisfaction. Somt, people would have called ber impro- per. She was only human, and en- dowed with an unusnal amourit of intelligence. When one is endowe\u003cd with intelligence, sucb trifles as con ventionality count for naught. Ned snggested that they go ont and watch the crowdo. The calla of *te street hawkers came in through thé- three gable windows, the shrieking of the street urebins. It was a welcome suggestion. Alicia longed for a jaunt down through the brilliant thorugh- fares. The vision of bwsy Christmas shoppers, ail laden with bundies, bad been blotting ont the plot of ber story all evening. The landlady amiled as she peered throngh the crack of ber door. It was the first time that Miss Hnt bad gon. ont with a yonng man. And it did flot seem natnral for girls not to bave gentlemen friends. Bnt Ned and Alicia were elbowing- tbrough the crowds, with flot a thonglit for the gaunt landlady. \" Wbere are you going to eat yonr Christmas dinner?\" Ned asked, when they had separated froin the street mobs. Alicia binabed. 8h. bad not thouglit of that. It was ber cnstom to enjoy eaeh moment as it came, witbout clouding its happiness by any thoughta of an indeflnite to-morrow. \"'To tell you tbe truth, I hadn't thonglit about it, \" ah. answered. \" Neither had I. So we 'l put our two heads together and give the mnatý- ter oui' prof ound consideration. I know a little Itailan place, down on Emerald Street. They have flne cookixig, and don't charge extra for serviettes. How'd you fike to try lti?\" 'It sounda great. -And probably a movie afterwarda t\" \"Righto! Or alegitimate show. I sold a picture the other day. It 's good for that much, at least.\" \"And how about the rent?\" \"When one îs enjoying oneseif, one forgets auch unpleasantnesses.\"1 They walked pust the ghittering shopa where tardy shoppers struggled wlth their bundles. There wus a sort of booth set np between a couple of shops wheré everyone seemed to be playi.ng a gaine of chance. \"A dollar a tbrow! Evferyone come and try your luck. There 's nothing in the fishing pond worth less. Most of the Prime are worth five turnes the amount!\" \"Here you are!\"' Ned sa.d, press- ing a bill into the fellow's band. \"Now, Miss Seribbler, try your luck!\", Alicia took the rod and lin. and brouglit np a welgbty parcel. \"It niay be a gold brick,\" she laughed. \"That's better than a bras knoeck. ' And on tbey walked. When one is happy, one will id a langh lu the slippery pavement or the stiff De- cember wind. They came to a large building, whicb knew Alicia. Many timea, ah. had walked np the ateps to a certain office marked \"Sunday Editor.\" \" This la the altar on wbich ail of my brain cblldren bave been saci- ficed, \" Alicia said, polntlng to the door. \"Wbat a pagan mother, to cast ber cblldren into sncb a pit!\" \"Ah, tbere's the pity of it. Soin. of ns have paganisin thrust upon us.\" \"Yes, aud probably, througb no fault of oui' own. \"",
         "PLOTTING WITHI ALICIA -Paganisin surely would not corne frein voluntary choice. At least, lit- erary paganisin.\" \"nI' rather glad you added the aifterthouigbt.\" \"Ye.s. I'n sornewhat of the, opinion that somne expressions of paganismn are more interesting than those ef Christianity. -I agree, perfectly.\" They had corne te a littie café, where Ned often lunched. They went iniside and ate a Welsb rarebit. It wFus a jolly littie place, with half-lighted corners, The Christmnas revelry carne te theni w; they sat there. liacould net rernerber whien she had feit se happy. \"Tell nie. what were yen doing when I carne in V' Ned asked. \"Trying te think of a plot.\" - Oh, 1 in se sorry! 1 hope 1 didn't interrupt.\"ý Alicia laughed. \"On the contrary, you have been the ineans of rny forming a meat ex- cellent one-al] but the end.\" Nýed leaned over the table. \"Do yen think 1 could help yen te mnake a correct ending, if 1 had the chance?\" Alicia urniled. Her eyes sered te wander beyeond the table and glitter- i ng lights. \"lWell, Vin always willing te give intelligent people the chance te dis- play thieir initelligrence,\" -That 's cemforting. But 1 still have Io a-sk if 1 arn fortunate enough to be clsmifled in that colurinn.\" -Then, if yen rcally belong there, voll'll find eut.\" Alicia got uip frein the table aud1 walked teward flic door. Ned fol- The landlady neticed an unusual Ruish in Alicia's checks whieu she carne in. And through the crack in the deor sha hes.rd bier say: \"At, one oM'ock, thon. to-r-norrnw. Goed-night. Mterry Christrmas.\" And she hummred a bit of song as she ran np the stairs te ber attic.",
         "SPECULATION AND ITS EFFECT IN CANADA B3Y W. W. SWANSON DEPART'MENT OF POLITICAI. AND ECONOMIC SCIENCE, QUEEN-S UNIVERSflY HE estion of speculation, Tespecialily in its relation to, the higli cost of living, lias neyer received adequate attention in Can- ada. The mania for gambling in real estate, which lias obsessed the minds of Canadians for the past decade, lias had a very intimate bearing upon ad- vancing prices; and yet the problcm lias been in general overlooked. And now that the boom in real estate has subsided, those 'who wish a short-eut to wealth without earning it are turu- îng their attention to the oil fields of the West, the black fox ranches of the East, and the stock market. It is almost încredible the nuniber of Cana- diains who are engaged in sheer gam- bling, although the more euphemnistie tenu, \"speculation\" is generally used to describe their operations. Aside from ail that, Canada lias ton extensively discounted the future; and in these resns, not in the Bal- kan war, the Mexican imbroglio, or the huge increase i the output of gold, are to be found the main causes of the incerease in prices and higli in- terest rates. fliegitimate speculation lias seriously injured the econoniîc condition of the country. Gambling often niasquerades under the name of speculation; but there is a funda- mental difference between theni. Busi- ness enterprise ià one thing; paying court to the god of luck is quite an- w5 other. But serious as are the results of gambling-moral and material- to the individual, the economie ef- feets on the community at large are of equal concern. Speculation lias a direct and immediate effect upon the, miarket. The manufacturer, the wholesaler, the retailer, and ultimate- ly the consumer must pay the cost of a speculative boom, and suifer at its collapse. Prosperity which îs not based on the actual production of gooda is merely the excitement pro-. duced by intoxication. Mucli of Can- ada 's recent progress lias been of a thoroughly sound nature; 'but a part lias been fictitious and represents no real advance. Gamblîng which re- sults ini forcing up the price o! real estate adds nothing to a nation'm wealth, it merely lays a burden upon the consumer for years to, come. Fligli values mean higli rents; and higli rents mean higli cost of production, whieh in turu means higli prices. Higli prices and higli rents may real.. ly represent a higli degree of misery and want. The truc measure of a nation's prosperity is found in the relative purchasing power of the peo- ple. Now, abnormal credit extension and illegitimate speculation are large- Iy responsible for the higli cost of living in Canada. Not only so, but they have been the chie! causes o! the",
         "SPECULATION AND ITS E FFCT IN CANADAý sudden and remnarkable collapse in the valule of securities; and for the long-conitinued stringency in Ithe iine(y market. Thesc are inatters of Vital importance to the inidividual, as well am te the several governiments, municipal, provincial, and federal. Lt is limpvrat ivo, therefore, for ail who) woufld understand fundamiental e(on]omtie! Conditions te get al elear con- ception of whalt is inivolved lu spec-l lation. The termn speculation, of course, is uised in various senses. Often it bas reference to persons who \"abe in the mrarket as \"oties\" But generally it refers te men who expeet to mnake their living or thevir fortune bly dealing in securities or commendi- ties--persons who are ''prof essional apeculators, \" These, may againi be distinguished froim \"leýgitimante\" deal- ers--the wheat nierchant, the cetton dealr'-honet as permanient mid- dIlemen between those who have solfie- thing te sell and those who wish te buy. Between these persons there are insensible gradations. AIt thesee speculatorg influence, te a greater or legs degree, the course of market pricen. It would be absurd, of course, te eondemn ail speculation. Liegiti- mate speculation is absolutely neces- sary for the proper funetioning of business, for it bringas into equilib- rium demaxid and supply. It tends te mnake daily prices conferm with seasonat market prices; and to make the latter sucb that the whole supply will ho absorbed by the market. 'Meni who have devoted thernselvea, ini a prefessional way, te the study of fundamental market conditions, be- eorne shrewd judges of the seasonal supply. They can estimate the effect ot a given snpply upon price, and hence they* are able to make a profit in their business. They buy, when others are willing te seli, at a price lewer than the tacts ef the market warrant; and, conversely, they sel] when ethers bid a higher price than the tacts warrant. Buying and seil- ing between expert dealers tends te avoid tsharp variations in, seasonal prices. Ine(vitatbly, t here wiIl be fluctuations in priee, with unexpectedj specullative lossand gainsq. Buit thle liene(ral e!ffe(t ot legitimate specula- tion is te profilote, the smnooth course of exehianige and conlsumplltioni, and te lessen sharp fluctuations in p)rice, Now, it is juist here that seua tion becomes of vital initereat te the mnanufactuirer and Ille consumner. Thli lessening of flututations in price la ef xnanllifes1t ad(VaLntaige te the uilti- mnate consumner, and aise Io the mnanui- facturer w-ho, in the parlanve of lc(Ioomists, is thle cnsmr\"e raw mlaterials. Feor the u1ltiate consumfr- er, say, et wheat, ain early and exact adutment of price briniga al more caret ul utilization ef the available supply- A short crop mnust ho care- fully hulsbanded througheuit the mca- .son ; and thei soonier the higher neces- sary market price isachd the more iikely will this be acemplishied. And ceniversely, a large crop is better soid at a steady theuh a low price. Buit outsiders who \"dIabblle\" in thev mar.- ket, and who are ignorant ef basic conditions, tend to unsettie prives. This is geod neither for the manufac- turer uer fer the consumer. A vari- able price for raw materials prevents the manufacturer fromn properly ad- justing bis output te the demnanda et consumers. LIn fermer days v, before the estab- lishment ot world mnarkets, wide, varia- tiens in the price et food were cein- mon. Under modern conditions, with great areas et suppiy breught into conipetition by railways and steam- mhips, abrupt changes li tbe supply ef inuit foodstutffs and raw inaterials are rare. The developmnent et cold storage, in re\"ent times, tee, bas secur- ed an even distribution et supply un- der conditions that are essentially speculative. Fruit, fiRh. sud eggs, whon the sxippiy is heavy, are beuight by dealers, put ln cold'storage, and beld fer sale at a later period. By this device prices are made more equable, anid the risks are tess. -More-",
         "TUE (JANADIAN MAGAZINE over, on the average, the. community secures ita supplies at a sinailer cost. The process of lessening fluctua- tions and distributing riaks la pro- moted by the practice of dealing iu futures. It is with tliis operation that speculation la moat intimately asse- ciated. Professional dealers mùke a close study of the prebabilities of the future, aud undertake to make deliv. ery of gooda ou the. terme which those probabilities suggest. Âpart frei the tact that prices are steadied by this practice, it is ot very great benefit to manufacturera who enter into con- tracts for the future delivery ot their preducts. The. prie of cotton goods, wooilens, muer goodà, flour, and so forth is closely related to the cost ot the raw material uaed in their manu- facture. To avoid the riak, tiierefere, wiiicl iiievitably ariaes from con- tracts te furulali geods at a flxed price in the future, manutacturers buy the, raw materials at a fixed price for future delivery. The. risk aris- ing through changes in the. prie ot the. raw material la thns avoided, as it is assumed by the apeculator and the. wiieleaaler. Even lu the euse wiiere the. manufacturer 18 producing steadily for the. market risk eau b. avoided. A miller, for example, who buys a certain quautity of wheat to b. ground iuto fleur eau seil, for fu- ture delivery, the sanie quantity of wheat. Thereafter, as wheat goes up or dewu in prie, lie loues as mucli by the. one transaction as lie bad gaiued by tue otlier. He eau then cou- centrat. is attention ou the. manu- facturing end ef the. business, the risk ariuing freni price'fluctuations ef the raw niaterial iiaving been eliminated. Against tue advantages wicl pro- fessional. speculative dealings brisng are serions evils. Tiiese evils are en- iianeed by the. very facilities wii enable upeculation te perform imhport- aut services te the eeminunity. To make this elear, attention aiiould b. called to the. tact that speculatien iu made possible, on a large mcale, by \"utandardiziug\" the. commoditY deait in-that la, by grading and clsifylng commedities according te quality. This precess pute an end te ail disputes regarding tlie quality ot tue things contracted for. Thus, grain is examiued as it ruaches the market, by publicly-appointed inspecters, aud is graded as being No. 1, No. 2, No. 3. Tiiereafter, wlieu a purchaser lias bis wheat delivered te hlm, neither lie uer the vendor need inquire turtlier whetlier it la of the. atipulated quai- ity. Delivery et elevator receipt8, certifyiug the. grade, satiafies ail con- tracts. On the. exehauges et America and Europe, cotton, wool, iron, etc., are treated iu a similar way. 0f ceurse, securities - preferred and commun stocks, anud ail grades ot bonds-offer exeeptional opportuni. ties for apeculation, because ot the case wit)i whicli tliey eau b. stan- dardized. New, wlien once a commedity or a security lias been standardized, the door is flung wlde open te specula- tien. Anybedy and everybody eau become a speculator. Under erdin- ary circnrnstances, the man who buys an article muet kuow somethiug about it. He muet b. able te judge wlie- ther it la good or bad lu quality, and wiiat itought to beworth. But on au exebange wliere commodities or securities are graded, uo sucli ques- tions arise. Only prie, preseut or future, need b. oonsidered. Any oe eau buy if lie tinks the. present price low, or sel if he thiuks it higli. Sucli buyiug and selliug la doue, on an enormons seale, by large numbers of persous who do net possor 'wish te poss the. articles tliey buy or sell. Their only conceru la te make a profit by taking advantage et flue- tuations lu prie. Tliey 'virtuaily bot on the future prie of conuuodities or securities, snd ganible about it as meu gamble on carda, roulette wlieels, or lhnrqip.. Tn form- tht'ir R1pmlinip",
         "SPECULATION AND ITS EFFBG'P IN CANADA the exclhange, mnake delivery nt thc stipulated trne. l'le brokers, in turri, hold thieir customners te this saine resporisibility. Buit, thoughi M forini like othert dealings, on the bet- ter-kinown cxchianges-such as the cottoni and grain exclhanges of New York, for exanpe-the immiense ina- jority of the transactions have lu vicw no bon\u003cz ide business. The ma- chlincry which lias been deviscd for the easy and rapid transaction o! business is utilized for gamibllng on a large scaie. This is especially truc of the security inarket. The whoie business resoives itseîf inito an enor- Mous econloinic waste througli tie eni- pioymnent of an army of unproduc'. tive labourers. If the only persons ~engaged in this work were mercliants and dealers wlio syutematically gave their turne and attention te it, the number needed would autornatically adjust itself te tic work required. But where there lu \"iilegitimate\" speculation on a great scale, ani arxny o! brokers and dealers lu rcquired. Ail this labour is improductive. T'le obvious remiedy, of course, lu te prohibit buyinig and seiling for fu- ture delivery. But this would put ain end te thie benefits whicli the coin- mnunity gets f romn contracta for fu- tures. The loua would ountweigli the gain. Germiany, however, lias pro- hibitedi future contracta in g-rain. The most effective rernedy would be a better moral standard for ail iu- dustry, and an arouscd public opin- ion against all forina o! gamnbling. But the desire to make \"«easy\" rnoncy and the close association of speculation witli business dealing rightly deemed legitimate, tender it diliult te bring public opinion to bear. The gains lu stock exeliange specu- lation, liowever, are very great, and eutweigh the evils. Thle gains arise in this instance, net frem the lefflen- ing o! price fluctuations, but frein thc promUotion of investuient. Bat, aI- tlieugl tlie gains are rerni, the eviii are no leus real, and ame intensified by the unusual case of cuitering on the transactions. There are, many Canadians wbo liabitually gamtble Ii stocks. 'l'le dealings for the contin- ent are conicentrated at the New York Stock Exebange, which is at once the greatest institution in the world for facilitating inveýstment, and thIe greatest of gambling hlis. And the waste inivolved is not conflned to the usecsa expenditura of mental and physical labour. Tl'le waste isi- crcased by the. deinoralization of miany ien in the community who take an intere8t in speculation. Like ail gambling, it distracts fromn the continuous, productive work on which the comnmon welfare resta. As lias been said, speculation in sonie of its aspects is wliolly legiti- mnate, and ia essential te the preper functiening of the business o! the country. The plain fact la that cvery buyer snd seller is a speculater in nioney, thougli lie mnay not realize it. Net enly se, but every debtor and crediter'is a speculator not only in iuoney, but iu \"futures\" as well. Every debtor lias sold mouey short in exaetly the saine way as a specu- lator who dealz in wbeat lias sold that cozmeodity short wlien lie lias contracted te deliver a certain num- ber of bualiels at a given price at a future tuine, fc gains or loses as the price at the time of delivery lias fallen or risen. It is one of the accepted principles lu speculative markets tliat tliere is no better guaranty for thie mainten- ance of prices than tlie existence of a large short interest. Tlie reasotn is evident; for these persous are poten- tial purcliasers wlio mnust buy witliin a given time. whetber tliey wish te do so or net. In tinies of business expansion and general prosperity, wlien people are extending their busi- ness operatiens and seeking uew op- pertu-nities of gain, a large shiort in- terest lu meney lu being created; aud as theo time for meeting tlieir obliga- tions approaches it lu inevitable that there must b. a ucramble for moneY",
         "THlE CANADIAN MAGAZINE with which to satisfy these eredit con- tracts. And that is exaetly what has happened, and is happening in Can- ada at the present moment. Business men and financiers have largely dis- oounted the future. They have \"taken chanees\" in almnost every di- rection. While an enormous produc- tive effort has been put forth, and thie farrn, the factory, and the mine, have beeni worked as neyer before, yet a great deal of the country's capital has been invested in purely specula- tive enterprises with the hope that the upward trend in prices would continue long enougli to net substan- tial profits. Thousan.da of persona throughout the country, however, have made a special payxnent on their purchases and have borrowed to cover the difference, or are making pay- ments from tirne to time as these be- come due. It isi this elass that suifers most when there is a stringency ini the money market. Dealing in a emal way, although the total of their busi- ness amounts to an enorinous sum, they are unable, when the market breaks, te hold their own, and must sacrifice their holdings to meet ont- standing obligations. The pressure exerted by these small dealers on the entire business structure of the country is very great; and it needs the meat consummate skill of the bankers and financiers of the nation to avoid a total collapse of credit and prices. The reasons for the enormous de- eline in the prices of securities and real estate in Canada are not far to seek. A man who finds himecf ob- liged te make a payment at a certain definite time must either borrow or seli what property he lias. It has been very dîfficuit to borrow, during the past year, on speculative hold- ings; and hence these have been thrown on the market. The present would seem to be an opportune time te, buy, for many securities are oeil- ing far bclow their real value. And not only se, but the municipalities. and the Provincial and Federal Gov- ernments should seize the occasion te erect permanent public works. It is a totally erroneous idea that induces a policy of parsimony during a per- iod of industrial declension. Great public works should bie pushed for- ward se, that labour may find cm- ployment, the market be steadied, and' eredit sustaÎned. Retrencliment mere- ly accentuates the difficulties of the. situation. Canadians hardly realize how cloue the country lias been to the verge of a financial, panic during the year that lias gone. Undoubtedly the skili and' conservatism of our bankers and \u0026 splendid harvest have saved the situ- ation. The country bas heen taught a lesson whic'h, if heeded, will have been well worth the cost. Truc pros- perity is based on the production of goods, and not upon the pyraniiding of credit snd prices. The. monietary stringency is gradually passing away, and the mania of illegitimate specu. lotion has largely spent its force. A spirit of optimismn once more it- abroadl in the land. The possibilities and resources of Canada are not in- deed measureless, but they are truly vaet. For the future, however, de-. velopment must be based more large- ly on facto, and lesm on vain fan-- eïes.",
         "HOW FINLEY McGILLIS HELD THE PIER BY ROBERT BARR T1 lS is a story o f war »s, alarmas, andi file agony tliat corne ltrouigl m1ati 's inhum11anity Io mari. Il is generally siipposed titat it iii uipon the commonl soldier that the bruixt of battie faîls, but, very of- ten igypledofficers aire called upon te suiffr for titeir country, and it is the. pathetie tale of one o! tiiese war-dogs that 1 now set mnyself to relate, hopiing that 11i4 heroismn may thum retain a place iii the. aunais of the. land. If Madamie Hlistery, after listening te my tale oif woe, reservea a modest niclle In thte temple of famne for Captain Angus MecKerricher, I shall b. more titan satisfied. Of course, being lthe privileged his- torian of McKerricher, I should by rigita keep silence regarding my own ihitary exploits, but few o! us are entirely unselfisit, and se, having the. oppertunity, I may casually mention, sleeing that ne eue else is likely to do se, that I fell gloriously in the. de- fence o! lte Empire, yet ne medal lias been awarded me. As it is net yet tee laIe te remedy titis neglect of oee o! our bravest men, I may b. fergiven for dwelhing on tii personal incident. Tii, \"Fenian Seare,\" as it was called, caused mnucit expenditure of meney and pin. lumiber. There arose ail over our part e! Canada, and doubtless in other portions as well, linge drill- sheds whose style of architecture more nearly resembled the Country Pair building of later days, titan it did 267 jii. Whiteý (J!ity of tlle (ýCîcgo - ih)it io r. Asn I rememiber, 1h. e t was defrayed semiewhat in titis way: anyi tewn or m1uni.ipality. patriotic enougit te yearn for one of these mniii- tary ereetions, got up) part of the. mnoney and the general (Joverrument fiirnished the. remiainder. TFle town- uhiip council pressed tlii bultn, and P'arliamnent dîd fic rest. The. drill-sheds were great oblong buildings mnade Of pille, covered by a wvide-spreading shingled roof. The. fleer was flic original soul of Canada, whielh tli building was eonstructed to de! end. Under the. amrple roof, a regiment mnight hiave geone throuigh ità evolutions. Few of these drili-sheda now reinain standing, aithougit none, so f ar as 1 can learn, were destroyed by tic valiant Fenians, the meat ter- rible warriers with their mouitha wlxo ever struck panie into a peacefuil peo- pie. The. expanding roof (o! the. drill- sheds, not o! the. Fenians' moutha) offered toe tempting a mark for the. amnateur cyelonn roaming over the land, and thus there came a stormy day when the. cotupenent parts of lhe building were distributed witit im- partiality among the. taxpayers of that and fic. adjoining ceunity, furn- ishing superb kin dling wood' for ail the farmers to the, leeward of the, original site. Se scatters niilitar glory, 1 helped te huild several o! lies. historie structures, and one fine day",
         "THE CÂNADIAN MAGAZINE fil fromn the apex of the oue ini loua, ElAgin County, luy f ail beiug happily broken and soothed by a pile of brick ou whieh 1 came down, witli the debris of a scaffold on top of me. Wheu, to-day, people whli kueir me coufid- ently predict that I shail end on the scaffold, they littia realise howii ear their prophecy came te being fore- stalled. Would it ho believed that, up te date, Iona lias put up ne stone ou the spot, with the inscription; HIere feil Barr in the defence of bis ceuntry?\" 1 mention this incident, flot iu hope of recognition or aven with an eye teirards a pension, but becanse it iras tlireugh that flU that 1 arn noir the humble histerian of MeKerricher, for after conmiug eut of the doctor 's liands 1 came te the con- ,clusion that carpentering was tee ex- citing a business for a nerreus per- 4on like myself, se 1Itook to the lit. erary life, and liere I amn. It must net ha suppeaed that we in Western Canada irere net a mili- tary people even before the drill-sheds spread over the land cither througli my building or witli the aid of the cyclones. We irere alirsys a blood- thirsty gang, aud our military aystem lias since beau plagiarised by Gar- many and France. Service iu the rauks iras coxnpulsory, aud eue whlole day iu the year iras devoted to drill, the censumption of stimulante, and the inaking of effete Europe tremble. This mamorable axmual festival iras the 24tli of May, the birtliday of the Queeu. Umileas a day in the miiddle of harvest liad beau cliosen, ne more inopportune time could have heen selected than the 24tli of 'May, se far as the farmers irere cencerned. The leaves irere just onton the tracs, the reads irere becouung passable again througli the dryiug of the mud, sud spring work iras at ita haiglit. It iras tharefore extramaly ineenveni- ant for farinera te turn their plow-. shiares into m=ale-loaders andi go fvnwi *hepo fa \u002b1l.fijrn mil.oR fa~ the For years the rigour of Military discipline liad been xnitigated byv a well-known device. Some neiglibour, at the mailing of the roll, would shout \"Here\" whlen an absentee 's name, was called, and se mue reports that irent into the Goverumant alwaya showed the most marvellously Con- stant atteudanca ou duty that his ever gene on record. No wonder the Queeu sat securely on lier throue and was unafraid. Thus the Empire rau sereuely on until Angus McKerricher iras mada captain of the militia. I don't kueir why lie iras appointed, but 1 think it iras because lie iras the only mnsu lu the district Who oirned a sirord, wihl had descendled te, hum frem hicý Highi- land ancestry, doubtless escaping cen- fiscation by the Engliali seliery, snd iras thus preserved te bacome the chief support te the Britishi throne-. certainly a change from its use iu youniger days. I iras a sald bey irlin Angus first teok commuand, but 1 well rexuember the dismay hic se- tien spread ever the district. Augus kuair persoually every mn in the county, wirhl, te parody Gilbert, iras A f,.et they hadu t countad upon When they first put their uniformo. The Captain's niforin consisted of bis ordinary clothes rendared irarlike bY a scarlet sashl looped over the left shoulder and tied iu a sanguinary knet under the riglit arm, or \" oxtr\" as .Angus tarmed that Portion ef Ihis body. B~ut wliat addad perturbation~ te the feelings of the creird assembledi ou the parade greund iras the long cisyxuere lield parpendicularly up the~ rigid riglit arm, the bult almost demn at the knea, tlie Peint extending abova the liead, as Augus steod erect with lieds tegether sud chi lield high. Even the dulleat of us ronilnni4,.",
         "ILOW FiNLEY ?LoILLIS HEËLD TUE FIER The. stout yeomanry were ail drawn up in line, and beside the statue-like figure of the captain utood the. town clerk, or whatcver the. officiai vas who kept the. roll of able-bodied citlions between the ages of eighteen snd forty-flve who vere lhable to military .service. The. day began with the. cal- inig of the. names. ..Peter MeÂAlpine.\" -\"Here. \" * John Finleyson.\" -ler. \" -Dugald Me.Millan.\" H Iere. \" -Sandy McCallumn.\" - Here.\" \" Baldy McVannl.\" - Present. \" At this juncture the suddenly up- Iifted sword of the. captain stopped the. reading of the roll. -Baldy McVaunell, step forwardl f rom the. ranks!\" vas the. sharp coin- id of the. armed offleer. There vas a moment's apprehensive silence, but ne one steppcd from the. ranks, whicii wus not te b. wondered at, for Baldy was at that moment peacefully plowing his fields seven good miles away, and \u003c'Present\"' had been an- swelred by us friend and relative, MicCallum, who iiad varied tiie word from bis evu anaver, 'Here,\" the better te escape notice, a plan which bad always been successful befere. Deep was the scowi on the. Captain 's face. -1Put hlm dowu fur a fine,\" he said te the elerk. \"H. 's over the. aadge,\" cried Me- Calluin, who feit that hie had Wo stand by bis abeent friend. \"He's neither over uer under the. aadge. Sandy, \" cried the. Captain with decision; \"he 's betw.e thirty and forty, and he sheuld be her. this day, as he very well knows. Put him clown fuir a fine-a dollar. \" An ignored law suddenly .nforced carnies consternation int anv com- munlty. Tii. infliction of tii... fines made sa greater financial punie ln our district than the. failure of the. Upper Canada Bank. More than two-thirdsm of the. effective 'warriors of the town. ship proved to be absent, and the commercial stringency caused by this unexpected clapping on 01 fines pene- trated to the. farthe8t bounda of thi. nnicipality. A dollar was indeed a dollar ini those days, and not Wo be, lighitly parted with. Hevwever, such %vas the. law, and there was no help for it; but the. inflicting of the. peu. alty did nothing towarda increasitig tii. popularity of the Captain, al- though it did increaae the attendance on parade for mnany a year after. Vengeance camne awiftly. It had been anticipated that it would take the. form of a flght between McRer- richer and one of the. indignanit f rienda of an abaentee, as soon as parade vas over and the friend had taken on board sufficient whiskey tx mah. hiu quarrelaome, which was flot as large a quantity as Borne of our temperance friends might imagine. Tiiere vas Celtic blood in the. locality and it flowed f reely from pnnched noses on lma momentous occasiong than the day of the. grand mnuster. Atter the dismial of thie troops, the, Captaizi kept his good sword in bis hand, and it was stiil too early in the afternoon for any te have courage eneugh to attack hlm with bar. fists. That vas expected later, for it takes time te reach the. proper piteli even with potent Canadian malt. Flow ever, revenge presented itself to the. Captain in strictly legal guise. A villager. learned in the. law, engineer- ed the matter, and the constable ar- rested McKerriciier on the charge of carrying a knife with a blade longer than the. statutes alloved. About that time there had become prevalent a villainoua.looking dirk with a long sharply-pointcd blade, which shut uip like an ordinary jack-katfe. but whieh had at the. back of the. handle a catch. which beld the blade rigid, once open- ed. This weapon had in more than one row. which would in ordinary circumst-ance have been innocent enough. proved disautrous, and a law",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE had been passed to suppress it. No man was allowed to, carry, concealed or in siglit, any knife with a blade more than six inàcles long, and there miust be no device that held the blade rigid. It was alleged that McKer- richer 's sword violated this ordin- ance, and that he had paraded the town with this illegal instrument ini plain siglit, to the terror and dismay ýof lier Nlajesty's faithful subjects, be the saine more or less, in the case made and provÎded, \u0026ce., ac., in faet, I do flot rernber the exact legal phraseology of the indictmnent, but anyhow it was iii words to that ef- feet. lu vain the Captain pleaded thiat the sword was a necessary lim- plement of bis new trade as militia oflicer, and that the peace and coin- fort of the realm lad flot been vîsibly înterfered with tlrough bis carrying of iL, but it was easily proved that he had retained hie sword whule not; on duty, and that said instrument was a kiuife within the rneaning of the Act, its blade being more than six iniches in length, firrnly affixed to, the handie aforesaid. The magistrate flned himn five dollars, and adminis- tered a solemn warning frorn the bench. \"Cot pless her,\" exclaimed an i- dignant Northerner when the verdict wus made known, \"if she waants ta laI, Jet lier have awl ta lah !\" In other words, if the law against absentees was to be enforced, Jet us aIso set the law rcgarding jack-knives in motion. But it was the Fenian scare that brought ont the superb Napoleonie qualities of Captain MecKerricher, as great crises always develop the latent genius of notable men. \"To arma!\" was the cry, and everything that would shoot, except the blacksmith s anvil with whidh he used toecelebrate the Quen's birtlday, was brouglit in- to -requisition. Shot guns, muskets and rifles were brougît down frein their wooden pegs along the hewn walls of the log boeuses. We young- sters were set at moulding bullets, and it was great £un. IEvery house pos- sessed bullet moulds, iron arrange- ments like a pair of pinchers witli metal cups at the business end, where a smali hole at the Wuetion of the closed cups enabled you to pour in the melted Iead. There was aise, a couple of sharp blades forming part of the handies, which, working on the principle of nut-crackers, enabled you to, clip off the lead protuberance and leave a perfectly moulded bullet which would kill a man as effectively as if ît baad been cast by the Govern- ment. Meunted mnen had ru8hed gai- loping up the main roads front the lake and along the concession Unes, shouting as they passed, \"The Fen- ians are comingi\" pausing for no comment, but hurrying forward witli tIe news. It needed no other warn- ing to cause every man wlio could shoulder a gun te make his way as quickly as possible, witli whatever weapon liebl, to the village whieh le knew would be the rendezvous. It seems funny to look back on this comn- motion, for tîcre was ne more chance of the Fenians corning to our part of the country tlian there was of the Russians, nevertheless we did not stop to think about that until later; and if invaders had corne, I arn willing te risk an even dollar tliat they would have wished theuiselves safe once more in Buffalo saloons, in spite of the justly celcbrated reputation of our own brands of liquor, for they would have corne into a peaceful coin- munity that would rather figlit than cat. Few of us knew anything about the menîte of the Irisli question at that day; our attention being absorb- ed in politice tliat pertained to the talismanje naines of \"John A. \" or \"George Brown.\" Still if invasion came, we wcrc ail willing to figlit firet and inquire into the case afterwards, whidli was only natural. The northern shore of Lake Erie, at least tliat part witli whidli I am ac- quainted, is a coast perfect as a de-. fence. Higli perpendieular dlay walls, quite unscealable, formn a barrier",
         "110W FINLJEY McGILLIS IIELD THE PIER which no enemy o! sense would care to encounter. Lt must nlot be suppos- Pd thiat 1 amn accusing the Fenians o! ,baving been men of sense, for 1 have no 611db intefltioll, but eveni tliey would hesitate to attempt the clay walls o! Western Ontario. Ilowever, the eagle eye o! the commander at once 11,edile weak point in our de! ence witli an unerring instinct wortby o! Von Moltke. This was the pier. A ereek flowed îito the lake, and a road to the shore tan along the b)aiis o! this Preek. At tlie terminus o! the road had been buit a pier jutting out into the lake somne hun- dreds o! feet in length. HIere, in peaceful timies, schooners from. Cleve- land, E rie, or Buffalo, had loaded theielves witli oaken staves or prime whecat. Captain MeKerriclier saw that once the pier was captured, the Emipire feUl. Hie therefore mnassed bis force on either bank o! the ravine, so that a witliering croiss lire would discommode the enemny as lie came up the valley; flot at ail a bad formation either. Thus the embattlcd farmners stood prepared to fire a shot which, if not heard round the world, would at lest echo to the village two miles away. As evening drew on, prepara- tior-s were made for camping out all niglit on these heigli and giiards were set on the pier, Finley MeGillis at the post o! danger, the end neareet to the Fenians, while McCalluin and MeVannel held down the shore end, al] tliree prepared Wo wade ini blood shouid any miscreant attempt te kid- nap the pier, except the iimited liabil- ity eompany whicli rightfnlly owned it. Sentries were placed round the camp iziland, and outposts fartlier off. Never was there more firin discipline cxaeted from any body o! soidiers. The rigour o! the Britisli army was as nothing compared witli the mar- tinet cliaracter o! the regulations o! this camp. Captain MeKerricher in person visited every sent'inel and in- formed hirn that this was no 24th of May parade, but real war, and that amy sentinel caught asleep would be forthwitli shot îistead o! being finied a dollar, and that if a man Lit bis pipe he would spend the test of his life iii Kingston P'enitentiary. But the invincibility o! a camp is unrknown until it is tested. The Cap- tain resolved to put the irness of lis sentinels to tlie proof. fIe took nio one into his confidence, and liere again his likeness Vo Napoleon is cvi- denced; lie nieyer let any o! his suh- ordinate officers know what the next move on the board was Io be. Trhere was a sinall skiff in the creck, and, the evening darkening eariy b)ecause1 o! a coming stormn, the Captlaini pueli- ed out the boat unobserved and row- cd sons distance to the west, then turned south and ont into the lake, finally coming nortli again toward the end of tlie pier. The niglit was black, relieved by an occasional glimi- mer o! lightning on the surface o! the lake, and the wind was rising. 'Me- Kerriclier's qnest was getting Vo lic an unpleasant one, for lie was essen- tially a landsman, and tlie incrcasing motion o! tlie boat 'was disagreeable, but wliat will a man not do and date for his country's isake? Lt is prob- able that lic descried the forin o! Fin-. iey MeGillis against Vhe dark sky be- fore the sentinel cauglit any indica- tion o! tlie boat on the murky water. Finley said afterwards tliat lie was just wondering whetlier lie date risk a smoke in his isolated position and trust Vo putting lis pipe out if lie lieard a step coming up the pier, wlien lie was startled by a voice from the lak- \"Surrender I Drop your gun and save your life. Surrender in the naine o! tlie Fenian Brothethoodt\" MeGillis inade no reply, and the Captain began Vo thi2nk lie lad caugit; lis chief sentry asleep, but as the wabhlùxg boat becaine diinly visible tu the mn. on the end of tlie pler, Fin- ley said slowly, \"I1 eau see ye now. If ye move land or fut Il'l blow ye ont o! tlie watter\" 'That 's ail riglit, ' said the Cap- tain hastily; \"Vin glad to note that",
         "THE CÂNADIAN MAGAZIE yen are on the ulert. I'm Captain MeKerricher. \" \" A likely story, \" replied McGillis eenteiuptuously. \"The Keptin's ne a malin te risk huznheIf ini a bit shal- lop hike that, an' a storm comin' up. Yer ina preeeoner, an' y.'11 b. a deed malin in another meenit if ye pit band te ear. \" ' Yen f ool,\" cried the. angered voy- ager, \" how eould 1 know about Me- Kerricher if I were a F'enian?1\" \"Oh, it 's easy enengh te hear abeet .MeKerricher, and it's verra weel kenx't i, the. AuId Country an' in the, States that h.'. eer Keptin. Yer a wolf in sheep 'a cething, that's what ye are, and jist listen ta me. There's a bail nearly an inch thick in this mijsket, an' that'Il b. threugh yen befere ye cau say 'click' if yen den't do whatl1tell ye. Then in this shot- gun at ma feet there 'a a lead of sings, thmt'ull rive yer boat te bits if y. at- tempt ta mak' aif. Is tiere a rpe in that boat?\" \"Then throw it ta me if it's lang eneugh.\" This was doue, and Finley tied the end ef it te oe of the. npright piles. Hand yen np they ears. That's right. Now yer ta the. windward e' the pier, an' uic. an' eomnfrtabl fur the nicht. \" \"Yen are surely net geing te keep me here ail ni.-ht, and the rain cern- ',The. rai 's no warse fur yen than fur me. A buddy munna b. ower pîrtecnlar in turne of war. If it shenld bc that yer the Keptin, l'Il ruake my apologies in the mornin'; if yer the F~enian ye said y. were, tiien Aang'as 'Il hang y, fur yer i- pidence in takin' bia niaie.\" \"Pire one gun in the. air, and caii the offcers. You have twe, se there's ne risk. Disobey yeur Captain at your peril, and 1 il have yen Court- martialled in the mornlug.\" -1,il fire aff naetbing avaw. F'a net gaun to waate a siiot an' poether sa dear. If I fire, it will b. at yen, and besides if I did flre, the whole camp would b. shootin' at once frein the. heiglits in this directien, an' while I'm cempeiledl ta risk being shet by the. Fenians, it's ne in tihe bargain that 1 should stand fire from mi own friens, an' a bullit fra the, norti ilis- as readily as yen fra the. sooth.' The wind rose, the boat recked and the ramn came on. \"Give me the. oars, at leat,\" im- plered the captive, \"'that rope will break and tiien l'Il be adrÎf t andi heipleas. \" \"The. wl 't deon the. lake, so if it breaks, y.'il jiat corne ashore abeet Long Peint.\" But the. rope did net break, and very soon the, Captain was past the peint wii.re cenversation is a pleas- ure, for hewever brave h. miight be on land, h. hîd neyer been intended for the. navy. \"Yer ne used ta a boit,\" comment- ed the. sentinel, wiio iiad been a fish.- erynan in the Highlands. \"It 's unca hard at the. turne, tiiey tell me, but ye'il h. a' the better fur it in the mornin'. Wiien day broke F'inley McGillis expressed the. utmost consternation and surprise te find that his prisener was really lima captain. \"Min! _Wia wud ha' beleeved that!\" h. eried in amizement. Tii, muberinate officers who helped their haggard captain eut of the. boat, idvised iiim strengly te say nothing about the. incident. Thiis, se fir as 1 knew, was the. enly naval enceunter that occurred at the time of the. Fen- ian Raid, and it gees to show, as 1 uald in the b.ginning, tuat tiios. who, devote theinselves te the cause of their country, suifer nnrecorded liard.. shipq fer wiiich, alns, medals are not given. Even this section of iiistory is futile, for, as what 1 have set downm is strictly true, I could not give real names, becalqse 1 have had ne oppor- tunity of eonsulting witii either cap- tain or sentinel, and do net knew but ene or otiier migiit object te the reve- latien of their identity.",
         "ROYSTERERS RETURNING TO TIIE CAMPI From the Painti.g by Lawren H,,,rî,",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE",
         "TANNIS 0F THE FLATS BY L. M. MONTGOMERY AUTHOR 0F \"ANNE 0F GREEN GABLES,- ETC. WHlEN Jerome Carey was sent to take charge of the tele- graph i tation at the Plats he cursed hai fate in the picturesque language permissible in thic far Northwxest. Not that Carey was a profane mani, evenl as meni go ini the Weýst, le was ani Eniglial gentleman, and hie kept both his lIfe and hiis vocabulary pret- ty clean. But thie Flats! The Plats was a forlorn littie trad- inig-station fifteen miles up the river from l'rince Albert, wvith a scaxity population of haif-breeda and three whiite men. Outside of the ragged cluster of log sliacks whieh comprised the settlement there was, always a ahIiftinig fringe of teepees where the Indians who drîfted dowxi fromn the Reservation camped with their doga, and squaws, anid papooses. There are stanidpoints front whicli Indians are interesting, but they cannot ho said f0 offer congenial social attrac- tions. For three weeks after Carey wvent to the Plats lie was lonelier than he had ever imagined if possible to be, even li the Great Lone Land. If if had not been for teaching Paul Dumont flic code, Carey believed that he would have beexi driven to suicide in seif-defence. The telegraphie importance of the Plats consisted ini the fact that it was the sfartixig point of fliree telegrapli linos te remote posts up North. Nof înany mesae came therefroxa, but thle few that did corne generally amoumtcd te something wortli wliile. Days a.nd even weeks would pass 3-M7 without a single one being elicked fo thec Flats. Carey was debarred front fa]!kiiug over the wires te the P'rinceý .Albert mani, for the reason that thiey were officially on bad terril. le blam-. ed fllc latter for his fransfer to fthe Plats. Carey slept ini a loft over tlic of- fice and got his neals at Joe Es- quint 's, acrose the \"stree(t.\" Joe Esqiiis wife was a good eook, as cooks go ainong the breeds, and CJarey soon becamie a greaf pet of hers, Carey hiad a habit of beeoming a pet witb. women. Ilio had Ille \"way\" that lias te be hemn in a man and can nieyer ho acquired. B3eside,. lie wau -s handsoie as dlean-euit featureq, deep-set, dark-blue eyes, faim curis, and six feet of muscle could make hini. Mrs. JToc Esquint thouglit fIat his moustaclie wsthe most wonder- fully beaulifull tliing ixi ifs lme týat she had ever seen. Fomtunately, 'Mrs. Joe was so old and fat and ugly fIat even thc ma- lie-ious and inveterate gossip of skulking breeds and Ixidians squat- ting over teepee fires could nof hint u~t axiyfhîng questienable in the rela- tions between lier and Carey. But if was a different matter wîtli Tanmis Dumnont. Tannis came home from flic acad- emy at Prince Albert early ini July, wlien Carey lad been af the Flats a mnontl and lad oxhausted ail thc fow novelfies of Iiis position. Paul Du- mont liad alroady become so expert af the code that lis mistakes no long- er afforded Carey any funi, and flic",
         "TUE CANADIAN MAGAZINE latter was getting desperate. Hie had serious intentions of tlirowing up the business altogether and betaking him- self te, an Alberta ranch where at least one would have the excitement of roping herses. When ho saw Tan- nis Dumont he thought ho would biang on a while longer anyway. Tannis was the daugliter of old Au- guste Dumont, who kept the one strall store at the Flats, lived in the on~e frame house that the place boast- cd, and was rcputed to be wortli an amount of money which, in haif- breed eyes, was a colossal fortune. 01l -Auguste was black and ugly, and niotoriously bad-temnpered. But Tan- nis was a beauty. Tannis's great-grandmother hiad been a Cree squaw who married a Freni trapper. The son of this union became in due time the father of Au- guste Dumont. Auguste married a woman wliose mother was a Frenchi half-breed, and whose fathor was a pure-bred Hiighland Seotsman. The result of this atrocieus mixture was Îts justifleation-Tannis of the Plats -who looked as if ail the blood of ail the flowards miglit be running in lier vis. But, after ail, the dominant eur- reut ini those samo veins was from the race of plain and prairie. The practicod eye detected it in the sien- der statoliness of carniage, in the graceful, yet voluptueus curves of the litho body, li the sinallness and dolieacy of hand and foot, in the purpie sheen on straight-falling masses of blue-black hair, and, more than ail else, in the long, dark oye, f ull and soft, yet aliglit with a aluni- bering fine. France, too, was respoins- ible for somewhat in Tannis. It gave lier a liglit stop for the stealthy hait- breed shuffle, it arelied her red upper lip into a more tremulous bow, it lent a note of laugliter to lier voice and a sprighlier wit to lier tongue. As for her red-headed Scotch grand- father, ho had bequeathed lier a some- wbat whiter skin and ruddier bloom than is usually found inx the breeds. Old Auguste was xnightily proud of Tannis. Ho sent lier te sehool for four years in Prince Albert, bound that his girl should have the best. A Higli Sehool course and considenable mingling in the social life of the town-for old Auguste was a man te be conciliated by astute politieians;- li econtrolled some two or three hun- dred halif-breed votes--sent Tannis home to the Flats witli a very thin, but very deceptive, veneer of culture and civilization over-lying the primi- tive passions and ides of lier nature. Carey saw only the beauty and the veneer. He made the mistake of thinking that Tannis wau what she seemed te be-a fairly weil-educated, up-to-date, young won.. n ivitl wlem. a friendly ffintation was ,ust what it was with white womankind-the pleasant amusement of an hour or seaSen. It was a mistake--a very big mistake. Tannis undorstood. somo- thing of piano playîng, something les. of gnammar and Latin, and semne- thing las stili of social prevarica- tiens. But she understood absolute- ly notliing of flirtation. Yen eau nover got an Indian te see the sensé of pla- toni os. CJarey found the Flats quite toler- able after the liomeeoming of Taunis. Hie soon f ell inte the habit of drop. ping into the Dumont lieuse te spend the evening, talking with Tannis in the parlour-which apartmeut was aîuazingly weil doue for a place like the Flats (Tannia liad net studied Prince Albert parleurs four yeara for nothing), or playing violixi and piano duets with hon. Whieu music and conversation palled tliey went for long gallops over the prairies to- gether. Tanuis rode te perfectioni, and managed lier bad-temperod brute of a pony -with a akili and graco that mnade Caney applaud lier. She was glenious on lierseback. Semetimes lie gnew tired of the prairies, and then lie and Tannis pad. dled themselves oven the river in Nitcbie J\u003c*e's dug-out, and landed on",
         "TAN-NIS 0OP TUIE FL~ATS to tile wooded beit of the Saskatce.. wan vailey, leadinig north to trading- posta on the frontier of civilization. 'There the-y ramibled under hunge pines,, hoary withi the age of centuries, and Carey t alked to Tanisiý about Eiig- hlnd, and quoted poetry to lier. Tari- ia liked poetry; alie had studied it -1t sehlool and understood it fairly well. BUt once slhe told Carey that she thouglit it a, long, roundabout waty of saying what voir could say just as wvelIlu in aif a dozen plain words. Carey1 laiugliedl. 11e liked to evoke thiose littie speeches of liera. Tliey Sounlded very clever, droppinig fromi sucli arched, ripely-tinted lips. If youliLad told Carey thiat he wvas pyngwith fire lie would have Iaughed al, you. ]l tlie tirt place, lie was net in the aligliteat deýgree in love wvitli Tannis-lie mierci\u003e' admired and liked lier, l t lie 4ec( dplce it neyer occurred to hlmi that Tannis ightli lie ni love witli hlm. Wliy, lie Liad neyer attempted any leve-making witli lier! \\nd, above ail, he- wva obsaes(d %%itli that a foresaid f atal idea that Tannis waa like the women lie Lad associated witli ail Lis life, in realit\u003e' as well as in appearance. Rie did net know enougli of the racial characteriatica to underatand. But if Carey' thouglit that Lis rela- tionship wvitli Tauila was that of friendahip ierely lie was the oui\u003e' oue at the Plats who did think ao. Ail the haif-breeda, and quarter- breeds, and anyv-fractional breeds there believed that lie mneant te marry Taunnis. There would have been notli- ing surpriaing to thein lu that. The\u003e' did flot know that Carey's second cousin was a baronet, and tliey would not have understood that it need inake an\u003e' difference if the\u003e' Lad. The\u003e' thouglit that ricli old Auguate 's heir- eas, wlie La~d been to school for four yezirs in P'rince Albert, waa a catch for anybody. Old Auguste himseif alirugged his shoulders over it and was wellkpleas- ed enougli. An Englishman was a prize b\u003e' way of a husband for a hlf- lireed girl, even if lie were oui\u003e'ia telegrapli operator. Young Pauil Dui- mont worahipped Carey aud Ille haif- Seotch miother, whio iiniglit have uni- derstood, waai dcad. Ilu ill the Flats there were but two people wlio dis- approved of file mlatch tliey thiouglit. a.n aasurcd tiuig. One of these wa,;s thie littIqe priest, Father Gabriel. lle iiked aniand[ lie liked Carey, buit lie shlook hie liead dubi)ouly1. whenl lie hevard te goasip of thiliack auld tepees. Re'ligiolns mliglit mingle, but hle differont bod-lit was, net thec riglit thing! Taninie a a goodl girl audf a beautifull onev, but elie wvaï no fit. mate for tie fair, thiorouigli- bredj , nglishman. Fathe Gabriel -wislivd ferventi\u003e' that Jeromle Ca2re ' iiiîglit seon lie traneferred elaewvliere. fie e,-r venet to Prinice Albert and did a littie wire(-puiilnig ou hia owni acount, but nothinig camle of it. 11e was on the wrong aide of politica. The othevr mialconfltt waa Lazarre Meriieo, a laz\u003e', hesotted Frencli hlf- breed, wlio was, affer lis faiLion, in love witli Tannis. lHe couild neyer haveý get bier and hie knew it-old Au- guiste and youung Pauil would have iu. coutiuently riddled hîmn witli bullets Lad lie veutured near the bouse as a anitor-but lie liated Carey' nouec t -he less and watdhed for a chance to do him an ill-lurn. There le ne worae euiemy lu ail the werld than a hlf- tweed. Your true lindian la bad enougli, but lis diluted descendant la ten timies weree. As for Tanuis, slie loved Carey with ail lier lieart, and that was ait there waa about it. If Elluor Blair had neyer corne te Prince Albert there la ne knowingp wliat mlglit have liappened after ail. Carey', se powerful lu propinquÎt\u003e', riglit even have ended up by learu'- ing to love Taunis and marrying lier, te his own worldly uudoing. But Elinior Blair dld corne to Prince Al- bert, and lier comlng ended al things for Taunis of the Flats. Carey' met lier ene eveniing iu Sep- tember, wher% she liad rlddeu into,",
         "TUE CANADIAN MAGAZINE town to attend a dance, leaving Paul' Dumont in charge of the telegraph office. Elinor was a Prince Edward Island girl who had corne up te visit a married brother. She was more than eommonly pretty, and Carey fell in love with lier at thec first moment of their meeting. During the next three weeks he went toi town nine times and cailed at Dumont 's only once. There were ne more rides and walks with Tannis This was net intentional negleet on bis part. H1e had simply forgotten ail about lier. The breeds surmised a lover 's quarrel, but Tannis under. stood. There was another wonian back there in town. It -,ould be quite impossible te put on paper any adequate idea of lier emotions at this stage. One niglit $he followed Carey when lie went te Prince -\u0026Ibert, riding eut of caraliot behind hîm on lier plains pony, but keeping hlm lu siglit. She trailed him te the Blair bouse on thue bluffs abeve the tewn and saw him tic bis herse at the gate and enter. Tanuis, tee, tied lier pony te a poplar lewer down and then erept stealthily through the willows at the side of the lieuse until she was close te the win- dows. Threugli one of tliem s could sec Carey and Elinor Blair. The half- breed girl creudlied down in the sha- dow and glared at lier rival. She saw the pretty, fair-tinted face, the fiuffy coronal of golden hair, thc blue, laughing eyes ef the woman whom Jerome Carey lovcd, and she realîzed very plainly that there was nothing left te hope for. SIc, Tannis of the Plats, could neyer compete witli that other. It was wdll to, know so muel, at lcast. After a time she crept softly away, leosed lier peny, and lasîed him mereilessly wîth lier whip througli the streets of the town and eut the long, dusty, river trail. A man turn- cd sud leoked alter lier as she tore past a brightly-lighted store on Wa- ter Street. \"That was Tannis of the Flats,\" he said te a companien. \" She was in town last winter, geing te schol- a beauty and a bit of a devil, like ail tliose brced girls. Wliat lu thunlder is she riding like that fort\" One, day a fortnight later Carey wcnt ever tIc river alone for a ramn- ble up the nortliern trail and an un- dîsturbed dreamn of Elinor. Wlien lie came back Tannis was standing at the eanoe landing, under a pine tree, in a raîm of finely-sifted sunlight. Slic wus waiting for him and she said, wit hout any preface: \"Mr. Carey, wîy do yen neyer erne te see me now?\" Carey flushcd like any girl. Her toue and look made him feel very un- comfortable. Hie remembered self- repreachlully that lie must have seemed very ueglectful, and lie starn- mered soecthing about Iaving been busy. \" Net vcry busy, \" saîd Taunis, witli lier terrible direetness. \"Lt la not that. Lt is because yon are going te Prince Albert te sec a white wo- mnan! \" Even in bis embarrassmnent Carey notcd that this was thc first time he had ever heard Tanis use the ex- pression, \"a white weman,\" or any other that would indicate lier sense of a difference between Iersclf and~ the dominant race. Hc understoe4, at the saine moment, that titis giri was flot te be trified with--tîat she would have the trutî eut of him first or last. But lie f cît indcscribaly foolish. III suppose se,\" le axiswcred laine- \"y £iAnd wliat about met \" asked Tan-. nia. 'Wlen yen, corne te think ef it, thi was an embarrassing question, espe- cially for Carey, who lad believeJ that Tannis understoed the game andL played it for its own sake as lie di4. \"I don 't understand you, Taxunis,1t lie said linrriedly. \"Yen have made me love you,1\u003e said Tannis. The words seund flat enough on",
         "TANINIS 0F TUIE FLJATS paper. They sounded anything but fiat to Carey, hurlcd at himi as they were by a woman trembling witli ail the passions of her savage ance8try. Tannis had justified lier critieisim of poetry. She had said lier hiaif.-dozenl wvords, instinct witli ail Ille despair aind pain and wîld appeal that al the poetry in the world liad ever ex- pressed. They made Carey feel like a scoun- drel. Ail at once lie realized heow im- possible it would be to explain mlat- ters to Tannis; and thiat lie wouid miake a stili bigger foot of limiiself if lie tried. \" 1 arn very sorry,\" lie sta.mmiiered, like a whiipped sclioolboy. \"It la no inatter,\" iiterrupted Tan- ii violent Iy. \"Wliat dîfferenice dees it mnake about mne-a lialf-brecedgil We breed girls ara only born te amluse the whimen, That' is so, la it flot? Theni, whien tliey are lîred of us, they pusli us aside and go back to their own kind. Ohi, it la very wvell. But 1 wiIl net forget-my f a- ther and brother will flot forget. Tliey wiil miake yen sorry te some pu rpose. '-he turnied and stalked away to lier eanloe. Ife waited under the pies until she liad erossed tlle river. Then lie, too, went mise-rably homne. 'Wliat a mess lie had contrived te muake of ihingq! Poor Taninis! Ulow liandý- some she liad looked in hier funy- and how mueli like a squaw 1 The racial marks camle out plainily underýi Ille stress of lier emotion. Uler tlireat did flot disturb imii. If younig Paul and old Auguste inade t hiings inpieasant for imii lie thouglit himiself more tlian a miatch for thiem. It Was the thiouglit of the sufferingz hie liad brouglit uponl Tanniis thiat weorried bim. fe had not, te be sure, been a villain ;buthechad bee a fool, -iid thiat is almnost as bad under somne circuLmstances. The Duments, howe'ver, did net trouble him. After ail, Tannis's four years in Prince Albert had net been altegether wasted. She knew that white girlia did not mi-, their. male relatives.- uir i a vendetta whiei aj manl eeased cailinig on tlieml-and alie hl ioting else te cozapiain of that cold4 be put ini words. ýA fter somne retteution sie colncluded to biold] lier tonlgueý. She even lalighed whienl old Auguste, asked lier what was up betwe-en lier and lier fellow, and said she hll growni tired of hlmn. O1ld Auguste sirugged lis sodrsre- Signedly. It was just asi we' llma-ybe. Thlose EnIglieli sonis-i1-1awsoeis gave thiýtemcis too manyv airs. So Carey rode often to town, and( Tannis bided lier limne and plott(ed futile schlims of revenige, and La- zarre Merimnee acowled( and got drunktil anid life went on at thle Flats as ulsual unltil the st week in Octoer, l a big wind and rainistorm11 Swepýt over tlle northland. Tt was a bad ilit. The wires were down between Ille Flats andl Prince Albert, and ail coinmlunication witli the outside wvorld was, eult off. Over at Joe Esqinit 's the breeds were liaving a carouse iii lionour of Jloe's birtliday. P\u003eaul Dumiont hiad] gone over, and Carey was atone ii tlle of- fice, smoking iazily and dreaming ef Elino,11r. Suddenly above the s;pish of ramn and whistle of wind lie hevard out- cries i the street. Runiniig to the door lie wus met by Mrs. Joc Esquint, who grasped hlmn breathIessly. \u003c'Mectstair Carey-cemne qui ck! lia- zarre, lie kill Paul-they figlit!ý Carey, with a smothered oatli, rush- cd across the street. Ife lad been afraid of semecthing of the sort and lad advised Paul flot te go, for thocse half-breed carouses almnoat alwaYs ended up in a free figlit. fIe burst liet the kitdlien aI Joe Esquint's, to find a cirele of mnute spectators. rang- ed around the rooin, and Paul a.nd Lazarre in a linel in the centre. Carey was relie'ved te flnd it was OuLIY an affir of fists. He promptly hurl- ed himslelf at the combatants and dragged Paul away, while Mrs. Joe",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE Esquint--Joe limseif being dead drunk iu a coruer-flung lier fat arms about Lazarre and lield hlm back. \"Stop this,\" iaid Carey sternly. \"Let me get at hlm, \" f oamed Paul. \"He insulted nuy sister. fie îaid tliat you-Iet me get at lili!\" Ile could net writhe free frein Carey's iron grip. Lazarre, with a tmari 11ke a welf, sent Mrs. Joe spin- ning, and ruelied at Paul. Carey struck eut as best ho could and La- zarre went reelilg back agaluat the table. It went over with a crash and \"Perliaps till mornlng,\" answer- ed the doctor. Mrs. Joe gave a loud- er hewl than ever at thuîs, and Tannis came and stood by the bed. The dec- tor, knowlng tliat lie could do just nothing at ail for Carey, liurried into the kitchen to attend to Paul, wlio had a badly shattered arm, and Marie went with him. Carey looked stupidly at Tannis. \"Send for lier,\" lie said. Tannis smîled erueily. \"There is no way. The wires are down and there ino mnan at the Plats wlie wiUl go Wo town to-niglit, \" she answered. \"My God, 1 miust see lier before 1 die,\" burst out Carey pleadingly. \"Where is Father Gabriel? He will go.;' \"The. priest went te tewn lait niglit and lias not corne baek,\"' said Tannis, Carey groaned and suit lis eyes, If IFather Gabriel was away, there was indeed ne one te go. Old Au- guste and tlie doctor could not lee.ve Paul, and lie knew weil that neo breed of thein ail at the Plats would turn eut on such a night, even if tliey were net, one and ail, mortaily scared of being mihxed up ln thie law aud jus- tice tliat would be sure te follow on thbe affair. lie must die wtlout see- lut liluor.",
         "TANNIS 0F THE FLATS 1 hold that ne woman ever did anythîig more unselfish. thatn thia deed of Tanuls's. For tIe sake of love she put under her fret the jeal- ousjy and hatred that had clamcured at her heart. She held, net onily re- venge, but the dearer joy of watch- iing by Carey te the last, in tlie hl- tew of lier hand, and slhe cat botil away that the man aIe leved mniglit draw lis dyÎlng breatî somnewlat essier. In a white womnan the deed w,%ould have been mcrely conmmend- able. In Tannis of the P'lats, with lier ancestry and tradition, it was loi ty self-sacrifice. 1V was eight o'clock wlien Tannis lef t tlie Plats; it was teu wlien sIc drew bridie before the heuse on tlie bluff. Eliner Blair was chatting wlh lier brother snd lis wife in the par- leur when the maid camne to the door. \"Pleas'mn, there 's a breed girl eut ou the verandali and she 's asking for Miss Blair.\" Elinor went eut wonderingly, fel- lowed by Tomn Blair. Taunis, whip in baud, stoed by the open door, with tIe stermy niglit behind lier, and the warm, ruby liglit ef the hall lamp showering over hier white face, and the long repe cf dreuebed bair that fell frein lier bare head. She looked wild enougli. \"Jerome Carey was shot lu a quar- rel at Joe Esquint's to-niglit,\" she said. \"Hie la dylng-be wants yen -I have corne for you. \" Elinor gave a littie cry and stead- led lierself on her brother's shoulder. \"Goed God!\" aaid Tom Blair. fIe hiad neyer approved cf Csrey's at- tentions te Eliner, but sudh news was eueugh to sbeck auybedy. \"This la horrible. But it la nonsense te talk cf my sister going te the Plats on a ulght like this. It la impossible.\" \"I came tlreugli it,\" said Taunis conteinptuously. \"Canet sIe do as irnidl for hlmi as 1 eau?\" \"Yes,\" said Elluor llrmly. \"No. Tom, den't object-I mnust go. Get iny horae--eud yeur owu' Ten minutes later three ridera gal- loped down the bluff road and took the river trait. Fortunately the wind was in their backs and the worst of the 8torin was ever. Stil], it was a wild, black ride eneugli. Tom Blair rode, cuiruing softly inter i breath. R1e id net like thie whole thing- Carey donc to deatli in sonie low hialf- breedà alack, thia hiandsomne, auillen girl eomning as his miesseniger, this niightmare ride throuigl wind and rain. It ail savoured toc mueli of meledramia, even for the northland, where people still did things lu a primaitive way. It was past twelve whcun they reaeh- ed the Flats. Taninia told Blair heeto take h horses a.nd theni led Elinor to the reoi where Carey was dying. The dector was aitting by the bedside and Nr. Joe was ciurled up in a corner, sniflling to herself. Tan- nia took bier by thie aliculder and turned lier, noneo toc genltly, out of- the reoin. The dector, understand- ing, left at once. As Tanniis ahuit tIe door she saw E,,linor Blair sink on lier kuees by th v li ed and Carey's trembling hiand go out to lier head. Tania sat do'wn on the ficer out- side cf the door and wrapped hier- self uplu an Ethawl Marie Esqinit lad dropped. lu that attitude aIe look- ed exactly like a squaw, and ail corn- ers and geers, even cld Auguste, wheo was hunting for lier, thouglit aiie was one and left hier undisturbed. She watelhed there until dawn camie ivhitely up ever the prairies and Je- romne Carey died. She knew whieu it happened by Elinor Blair's cry. Tanuis spra.ng up aud ruahed in. Shec was tue late for even a parting look. The girl took Carey's haud ln her's and turnied te the weeping Elinor with a cold dignity. \"Now go,\" she said. \"You bad hlm in life te the very last, Hie Îa mine Dow. ' \" There must bQ some arrange- ments made,\" faltered Elluor. \"My f ather and brother will maite ail the arrangements, as you cal",
         "THIE CANADIAN M.AGAZINE them,\" said Tannis steadily. \"Hle liad ne near relatives in the worid- noue at ail in Canada-lie told me S0. . . \"You inay send eut a Protestant inuiter froin tewn if yon like, but he will be buried here at the Plats and hi, grave wii be mine-ail mine. GO!\" And Elinor, reluetant, sorrowfui, yet swav'ed by a wii and an emotion stronger than her own, went elowly eut, Jeav-ing Tennis of the Plats alone with lier dead. NEW YEAR'S EVE By ARCHTIBALD) LAMPMAN YONDER tlirougli the darkness surging Gather to the drums of Fate, Ail the dreams of life couvergîng, Joy and sorrow, love and hate. Trhon canst hear the voices eailing Faintly f£rom Eternity, Rising iu the void and falling Deo canflietmini. Rolling doors are opening slowly In the ghostly lionse of Time, Witli a murmur mild and hely, To the cloudly portal climb: Trains of fates and memories bearing On a vast and sliadowy bier, Te the dim gray silence faring, One more dead and cownless year. And they lay tlie old year grimly In a great and lidless tomb, Under vaulted depths tliat dimly Only nits and stars illunie: There ne word is ever spokeuu, And no sound the silence stirs: There the ages sleep nbroken Over endicess sepiu1clres. But afar beueatli the arches Of tlie miduiglit, ontward bound, .Moves the host of Fate, and marches With a faint and spectral sound; Ail thue reainus of Time invading- OnIy lieliest eyes shail see- Farther yet and farther, fading: I\u003eeo con/itemiri.",
         "FROM CRAZY HORSE MOUNTAIN BY PASCHAL H. COGGINS D AVE r, RE stood on a big granite bowlder and watcb- ed the three miei nmake thecir way down the side of Crazy Hlorse mnountain. It was the middle of Oc- tober, and Britt \u0026 Bullard 's logging camp hiad shut down for the season. Two days ago the live stock had been led down the saine gully path by whicli the lasgt of the saw gang were deýscen1ding to the Kitson (;rade and uiltimnate civilization; McCarter, the foreman, wNas stayîng behiind to mnakeP a general inspection of the outtlt, store the tools, and leave everything tiglht against thec winter's storins. Juat where the trail twisted out of sight behind a spur of rocks to be lost for the rest of the way among the dense chapparal, the men turned and looked up. Shaw and Pickens, being without imagination, mnerely waved their bats and shouted good-bye; but .G-ol.fried, clasping his fingers about bis red, sinewy neck, kicked one foot ini the air and distorted his ugly fea- tures with a grimace so diabolical as to bring an oath to the lips of the mani on the rock. Yet the next in-. stant MeCarter lifted his axe at arm 's length above his head in an answer- ing salute, and the morning sun, strikinig its broad, bright surface, formed it for the moment into a gleaming torch. The men passed on down the moun- tain and MeCarter, slowly lowerixxg his axe, gazed musingly off to the east. But for the profile of F'rench- man's Hill, be would have caught distant sigbt of the to'wn of Ventrola wýhere, on thiat day, at the hour of iloon, ont' William Gtswas Io be publicly hanged for the crimie of miur- der. The three mien had started early that thiey xnight mniss niothing or thei spectacle. \"One hanging's as good as another, to that Dutch lamb utcer, Mc- Carter soliloquized, with Golfried 's wýriting features still ini bis ind's oye, \"but if I'd been on thiatjuy I 'd 'vo kicked like l\u003eixley 's mule against the testixnony of thiat. Graser fromn over to Volcario. Ile swore too blasted sitrong. Býut grçeat skunks!t Wbat's Ilhe sense of a man up a rniun- tain sbaking his flet at a judge, jury, and sberiff five miles dowvn th' vl ley. ', Turnîng about hie tossed,( the axe- and with it, it seemedl, aIl conc\u003eern for the fate of William Gtsityfeet away to the door of the tool-bouso. Then he set to, work, and for the neit; two hours was busy enough, Every- tbing gnawable-mattresses, bIaniketq, overaLls, gloves, and even rawbide boots-biad Vo be wire-strung fromn the rafters out of reach of chipiiuks and mîce. Thie cutting tools and long double-ended saws must bc coat- ed with hog, fat and stowed in their racks for six monthî of uselesmneas. Twenty-four bours before there band been a Ravage storni of wind and raîn. Down ini the valley it hiad unrorofed barns, uprooted trees, and bowled over fenees and telegrapb polis, but at the camp on Crazy Horse it liad done no more than rip the boards from the weatber end of the tool-",
         "THJE CANADIAN MAGAZINE bouse. M.%cCarter had to make good the, damage. It was ile h. was doing this, is eara filled with the. blow and echo of bis Laminer, that some on. spoke to himamiost at bis elbow. H.e turned to find a borueman witiu a dozen paces. The appearance of mnan and beast went far toward teiling the. s o!o their journey. Tiie heaving takoftiie tail bay mare showed tiiat sh, Lad be.» cruelly over-ridden, and tiie mari was grlpplng the. pommel of Lis saddIe to steady bie seat. He Lad bee» lost baek along \"the. rldge, \" and the. lumbernian knew froin ex- periezice what that meant. '\u003cArn .1 on the rond to-to V.»- trolal\" \"On tiie road to Ventrola? Yes, saine as yure on the. road to 'Frisco or the~ North 'Pole. You're on top of Crazy Hors. MUountain. Ventrola's ive mile for the. crow, anid six or six and a half for a mn on a live bora. by tii. Grade.\" \"But 1 mnust get tiiere soon-this miorring. Where will 1 strike the. Grade ? StiUl braelng Limself againat the, hemn of isi saddle, h. gathered Lis reins. NleCarter's face Lardened. -\"1 recoen you 're one more of the. pack that 's runnuig, ears down, r-o b. in at the deatb of that poor devil, Gates. You mliit as weil stop\u003e sweat- \"My Godi I thought it was'soine. wiiere about-about nine. My watch 's ru» down. 1 forgot I hail -a watch. I rode frorn Sacrainento--rode al night. My name's Tom Yost. Back tiiere in the. hbilas. in the dai*k tliis morning, 1 Lad to ask the way, and a~ black-hearted scoundrel put me on the, wrong road, .Sî».. theu, 1 tteil you, stranger, I ve ridden throngh liell. But I must get tiiere. I ?nust! ~They '11 hang Lb», I tell yon, and I- i'vie got is pardon. Let go the, bri- dle. Let go 1\" Again Lis v'oiee rose to a screain, but even vile h. fought to force bis spent beast to action, ail pretence of strength gave way and Lis eyes filled with tears, The. young liuberman drew him froin tii. saddle, and h. sank Lelplessly to the ground, i the Àiiade of a big pin.. McCarter brought hlm water, and loosened tiie saddie on tiie mare. \"Let me sec your paper!\" Yost drew the long envelope from the. imer pocket of his coat and, after a moment of hesltation, handed it Over. It wis addressed to the. sheriff of the, eonnty. Tearlng it open, Me.. Carter read ils words of brief com- mand-words which. threw the sov-. ereignty of a great commonwealth, as an izapenetrable shield, between the convicted mn and those who would [l'O name. s are dow», knows of t!]",
         "FROM CRAZY RORSE MOUNTAIN lem of the fleeting seconds and the inexorable ifles. In a sense, the task was not new to him. For years bic hiad been used, when somlething was to be donc, to provide-or, if neces- mary, te invent-the means for its doing. Yost watched bis face with a gradual hope dawning ini his own. P1resently McCarter thrust tlic en- velope into the bosom of his gray flan.- nel shirt, wheeled abrnptly upon the prostrate man and, stooping, graapcd him almost savagely b\u003e' the armi. \"Ocet up!1\" It was the voice of the gang boss, ,as void of sympathy as the blow of an axe, but vibrant with action. -\"Water the marc nt that troughi. Three or four swallows. Then choke ber off and einch np the saddle. Make it tiglit.\"' The final words came back as lie liftcd the lateli of thc tool-house door. For an instant the niessenger stood dazed and staring, but the knowledge that something was te bc donc vital- ized hum into action. MeCarter re- turned with a coul of rope. \"Therc's a chance left,\" lie ex- plained, while hie straightcned the rope. \"It 's cra7ier than a blind bob cat, but it s being here at ail comes su daimn close te a miracle that it puts itup tos good and liard. 1 reekon,\" lie added slowly, \"the Gov- ernor lias a riglit tc\u003e count on me, anyway-in any sort of a ruction. Lend a hand here. Hcelp me empty the watcr from this trougli.\" \"Tuesdays and Fridays,\" hie con- tinued, \"une of Wells F'argo's mail carriers rides down thic Kitson Grade from Markleeville and Silver Moun- tain. This is Frida\u003e'. The Grade us close along the farther bauk of the creek in the bcd of the canon, riglit along b\u003e' the side of our dam. I'm goiug t' fire the old trongli dowîn at hi with the paper on board. If he's within a hundred yards of the place when she maakes the trip, lie'il take notice.\" At McCarter's eomand, Yost fas- tened one end of the rope arouud the liorn and cantie of bis saddle, while the foremian was double looping and hitching the other about the big log -for the trougli was the rough-hewn trnnk of a Douglas spruce, dug ont te, serve its purpose. 'WVith a sound- ing slap on hier hauncehesi and. many shouts of encouragemevnt, McCarter drove the miare across the clearing to the mouth of tIc long chute down which the comipany 's logs werc sent to the dlam in Taggart 's Crcck, near- ly seven hundred feet bclow. When thcy had dragged the troughi well ont over Ilhe 'huxnp,\" from which a ten- Pound puish would set it on its fligîit, MeCarter unhitched tiie mare and agaiin slaekened tIe surcingle. Theni, once more, be looked at his watch. -LIe's flue to pass at anlywhere from five to flftcen minutes, and bc'll ride fast. Ile\"»l show wlien lic firet swings aronnd that quarter-cnt in thc bottom of that hill over acros the, canon. We must wait. A log bits the water froin bere in ls than tif- teen seconds b\u003e' the watch. But- ie 's the last humnan creatuire thlat'l make Ventrola before noon. Keep your eye on that noteli in the edge of tIe, hilUI And Yost, spent with wearines.q, hutnger, and the terrible dread of fail- uire, fixed hie gaze-axid witb it, it seenmed. his life--on thc point wherc thc Kitson Grade lirst struck down into thic Taggart Creek Canon. For the moment 'McCarter 's attention was lield b\u003e' the details of the mian 's appearance; thc evidences of that blind ride out along tIc ridge, Slight of stature and with delicate ekin, it was easil\u003e' dean that hie was new te bis present service. Probabi\u003e' lie ws an attaché of thc Governor's office closen for this special mission b\u003e' rea- son of the personal confidence of hie chief. His hands were seratched and bleeding, his clothing was ment and torn in a score of places, and there was an ugi\u003e' bine welt acros bis icft dlicék where the limb of a tmee lad lasbed him ini the darkness. Ilis tonue, every now aud then, was",
         "TUIE CANADIAN MAGAZINE moistening his parched and cracking lips, and hi. ferehead was gleaming with perspiration. For an instant Dav. McCarter woke te the. tact that the, man was suffering. \"There's stuif te eat and drink over in the. barracks-tiie st of the th,'ee shacks. The. deer 's unlocked.\" Yost did not look up and may flot have heard. McCarter Ieaned for- ward te test the poie of the, treugh. It wss as it should b.. A child ceuld have set it in motion. Then his vis- ion ran) idly down the, long runway of pelisiied pine. Fer a hundred and filfty teet its pitch was rather a tail thani a silope. I3elow that it swept torward i one long graceful curve and reachied the bank of the, damn al- meet on tii, level, But the, impetus of that lirst appalling pluinge! le iiad seen great pin. boles rush down that feartul path, huusing and spit- ting lire as they lPed. Sometimes h. had seen themn dsi, iiadlong and flirieus, acroos the~ surface of the dam te \"kili\" themnselves against a long outreaciiing granite rock whieh was foroyer luring thmn te combat. \"Dead Man's Rock\" the. leggers eaUl- cd it. Ilis tiioughts leaped back te the Governor's pardon and te the. man who signed it. F',w things, in bis present mood, eould se have stirred his imagination as the, uight ot that signature. Tiie mani whe wrote it had won bis officPe by a splendid fight in the. open against the great cor- poration which for years iiad domin- ated the~ political fortunes of the. commonwealth. Early li the contest the situation bil touched somne un- expected spring of sentiment in Dave ,McCarter's nature and reused hum te action. With the, zeal ef a boem flghter lie tiirew himselt, brain and body, into the, conteat. Regardless ef campaigu committees or their pro- grammes, hie canvassed pretty mucii every mining camp and logging eut- lit in bis county, sud the rough vi- gour ef bis thought sud speech toRd in the retumxiu. Tucked away some- where in hie trunk was a two-page letter ef thanks bearing the. same boRd autograph as that which new terbade the. execution of 'William Gates. But eut et that memorable caîn- paigu, now nearly six months gene by, the, young mountaincer hadi brought one bitter regret; a regret wiiich, puerile as it was ini its origmî, had proved itselt strangely persist- ent. Largely through bis own efforts, during the. closing week et that streniuous centest a grand rally in the. interests et hie canidate, was planned and held at the. tewn et Yen- trola. MUcCarter was a member et the Reception Cemittee and se would have corne into close persenal contact with the xnan who iiad ap- pealed se powerfully te, hie ewn na- ture. It was an experience entirely aside trom. any that had yet corne his way. It would have been a red- Retter day in his life. But at the last moment h.e was roh- b.d ot his triumph. Re was stricken down with a tever, and while hua hou- eured leader waq addressing the. throng which fflled the. courthouse plaza te overfiewing, McCarter was requiring the. united efforts et de.- tor and nurse te keep hlm. safe in b.d. Tii. eemiug event iiad se pos- aessed hie thoughts that in delirium, h.e ived it through ever aud over again. During bis convalescence there were periode whcu it was net easy te make him realize that the, big meeting had been held without him. Later still, when the. whip et a falling pin. tre. had put him agaiju into the hauds et the. doctor, he re- Iapaed into the. saine tevered mut- teriugs, and raved about the. rally. Indeed, Piekeus swore that the. boss atil talked et it in bis sleep, Suddeuly new his reverie was siat- tered b3ý su inarticulate cry tromn Tost. The rider had corne. YeCar- ter, turning sharply, caught but a varnshing sight et man sud herse as they disappeared behind the, long wall of rocks sud trees which. lin.d",
         "FROM CRAZY HORSE MOUNTAIN the fartber bank of Taggart's Creek. Presently-în eight or ton. minutes, at mot-the\u003e' would, pas in fl view down there beyond the dam. For a moment, Dave iMeCarter'e% fin. gers fumbied witb the buttons of hie shirt and then bis baud fell to hie (lde and be spoke with a strange mix- ture of assurance and incoberence. 4'Wben youi get back to tb' valley,\" ho said, \"tell himn-the Go'v- ernor-that it was Dave McCarter thiat you gave your papor te np on Craz\u003e' Horse. Ile '11 staro for a min- ute, but at set he'll dig mie ont of hie mcmm'r\u003e'. I was due to shako bands witb bum and warm things up for the start at the big Vonitrola meeting, but 1 weut off my head and conldn 't make it. Tell him that. This tume 1 won 't go back on hiii. It 'Il square me with bum for the other fluke. Ever\u003e' mani ii the gang says it eau 't be donc, and old Britt says a doctor told bim it wonld pull ail tbe breath ont of yonr body and smash your lung in, saine as youM' squeeze an egg. Maybe it will, but I 'ni going t' do it. Tbe other thing's ail up ini tho air. The ebump migbt take it for a joke and swing on down the Grade witbont pniling up. He'l ho hurrying to sec the hanging. I'm going te mnake good Wo-day, or go ont of business. \" Toward the last lie spoke hastil\u003e', as if fearing interruption, aud Yoet's scattered faculties were slow in grasp- ing hie meaning. Snddenly, it was olear enough. Stepping into the trougli, 'McCartor began to tip it for- ward for the fearful race. Thero was ne time for speech, but, with a or\u003e' of horror, Yost mnade a haphazard lunge aud graspod the abouldor of hie leose flannel shirt. The next in- stant, a backward swing of the fore- man 's powerf ni riglit anm had laid lim dazed and groaning upon the ground. Yet hie ver\u003e' terror mue;t have kopt Yest frein fainting, for it was but a niatter of moments before lie was again upon hie foot peering down at the dark broken miÎrror of the, dam. For a timo ho eould makc. nothing ont, but pre.4cntly he canglit might of two floating loge which further ini- spection resoIyed intio the fragments of thev old trough, 'She had Accepted] the challenge of Dead Man ',, Rock and been riven from end te end. A moment later and a portion of the big rock meparated froim the ms n took on the terin of a n» Davo Nie- Carter had 8nrvived hie fearful plunge down the mountain aide, anil an involuntary ery of victory aroso to the lips et the' watcher. 'ljitted from the depths of de.9pair, ail the inemories of hardships endured were swept away as by the paasing o! a mouintain breezoe. le cauglit the sonnd of hie own laughter. Yet, oven with the laughiter on hie ips ite look of elation was fading frein his eyes and there came the pro. monlition of a newv disaster. What demon of dola\u003e' now possessed McCar- ter 1 Seating bimecîf by tho bank of the dam the mari upon wbose fear- leas zeal hung the fate of William Gates seemed to, be snrveying his sur. roundinga with a strange surprise. Again and again Yost saw bum lift bis hand te hie bead, but not once did bis attention f ail upon the fragments of the treugli nor his gaze climb that fearful pathway b\u003e' which. as it were, hoe had juat descended from the cloude. B\u003e' that strange intuition which sometimes surpasses the pro- eeas of thought, Tost knew that lie, himacîlf, had vanisbed utter\u003e' frein MeICarter 's conscionaness. Seconds came and went and the mnan remained seated leisurely by the dam. Finaily lie stirred, but to Yost's horror, it was but te stretch hiniself at full lepngtb upon the ground and cover bis eyos with bis bauds. And at any moment the rid- er-the lest huinan being who could reach Ventrola bel ore the bonir of noon-might daah b\u003e', unseen, un- heard, and unchallenged. A panic of consternation f oU upen Tom Yost. Sunmening the sat power of hie",
         "THE~ CANADIAN MAGAZINE lungs h. shouted pitifully, his voice seemlug te die wlthin the. reacli of bis own hands. He anatched a hand- fui o! gravel and iiuried it frantically teward the, distant figure, atamping hi. fret aud choking with sobs as it rattled along thi. chute as futile as a baby's toy. But there are limita te ail human efforts, and Yost had drawn tee long aud tee deep on his everwreughit phsia pewers. The biaud whieh hiad ben gripping a rock- rooted sapllug for support slowly re- laxed lts grasp, and ail things began te waver lu bis vision and turti black. Strange things happen.d that day along tiie Kitson Grade and iu tii. little town of Ventrola. ils the. mes- longer who rode clown froni Marklee- ville and Silver Mountain was pass- ing tiie legglng dam iu Taggart 's Creek, a mani, hiaties., wild-eyed and dripping water froni every 11mb, springxng as it seem.d froni the. very loweIs of the earth, rusiied fran- tleally eut upen hlm. H. was about- ingashliecam, his rigit armu ifted high, appar.utly lu a frenzy of gIee;. but the rider eaugiit noting of bis menlug. Witii a single bound isi bors siied ixito the, midst e! the roadhlde thicket where, snortiug and treinbllng lu terrer, b. stood watch- inghistrange ausilant. Tii. rider, take whllyuuawares, was thrown heavlly from the, saddle and lay limp and motionless lu the middle of the hilhway. Wiin later his wlts came back hie remembered vaguely that the mania, had stoed ever him, stll ýhouing ad wavlug his baud. But nowneihermaxi nor horse was any- fie more grotesque than bis fellows oaused ne great commotion. For the, utost part the crowd was orderely- for the iianging was to b. according to law-but there iiad beexi some drinking, and every 110W and agaiu seme voie rose more strident and peraistent than the rest. McCarter stared lu silence, bui suddenly bie clapped hi. hand uip\u003en the shoulder o! the man lu front. \"Say, partner, I cani't stand this. Ie sput some ginger inte the pro- ce-lings. Thia is a devillali eoid re- ceptien for a winning candidate. I tell yen lie'. going to sweep the ýState frorn. Del Norte te Sauta Barbara. Vv'ie been out lu tiie minlng camps and I know what I'ni saying. Tii. people are awake-all except tuis erowd o! mutes. What's thi' matter with 'eni?\" Hi. ewu voice rose with his swell- ing indignation. Tii. mani iie was talldug to stepped beyonud the reacii ef his anm, stared a moment, and turned away. Some ene else told i te \"abaut up, \" and h. retorted by ad- vising the. speaker te crawl away be- fore it came time to kick him. Then he demanded to kuow wiiy soniebody didu 't eaUl the. meeting te order. Dave MoCarter was living through bisi part ef ehairman o! the Reception Cem- mitte, e! the. rally. Vex'y slowly it seemed to dawn up- on hlma that everybody iras waitinLe.",
         "FRO-M CRAZY HRORSE MIOUNTAIN as lifted has hat, his patience gave out. Springmng upon an unturned barrel and waving a billet of wood in lieu of a hat, hie calied aloudf for \"three cheers for our naext Gover- nor!\"' To hie wrathful amazeinent, flot ome voice followed hie own, but al arounid hiim were mutterings of an- ger and derision. Some one tilted the barrel upon which hie was stand-. ing and compelled humû te leap hast- ily te the grouind. If hie could have identillcd the cuiprit there would have been blows and a fight. As it was, hie anger hardened into a sullen determination to bend the stupid crowd to hie own wiil. Once or twice before duning the campaign hie hiad struck just such a lot of frozen jays -only there had nover býeen se many of them-aiid every time, before the meeting was over, he'd hiad themn throwing their hats i the air and yeiling like a buneh of Piutes. I-111 have you yet, damn you, ' ho muittercd. \"You've beon reading a pack of lies, and you thiuk ho 's go- ing to lose. You're afraid you'Il be ioft on the short aide. You coyotes, you! I tell you he'Ul carry the Stato as sure as God made little fishes.\" Hlie voie had nisen again and half a dozen of those about hum turned te look, and lisenod te hie tirade. When hoe stopped they forgot hum, and turned back te the group upon the platform. But soxewhere i the thick of the gathcning three men had eaught sight of the man on the bar- roi and becii fflled with sudden as- tenishment. When they had ex- changed speech with each other they shouldered thoir way te his aide. Drunk or sober, the boss must be look- ed after. One of them pulled at bis elbow. \"lMaek, how i bine blazes did you git off thi' mountai? Do yon sprout winga whenever you git full?\" It was the fae and voie of Dan Piens. McCarter recognized him, but the recognition brought only con- fusion. Piekens had always scoffed at politics as boing but a stupid vari- ation of the -sheil and thimble gae\"and had ridieuled MeCarter 's hero as a -kid-glove sint.\" What, hadl waked hnm up1 ? But things had been happening over yonder on tho platform, and nlow a filow was just finishing reading somie sort of a pro- clamation. Involunitarily Dave be- ganr to elap hie hands, but stopped sudd(enly. lHo iite-nd]ed to carry the, crowd off its feet Yet, but hie miust got a chance at thomi from thie front whlero they'd have te hevar hlmii, \"Sec here, Dan, what dIo yo' thlink of 'cmn? Ail stuffod wvith tan barki Great skunks! Whio's tii' guy in blaek 7 -The guy in b)lack,\" escorted by' two others, one at either eibow, was. slowiy advanieing te the front of the plat formi. Above 'the herad ýof thec inan iii black a atout oak beami was supported at either end byv two massive posta. Wonind closely about the eam presently to serve as an instrument of death-was a rope. MeCarter did net ses the nope, but as ho gazed,. the linos of perplexity across hie fore- hoad sud about his eyes woro aitling deep, and there wvas a gIleamr of per- spiration upon hie dirt-stained temi- pies. Then his gaze camne back fromn the piatform sud was caughit and held by the faces around him. Presently 'MeCarter found iînself lookig inte the cyea of the Ocrman, Goifriod, who was keeping neanr at hand in case of trouble. He had no- ticed the be'wiidermont iii the face of the boss. Theyv would take humn de- finiteiy i band five minutes later. But in the meantime it was a sin that hoe ahonld be aliowed to miss the show which, by some mniracle of speedý hoe hiad brought himiself five longr ileýs te sec. The couple worc several yards apant and speech was impracticabie, but speech was flot necessary. Withi MieCarter's gaze stilli upon hum, old Fritz stealthily clasped bis atiffened fingera about hie thick rcd throat, and again distorted hie features with",
         "THE CANADIÀN MAGAZINE that ugly grimace of strang-ulation. For a moment, with parted lips aind staring eyes, MeCarter stood ais mnotionilees as a figure of stone. Then a long indrawing of the breath seem- cd to rtck his body with a quiver of pain. Somiething in the recesses of bis beclouded brain was stirring to action, That gesture, those writh- ing lipýs and that terrible out-push- mng of the eyes from their soc- ket - togeýthe\u003er their picture had liglited the fuse of memory. Would it burn on, or but flare for the in- stant and go ont forever? The preacher, withdrawn from the scaffold, was knecling upon the bare grourid there te continue li silence hie supplications for the soul of the dyirtg mani. The black cap and the rope wcre in place, and there fell up- on that assemblage of rugged, white- faeed( myen that awful moment of sil- enice which seeme like the halting of tinie upon the visible brink o! death. The sheriff raised bis hand te grasp an iron lever beside one of the mas- sive poste, and somne cye were closed and moine faces turned away. Then, as if born of the toueli o! the fingers upon the cold metal, a cry rang out from the midst o! that breahîcass threng-a cry which no mnan who heard it ever forgot. It was the voice o! one !renzied by the sudden spectre o! death-of dcath which must lie on bis owu seul as mnurder, unless-unless bis brain, iu its agony of terror, could grasp a wavering, fleeting shadow of memnory. There was a moment o! chaos, out of which one mnu, frceing himsel! by force from bis fellows, staggered for- ward toward the scaffold. Hiu gray shirt was ripped open from cellar to belt and, at arrn'a lcngth above hie bare head, lie was waying a band- fui, e! crushed and dirty paper. With- out a word, lic thrust it Înto the sber- ill's outstretched band. Standing uncertain by the scaffold stepa, Dave MoCarter heard the sber- iff read the pardon aloud, and saw the prisoner withdrawn in haste from above the fatal trap. And yet, be- yond the knowlcdge that somehow lie had donc the thing which, had it been left undone-, nicant deatli, bis mind stiil groped. iii thickening duisk. Hie knces began to, tremble, and aUl the faces before him-they were not gliastly faces now-were flowing to- gether in one wavering, lieaving mass. But for somebody 's arm about his wmist lie would have dropped wheme hie stood. For a single instant bis cyes elosed and then, with a mighty rally o! brain and muscle, hie jcrked himself free, climbed bal!-way uip the scaffold steps and turned upon the crowd. \"Now, then, mien, wake up, and let yourselves go. 1 tell you lie's coin- ing through by dayliglit, and notb- ing can stop huim. The people have cauglit ou. Now, then, everybody! Thmee cheers for the bravest Gev- ernor that ever-ever--\" He was done. Hisecyclids feUl and hie body eank a shapeless mass -upon the scaffold stairs. But those about lim saw him. sinile, for the roar of a thousand answeming voices was £11l- ing bis cars aud lie wcnt eut te ten long days of fevcmcd oblivien wav- ing the bright flag o! victomy. He'd made theni do it-the chumps-he'dl made thein cheer, and uow the red blood was flowing iu their veins again, and everythiug was right.",
         "THE COUNTESS OF WALDEGRAVE Frozm the Painting hy John lloppner. Exhibited b\u003e- the Art Asýodation of Mentreal",
         "TIIE CANADIAN MAGAZINE",
         "THE \"CANAYEN\" 0F CULTURE BY BEN DEACON J ISTINIEN LYCURGàUE CHO- DAT held an immense turnip) aloft in hus riglit hand, assumling an) imnpassive posture aid hie boxes of vegetables, bis left hand reat- ing uponi the tail-piece of hie wagon and one foot atop a basket of oirnons. lie gazed rapturously at the turnip for a moment while the portly lady, wNho w-as standing just beyond the enter intrenchmenit of vegetables, iuttered somnething. Then hie spolie: \"Ali, but nmadamn, for socli a tur- nieep, eet ie net, moch,\" lie protested in a eof t, musical voice. \"Dees tur- ncep, cet is one of mos' exceptional mnert, madam.. Bet have been grow wit' mos' arteesteek care. M.Ne, Jus- tinien Lycurguo (Jhodat-wit' the qoul of an arteest-I have myself plant eet, I have water cet, 1 have watcli cet wit' mocli patience, wit' inocli care, an', madam,. the reeult! Eet is a t'ing of mecli beauty; cet ia ver' artecsteek t'ing--cet is re- presen' the art of Le Bon Dieu, an' alse of Justinien Lycurgue Chodat. The old lady shuffled along, etili mnuttering umintelligibly. The turnip was placed carefully in the back of the wagon. \"Decidedly art no longer appreciated,\" Juetinien Lycurgue Chodat rcmarkcd to him- self in Frenc~h that earried back to the Paris boulevards. '\"Canaille! They are witbout souls I Whether the medium be a turnip or the Uoly Virgin execeuted in oeus, it is the same -tbey have no appreciation; tlicy think only of their few dirty sous.\" 4--293 Readers of fiction, nowadayi.s de- mnand the \"TIluman intereet roiuch,, ajnd for this reilson T have plaeed the turnip firat. 1 would have preferred to begini by, explaining Justinien Liycurgue Chodat, but an explanation is a very drY thîng to start with. The lunx\u003e)ip appears to mne to lie the lin- nian Iierest feature, and there.fore it lias te have precedence. The explanation, however, le ne- .essary. Therefore lut us put it in right hure and get it over with. It wýas like this: The seene of thec littie tragedy of the turnip, whiehi 1 have attempted te present lnu the openlng paragra9phe, ie laid in the Boneecours market at Montreai. 1 had been hieid up by a barricade of apple barrels which hail been unloaded riglit acress the side- walk. Therefore 1 heard the enthusi- astie description of the turnip, and watchcd the sad sequel. A -habit- ant\" with osthetie features and a fine, eourtly bearing, whio looks upon the growing of a turnip as a work of art, le worth eultivating. There- fore I decided te make an effort te find eut something more about Jus- tinien Lyc vurgue Chodat, We- talked of the turnip; we talk- ed of other vegetables, and of the fine art of growing thcm. Fromi that we shifted te art in general, and te many other things. In hall an heur we were on quite intimate terme. A few days later I arrlved at the market juet as he was placing hie empty boxes in hie wagon.",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE \"Ah, eet is the m'sieur who enjoys to talk of the art!\" he exclaimed. \"Eet is for me a pleasure again to meet you, m'sieur. Voyez I 1 have to-day sol' everyt'ings. I am soon to deepart, but firs' I would take me some small refreeshment. P'raps, naybe, m'sieur would honour me.\" We passed through the water- front saloon to the back room where were little marble-topped tables. \"Ah, m'sieur, eet is the hour of absinthe!\" \"Bien ! Eef m'sieur inseests, mon brave Charles, for me eet will be an absinthe frappé, eef you would ob- r me \"mon He was ad- the way of interrogation for a moment later he was gauing gloomily into his empty glass. Charles obliged. \"Ah, m'sieur is mos' kind-as we say in our own tongue-Vous tes très aimable.\" \"M'sieur is maybe a leetle interes' in me ? Is eet not sol Ah, yes t For m'sieur has stan' among my tur- neep an' we have talk of the art of Monet, we have deescuss the futur- istes. Es eet not? Eet mus' appear to you mos' strange. For me, I am not'ings but contreemans; I sell the tur-neep. Ah, oui! Eet is so; I am habitant, me; but also I am arteest. I am what is call here one 'Cana- yen'; but me I am 'Canayen' of Cul- ture. \"M'sieur mus' know, I have not for all my life been Canadien; for part of my life I have been Pari- sien-ah, cet Par-ee Eet is for t'at, m'sieur has p'raps maybe remark, I spik not the Angleesh as do my con- frères of the marché Bonsecours. I have the French accent, eet is truc; but cet is the accent of Par-ee. P'raps naybe m'sieur has notice it, eet is strang ti me, an' also I an Quebec; I spik e, an' also I am P k.' I am jus' sin nr.npn %f anian were la",
         "THE \"CANAYEN\" OF CULTURE have desire always the beeg cit-tee. Ahi, how 1 have desire to leave be- hin' me t 'at farin an' t 'ose tur-neepl 1 have know rnoch of the cit-Ice, me ; for my father he has take the news journal from Mon 'real avry day, ail' always 1 have read about the cit-tee. Also 1 amn only leetie garconi, but 1 have already the soul of an arteest. \"One day, mn sieur, muy ratlier lie is corne ver' early for to wake mie op, but hie la not fin' me. No, 1 arn net t 'cre, me; for 1 have genle. I amn resolve te go tc\u003e Mon'real an' i the niiglit 1 have dee-part. 1 have been aware tVat mny tather hie would ebjec', se 1 have stole myseif away whilc ail the oders-my father, ny mnother, iuy brother, my seester- thcy are ail i slcep. Ah, cet is ver' sad p 'rapa for my poor father, but, mi'sieur, I arn jus' leetie garcon. 1 t'ink net of the others. I have long for the eit-tee; I go. \"M'sieur I would make of long histoire flot nioch. I have walk al t'at way te Mon'trcal, an' here 1 have obtalin me seme work. 1 have werk on xaany place in t'is cit-tee; I have do many t 'ings. Aise I have stu-dee. I have read many book. \" One place I have obtain to work for be what yen cail shcc-per. Ect la me V'at have the charge te place upon the box the naine ef t'ose te whom th.boxis tdeleever. I have for Vat umail brush an' cenk et smre mos' splendeed colour. Ah. t'lat sheeper ernployment! Eet la for me what yen cali the turu-post wit'in my lite. Ect have areuse wit'in me fat arteesteek seul. \"I have sometimes ne box te sheep, an' at t'ose time 1 have otteu employ myseif in effect smre peectures upoli the. wall ot tVat aheep-ing room. I ver' soomi deeseover, m'sieur, I have the talent. I ar n truth of a nature mos' artisteck. \" My boss he la maybe t'ink smre- thingu differen'. He'; corne ene day when I arn painting from mcmory sioe a magnifique copy et a urnail worlc of Paul Ilellu t 'at I have oh. tain troin the Rcvtue or P'ar-ce. Eet la the head et a mos' attractive P'aris- ienne, ani' the eopy upon thie wail eet is mnos' bec-utifully execute. But my employer lie is not please wit' t 'at. lu fac', m'sieur, hie is mocli unplease! Ile have say to me mos' irnpleasan' t'ings. Aise hie have deescharge mie frorn fat sheceper job. -But 1 arn neot decourager, m 'sieur. Ah, ne! 1 have resolve te be great arteest. 1 have deescover t'at 1 have the talent 1 will dcc- velope cet ! \"I ver' queek have obtain for mie ianether crnploymient, an' at onice right off 1 arn commence te stu-dee. 1 have enroil myvseif wit'in the school at niglit et the Concil of Art, 1 have there teachers ef seme mag- nifique k-now-leedge, an' 1 miake moch progress. Eet is truc t'at at the Ceunicil of the Art 1 arn compel te draw at firs' only leetle block ot wood when 1 arn meh more prefer te paint from the lite. Decidedly cet la ver' tiresorne, but cet la mos' ne- eessary for feose who would appre- hend the art. Semeones have say at one tre- 1 miyself arn know not who cet la- t'at the art, cet la9 long. Ah, m'sieur, cet la truc; alse thc art cet is mos' ungratetul. 1 myseif know fat, m'sieur, for 1, who arn of the artees- teck soul, 1 mus' bc compel te mll the tur-neep on Bonscours. \"Ect la while 1 arn yet at the scheol et night t'at 1 have becorne mos' anxious te go myuclt te Par-ce. T 'ere la some young man from Par-ce aIse at t'at Council et the Art, an' rnany turne t'ey have tel' me et t'al: Par-ce-et thc grand arteest in tVat eit-tee, et the cafés, et the studio, et the woen. Ah, thc women of Par-e 1 amn entrance, mn'sieur. 1 t'ink et Par-ce aIl the day; 1 also' dreani of Par-ce ail thc night. \" Aiso 1 arn learning te spik the French et Par-ce. The ?French et the Canadien cet la diegus' me; 1 amn ennui of Mon 'reàl. Eet la truc 1 arn",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE myseif Canadien, but 1 arn forgotten of t'at-. The Canadiens, for mie t'ey are, bêtes, I have arteesteek seul me, an' for mie Par-ee is the only place. Bien ! I arn reselve te go te t'at Par-ee. \" Eet is not ver' facile t'ing for te dIo, m'uieur. Moch mon-ee cet is nieceaire for te cross over on t 'at ocean. Te go te Par-ce cet is net like that ene should go for leetie treep at T'ronto. But I have save up ail the mon-ee t'at 1 arn able, an' eet is two year fromnthe time Iamn mnake t 'at reselve t'kit I have wit'in rny purse plaintee mnon-ce for take me te Par-ep. \"Ah, m'sieur, Wiree cet is grand! 1Tam entrance! Eet is true t'atl1am ver' moeh seek ixpon tVat boat, bot when I arn arrive I amn weil satisfy mie, An' I t'ink, m'sieur, t'at Cani- ada eet is bête,oh ver'noch. 1Jam ver' rejolce t'at 1 arn deepart from eet 'Ensuite, m 'sieur, I have take fer mnyseif amail studio in the Quartier Latin, an' I have begin te paint the real peecture. Ah, m'sieur, in t'ose (lay I have paint wit' seul! I have exceute some grand work! Eet is great meeafertune te me, m 'sieur, t'at I have after been compel te make somne fire of t'ose peeeture. Ah, t'at %vas ver' bard I Bot me, what can I Io 1 One cannet freeze! \"Ah, I was mos' hap-pce, me, at t'ait time. Eet have rejoice meos' full my arteeat seul, but aisoecet have starve my stom-ake. I have paint inoeh, but I have cat but ver' leetie. I have mon-ce, ah yes! Bot net moeh, an'% I arn compel te have some care hewecet isexpend. Eet is for t'atI1 arn net ver' eften eat the becg din- ner. I decide I will eat wit' rnoch splcndeur at the cafés of mos' exeel- ence when I have sel' some peecture. But alas, m'sieur, the peoples of the pub-Ieek, they are net appreciate. I have try wit'i ioeh energy te secure soei cotmaire. 1 have meet often wit' the touristes au' I have exhibeet te them my works, bot, even though 1 asic bot lectie price, they will net buy. Me I don't know why. Maybe p 'raps Le Bon Dieu have decide for me my life eet is net to be alone of artisteck; may- be I have what -you cail the luek of hard.ness. I don' know! Bot even t 'ose reech Americaines thcy 'have neot buy f rorn me my peecture. \" M'sieur would p 'raps t1'nk my peectures thcy were flot well cxc- cute? Ah, non! Eet is net t'at. The work of Justinicn Lycurgue Chodat ceuld nevairre be of inferior menit. Ect is jua'-well me I don' know, but Ciel! I could get ne mon-cc. \" P'raps m 'sieur could believe I arn becomc mocb decourager. Ah, yes! I arn begin te feel somnetime ver' bad. Aiso I arn semetime ver' hungry. \" An' then I arn meet wit' Mad'- lune! Ah, m 'sieur, she is at t'at time jus' leetie f air-ce. She have the face ef mnoch bee-uty, the figure charmante, the seul divine! An' right off at once Iarn fail moch inte love. Ah, how I arn love ber, t'at Mad 'lne. \"M'sieur in Par-cc there are many t'ings of cbarm. Bot for me eet is the women of Par-ce t'at have eharrn me the mos'. They are net the same like the womnen of this con- tree. Tbey are of rnecb more grace, they bave moeb more intelîce'. Tbey are chic; tbey have somet'ings t'at is net ef -this eontree. At the leas' t'at is what I bave t'ink wben I amn in Par-ce. An' Mad'line she, is more charmante thain ail the others I have meet. \" She i. modiste; she is make the dresa. True cet is mos' humble te be oceupy in, but Mad'line she is in in- telîce' moch supenior te t'ose dres. Eet is maybe strange a icetle that me, an arteest of rnecb credit have fail in love wit' jus' modiste. Bot me I don't care-I love ber; t'at is enough! \" An' for two mont' we are mos' hap-pee, Mad'line an' mie. I have",
         "THE \"CANAYEjN\" OP CULTURE ineet wit' lier avry eveninigs at the shep wbhere she Ls emptoy an' to- gether we go to tlie cafés. to the the- atres, te tire exhibition of the art. Eet is gran' timle, bot mly moni-neo eet is go ver' ras'. 1 have not eay moc10li about miy mnon-niec teý Mad1'une at tire firs'. She have t'ink xnaybe 1 sieil nyn peecture. She have ad- Mire theml ioch-; she t 'ink others hiave admire themn aise. I have try ver' liard te bide away freml mly Mad'linie t'lit I arn neot of 'a truth P'arisien. She i l erseif of 1a-e have mnake ne doubt, sire is se chic, s0 charmante. Ant' I t'ink inaybe p 'raps if ahe know t at 1 arni Canadien mle she will be dieguls'; aire will neot lenger love mie. Aýn' eut la for t'at 1 have been mnos' careful. I have inake f rem rny imagination somne parents for mnyseif in Moirniar- tre; ain' I have say t 'at 1 hiave leeve fer aIt rny lire la Par-ce, Aise I have painit splendced peecture ef et' mnan ef mnos' noble face, anl' I have tell Io ber t'at eet is portrait of rny good father in Monmiartre. \"A'Mad'line she have believe al t'at 1 arn tell te bier. 1 feel somev- tim-es ashiame me, te tell te ber al t 'ose lie when I have aise love bier se mocli. At frs'I1have tolie jus' a leetie, bot af 'er sire bave start te aslk from mie some question I arn oblige te lie meis' ail the timne. Eet rnaybe la ver' fooleesh, yen wenld say! Ah, oui! Bot mne, 1 arn yong at t'at time, an' I would be Parisien. AIse I amn afraid te lose M.ýad 'lne. After we are mat tee, I t 'iuk, 1 weùold niaybe tell her-what yen cati con'fes-bot before, ah non? If she kneow 1 arn Canadien, I would mnaybe oac lier. 1 arn afraid te take the chance. IOne niglit I have arrive at my studio, an' I arn asteniali te fin' I have bot only seexteen francs of al rny mon-ee lef'. Quelle nuit! I have stay up ail t'at niglit for try te t'ink. Bet is ne use, 1 arn net able at all te de se. I decide maybe eet la better for keel myseif. Eet la commen t'ing for yong mans te do in Par-ce, more parteecutar in thie Quartierl Latin, whcre are many of tsek seul. Yea, I fee t'at mlayNbe if I amt gemt' for lose, nry Mad 'hue tble sui- cide et ie ail t'at 1 bave tcf'. Bot after 1 have t 'ink semne more 1 have decide for Berne leetie tine te peat- pene this final pleasure et art. May- be somlethinga cet wiIl de-velope. III have t'ink I willt net tell Mad'- hine jus' at firs', bot t'ait niiglt aire have e riglit off at onceo t'at sorne- t 'inge ceet is neot quite corrcuc', Shel have ask fromi ine for wycet is i arn se Sad, si bile. Ahi I, Mad 'hule, iaeei' have say. 'BEet la t 'at I batve, enly seme few framcs lef' or ail ny mon01-ce. Now we cati ne longer go teget'ýer to thei caLf-wit' ne mon1-e hiow eau we be mari-vedi' -Bot et w'hat uise is eet te wvorryv i iny f rien111'? Mad 'lne have reply te mie. ' True, yen hlave ne mon-ee neow; bot w-e can love wit 'ut mon-ve. Youi are great artelest; you will before long seil manly peecture. Then we wili have mon-c ani' we will go again te thre cafés, te Ille thevatres. As for jus' now, qu' importe? -we will netl go, t'at la all! Il arn anstoniali, m 'sieur, I have t 'ink t'at Mad 'lne. wlio is Paris- ienneio, will be ver' angry whien slire cati neo longer go at the c.afés,. al thle theatres. 1 have t 'ink sire will thiir be ill finceali wlt' me. Aise 1 arn de- liglit! ''P'tie Age' 1 have exclaimi, an' 1 have take bier wit 'iu ry arma. ''An' t'at niit Mad'line have saiy te me(, oh. se manyv timne: 'You are grau' arteest, Justinien ; yen will sell rany peectures.' .\\l'sieur, cet la meos' strange t'ing T 'ose womans can mnake us te believe mes' anyt'îngs. 1 bave been mueos' certain eet la net possible for me te sell ry peecture, for I have try ver' liard; bot t 'at niglit 1 have returu back te rny studio wit' feelings se hap-pee I was oblige te seeng. An' because I seeng se tend the concierge be la t'ink I mueiit have mou-ee, and",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE ha have ask me for noms rent. An' t'at la make mg Iaugh, 1 amn so hap- pe.. Yes, 1 feel sure t'at night 1 will aell some peecture, an' 1 soon viii mar-ee wit' Mad'line. \"Ah, M1ad'line at t'at time was mos' charmante!I For two weeks wa hava beau wit' eaeh other avry day. W. have walk; vo have seet uipon t'ese bezieh by the. aide the. reever; we hav. con-verse on xnany t'inps. Au' v. have nover enter in the café, bot Mad'line abc vase' content, -Bot at night, viien 1 have return aiU aloeie vlt'ln My studio, I amn ver' deseuragar, 1 camiot seli my peecture, an' my few francs they are aimos' ail goe. Eet is ver ' eold ai- no, an' at l' 1amn compél to make tire of mypec e Ah, bot eet i harl 'siur Ihave cry comme petit bébê-jus' 11k. leetie enfant. \"Mlo 1 have feet ver' bad viien 1 t'ink of t'ose lie I have tol' te my Mad'line. 8h. have t'ixk I am Par- ision, an' for t'nt sh. have mos' likely t'ink t'at at the en' 1 amn mos' cer- tain te b. grand auess. At las' 1 ean ne longer stan' set; I amn resolve te confeu. \"'I1 have somathings I mua' tell te yen, my Mad'line,' 1 have uay *hen I hava meet lier t'at night, bot se have stop me. Mer face est la mos' fuit of deelight. I amn ses t'at thera in somet'ings t 'at have please bier ver' mocli. \" 'After, yen eau teit set to me, my Justiuien,' se have des-claire. 'Bot firs' 1 weuld tell somet'ings to yen. We vili seet upon the bench, my frien'. I have soins newa for tel to YOIL \"When we have seet lova s have cmee.'Justinien, mY good arn proprietaire. My good unele hae la dead, an' h. have lof' me hees ian' ini the contres. \" 'Bot yeu are Parisenne?' 1 have exelaim. \" 'l arn of Par-se jus' new for sure,' ahe have answer to me, 'bot set la flot always ne. My contres est la far avay. Ah, rny frien', you vould mooli admire t'at centres. Ini the sommer est is warm an' briglit, jus' the same lik. la Belle France. Near by the. place of my poor uncle there la leetie fores' viiere ia many leetle bird V'at fil op the. air wit' song, an' there is alsol small riviere which la mun from eut t'at fores' an' la pass jus' by the. hous. of my oncle. Ah, est la bee-utifut; eet la viiero yen would enjoy to leeve, my Juatinien. Est la the. paradeese for oes of the artisteek seul!' \"M'sieur, i Angleesh set laq no\u003et possible for me to teit te yen how Mad'line have desribe te, me t 'at entree. Ah, ah. la of mes' poetie seul! Sha have make nie desire te, go right off at once te t'at place of vhich ah. la tell me. I no longer cars about Par-e-net at t'at tirne. 1 want oniy te depart for t'at con- tres ef my Mad 'lin. \" ' Yu have deesc'ribe te me the. place for which my artiateek seul have desire,' I have excialim. 'Where then la this mos' magnifique contre.?' \" 'The home of my good oncle vlio is dead, the place where Ihave been born, this es-tate of which I arn nov preprietaire la situate at St. Adolphe de l'Ouest in the. Province de Que- bec of le C3anada,' she have reply. The. heur of absinthe muat have been waigfast. Justinien Ly- curzue gazed long aud earnestly into murmured said",
         "THIE \"CANAYEN\" 0F CULITURE friend Justinien Lycurgue Chodat, raising his glass. \"To the good healt' of mn'sieur.\" -M'sieur has p 'raps been a leetie interes' ini my eniail histoire? The feenish 1 Ah, bot mseieur, V'is the feenish-the tur-.neep, the onion, the Marché Boneecours! \"Eet is jus' one of t'ose strange t'ing tVat le Bon Dieu has effee'. St Adolphe de l'Ouest eet ie only bot a few arpents froni St. Adolphe de Petite Plaine. 'My M.Lad'line she have been born right close op beside the. place where also I have been born. 1 go to Par-ee because 1 would b. Parisien; 1 fail into love wit' Mad'hine because 1 t'ink she is Par- ieienne! Bet ie not so. Mad'line she is 'Canuck' just like nie 1 arn my- self; bot she is the saine -Mad 'lime. -M 'sieur, for avry mnans le Bon Dieu have make sonie wornan 's for hie femme. An' cet is of no use for to go to Par-ce if h. has made for you one Canadienne. \"Also, m'sieur, eet is o! no use to try to ho somet'ings o! whieh yon are not. Me 1 have make ver' hard endeavour for to ho Parisien, bot my- self 1 amn vrai (anayen--eet ie true, for I have now already sept enfant., seex fine boy, m 'sieur, an' one leetle girl, jus' like hen good mother,\"",
         "OBTAIN ERS 0F MERCY BY RICHARD BARKER SHELTON SOMEIWHTERE, nortii of Montres, Stubby Neal lost the trail. The, mla n, whom li. had once called friend, and the. woman, wvhom for those two blissful, painful, uncertain .yeairs le had cailed wife, had disap- peared as eomipletely as if the eartii had opened azid swailowed thein up. Morcover, ut the. turne lie lest ail trace of the, fugitive pair, bis ewn siender funda(l, like the trait lie iiad followed dogg.dly, bad mnelted inte nothing- Therefore, h. reluctantly turned frointhe clase, made his way back across the. border as beut h. could, and flnally staggered, half starved anid badly frost-bitten, into Melntire 's logging camp on the, Uipper Otter ivier, wiiere big Jin Me\\lntire, who kncew the, .ordid story, as did every- eue else within the. bundred-miIe radius of Corson, gave hinm a job witii bis swampers. Stubby puiled frein bis hip poeket the heavy forty-four lie iad carried during àd these heart-breaking days o!f the. pursuit, and laid it, stiil load- ed, beneath the pillew of his bunk. \"Soin. day!\" lie nrnttered te hum- selIf, bis homely face working strange- Iy. 'Soin. day.\" 1'here was grim determitation in the. words and a great, relentiesi, ter- rible patience. Tiien, crippled as h. waa by fatigue and the. frostbites, lie trok np an axe and stolidly joined the. gang of swampers- It is aaid that the big, elean, xny- sterioua woods work strange miracles in the iieart of man; that tiiey smo- 30 tiier the. tires of bis insignificant pas- sions, and by the sheer ixnmensity of their glooniy stretches tiiey mnake him afraid, asiiamed and saine. But ini Stubby Neal 's case their speli was im- potent. Grixnly, silently, looked at askance and shunned by tiie etier nen of the camip, he worked away while the wýinter days grew colder and the. mantie of snow that eloakedl tii. forest grew deeper. Each nigiit after supper, wiien the camp was given over to\u003e uncouth revels, h. sat apart on the. deacon seat, smioking stolidly, the wile hs mind was a prey to disturhing vis- ions-thie face o! a man and the. face of a woman; the. grim cliase, whieh had proved unavailing; the. bitter journey bacir froin north o! Mont- real; the. loaded revolver ini hua bunk; and always that insistent voîce that sounded in lis tired brain with its umivaried chant, \"Some day! Seme day! \" It was a cruel winter ini the. woods that year. Stermn succeeded storin until the. snow piled higii against the. caves o! the. camp; and wiien it was net snowing the. xercury of the. ther- mnometer went down and down until it seemed trying its best te crawl eut of tiie bottoin of the. bulb. The. mail camne but infrequently, and often for weeks at a turne they missed it altogether. Tt became n.eessary te pick carefully the, turnes fer going te (Jorson and hauling out the, needed supplies to the, camp. It wus the. latter part o! January, soenthing over a montii afe Stu",
         "OBTAINEES 0F MERCY by 's ar-rivai at Melnt ires', that the belattedj mxail was brouglit out fromn \u003c2orson one gray, gusty eveung, by a muai io liad beeni struggling ahl day thrioughi the great drift\u0026. Rauiicous bursts of joy greeted hlis ~arrival, als the pap)ers anld thle letters were distributed. Amiong thle latter was one for Stubby Neal. 11e look it te a far- corner, where al smoky laxnpl burned feebly, and witli tei bling tingers opelned it. 1V was enlly a few lines, written xi a Sprawhing baud and unsigned; yet it wvas sut.- fieienlt to set bis heart pounding mad- ly, sud to tigliten bis trirot .%itli a suddeni Sense of suffocation. \".Yoii will flnd them in Corson\"-it reLl'thirdl bouse fromn the store on 11w Ieft-hand side of tho street as yoti go nlorth. Three, tines lie rend the brief mis- sve, bis breath eoming fast, Lis face iwisted as if withi physical pain. Then lie sank dow-n on thie deaconi seat, has banda chaaped tiglit together, bis ey' es staring straiight ahead, oh- Ijlvous te the noise and the rougit horseplay going on all about imi) Ilours later, whexx the camp was sunk ini sleep, lie atml sat there ini the sain position. The smioky Iamip, buring above bis hiead, was the unly spot of liglit in the cold darkness; thie dee.p, even breathing of sleeping meni and hie sighing of the wind about thie eaves were the only sounde te break the oppressive atilinesa. l'le tond ticking elock at one end (i! the rougli room pointed te a few minutes before xidnight. Thle ruar- ing lire o! siabs ini the grent steve had dlied tegay@ asles. Thle icy wind rrept in througli. the crevices o! the watt sud set tlie man on the deacon seat shxveriug. At last lie arese, stumuig the let- ter inte bis pocket. Noiselessly lie tiptoed te bis bnk, drew eut the revolver, broke it open te assure him- self that eacli o! the five cliambers waa loaded, aud then thrust it into hie hip pocket. Hie pulled on a mac- kinaw coat of gay coleurs, andseet ing al leavy Capl, lie bounid the la- puis about hai oars witbi a wueleni scarf. Outaside tlle buink, whiere slept thle mani w ho had br-ouglit in the mail, was a pair ef Snlowshioes. withlio comlpuinction whatever, ltbb ook thelxu benleathi bis armr, sudl slid sl- ently through thle dour inito Ille bit- ter nliglit without. To tlle luft, leomling d11iuy iii the frosty starliglit, was ici e-ook's Sliack. Thither lie made his \\%ay\\ and puali- eýd Openl the door. lut a moment lie had made up a sinati pack of cold mneat, bacon, coffee, and liard bed 1 le took al generous liandftl et' matchles freont thle tixi pail on thEc aliel! and tlirust inte his bolt al bat- chef, whiehl lay by thle pile of? Split wVoed lut one, cerner. The wind moanied doletnîly tliroughi the tops ef the great pines. A mil- lion icyv stars burucd in «a sky of blc-tskvelvet. Far away al lynx sercamced panilyone, sud tlion the torest wàs silent. Hie kit iu tlie suow Io slip ou tlie silowslioes and te bind tble tliongs about bis ankîca; then, witli a Ilst look at tlie silent camip, lie turued bis faceý te thec east aud weut off nt al swiuging, easy stride dowu the trait towvard Corsoxi. Ail tliat nliglit aud alItIthe neit day' lie swning along in tireleas fasbion, pausing only for a liurricd mieal or te brew for hnsetf a pail ut strong black eoffee. The, miles slipped away as if by magie, Great drift aiud fallen braxnches along the trait made, it thxe bardest kind e! groing; but tlic swisli et bis snowshoes padded on ateadity; uer could the cold ner the auow uer the bardslips o! the il1- broken trait quencli tlie wild juy that bnrned withiu bis hreaat, the juy et revenge. Behind him at the camp, big Jimi MeIntire swore over the loas of bis best swamnper, ruminated deeply for a time, and then grew suddenly wor- ried.",
         "TUE CANÂDIA-N MAGAZINE When the. gray twilight siiut dewn that niglit, Stubby made camp in the snow, siept a few hours, and thon bit tiie trail again, plodding on through the darkneus witli but one thouglit in his mind-to get te, Corson as fast as hi seemingly tirelesa trengtli eould carry hlm. I)ay broke over the. for- est, cold, gray, loweri-ng. Dry flakes of snow began toasift down, but Stub- bywerely grunted and pshed on the fmer y noon the wid had risen, and the. sharp flakes, driven before it, stung bis face cruefly; but lie shut bis teetli and dre've bis a\u003cching mus- ele te their task. The snow had ceaued and the bleak day wau going eut in a yet bleaker twiliglit, when lie came te the, end of the. woods. Below hlm, across a etreteli of rolling whie, lay the, twink- on awwardy, w tb trobbing tem- ples an tind ankles. His e .ks were sunken wlth the. utrain of the past two dayu; bis eyes burned l1ke lv olui tIir mockets. \"Borne dayl Borne dayl\" sang the. imperious voice wlthin hlm. And te the monotonous chorus was now add- ed: \"Tliird bouse fiom the store on the ef t-baud aide of the street as yeu go nortb..\" Corgon in an unirnpoulng place. It in a ono-street, utraggling, lumber- region town, withi a generel store, a saloon and a few unpretentieus Stubby also, put two and two to- gether. Instantly he was on his guard. \"Halloo, Ed!\" he replied cheer- fully. \"Say,\" there was anxiety in the deputy 's voice,' say, what you doin' liere, Stubby 1\" \"Me? 7I been swftIfpif' Up te MNe- .Intire's camp. Run out of tobaccer, we did, day before yesterday, an' 1 corne down to git some. Corne on with me te the store while 1 git it, an then we'fl have a drink together, se- ciablelike. Ain 't this weather heU?1 Greminger looked at him sliarply. Stubby's perfect innocence began te allay his disquieting suspicions. \"What do you say to puttin' uj\u003e witli me to-niglit, Stubby?\" hec asl(- cd eerdially. \"Met\" $tubby laughed like a man whe liad not a care in the world. \"I1 gueuu flot-not witli that buneli wait- in' up there for their tobaccer. Idâ git my liead broke if I didn't git bac tuer. as soon as possible. There won't b. se, muoh as a crrnnb lcft arnongst 'emn by to-morrer. 1 got to, start right back to-night---eee?\" The. deputy Iooked relieved. Plain- ly Stubby was as yet ignorant regard- mng the. third boeuse frorn thie store. Together they made their way to, the came stumbling inte the street ~just as the, shrouded it in a pall, other",
         "OBTAINERS 0)F MERCY le stepped outside aud adjusted hlm snow8hoes. The deputy watched hlmn swing down the street in the di- rection of the woads. -Ge\"! 1 w.as, sorie oneasy wlien I sec hiim comi' ,\" he confessed ta, a maxn at his elbow. -~Tliought prob ly lie knew they was back here.\" Stubby held the trait toward the woods until the town was wett ho- hixid hlm. Then ha turned ta the leit, skirted the edge of the forcat aud entered Corsan again at the Cther side. le took off hlm sxiowshaes, and discarding Ilis pac~k, tossed it into a nearby drif t. Silentty, cautiously, keepi.ng always lu the deeper sha dows, ho once more made bis way along the istreet toward the third bouse from the store. He reaclied it unseen. Liglits gtim- n-iered in tie windows;- a oxiri of smoke poured tram the smail chim- ney. Stubby's teeth closed with a click. Hlm eyes were suddeuly cold and bard, 11ke sornie boast af prey as it closes with its quarry. The bload, which had been pounding lu bis tem- ple@, guddenly grew quiet. Hlm nerves wore aa tense as steel springa. Him imcad ail at once became as elear as the ioy air lie breathed. Deliberately lie pulled the guui tram bis blp pocket, and advanced up thc path toward the front door. He had just set foot upon the. stes, when witbiu the haus. there arooe a uudden commotion. A chair vs iipset; thore was a throaty curse. .A voice, cboked with~ fsar, began pleadimg inarticulatsly. Thers was a sbarp report-a single, bigb-pitch- ed\u0026piercing scream. With a madly beating heart, Stnh- lby put bis siiouider ta the door and burst it open. The bouse was orninoxiàlv quiet. lI crouched by the table. And there by tire red-hot stove, a vivid crimmson streain making its uneven course from the temple, lay the maxi Stubby had pîetured mnaxy, mnany timnes a* lying lu just that sickening, liuddled fashion. The womnan did nat loak- up; 84i did not seemn aware af Stubby's pre.A ee thiere. She lookeýd stupidly at the glisteninig, smnoking thing lu bier hand. It seerned ta faseinat. lier. ''lc beat mie!\" she began repeat- ing eliildlshly. \"le heat mle! lT. heat ine!\" And yet again, \"le heat mre! Hie heat me!\" Stubby 's breatli camne li a great claklig gasp. Ile looked at the quliv- erig woman, crouched tliere hy the table. And as he looked, ha saw not the twisted, contorted feature.s, the. staring eyes, Uic bine, haIt -openod lips. Instead lie seemed ta see a laughing, innocent face-a face that looked into bis owu with love and trust and gentis propliecy, eveii asq it had looked athim intedays xiow dead torever. Outaside h. cauglit thc murmur ot excited voices aud the saund of run- uing footsqteps. PIsinly that abat liad roused the loungers lu the. saloon nearhy. H. sprang forward and snatcbcd the revolver from the. vo- maxi's nervetessa fingers. The footsteps sounded nearer- they vere comlug up the pat. Through thc open front door he could hear the. runners' laboured breathlug. He turned on bis heel, sud istill clutcblug Uic revolver, lie walked calmly into the tiny hall. There on Uic stops stood ?Ed Grenu- luger, isi eyes wido sud his face tvltching queorly. He glanced at the gum lu Stubby's. band sud tried ta, speak; but viien finally ho sme- ceeded, bis volice vas siiarp sud bro- ken with emotion. v«o! as ail ho could may. And again, breathlessly, \"God, Stubby!\" Stubby looked the. other straight lu the oye. H. even smiled. \"Well, 've got him, Ed,\" e said.",
         "CHARTIN BY MARGARET M. RAWLINS HCAUTIN. I want Chartin,\" irisisted the little voice im- perioiusy. Chris turned retess1y on hiii pilb lowg. Raising hiinself on his elbow, lie Ieaned iu the direction o! a rigid lady who sat ou the edge of a chair by flie lire. \"D)on't yout kniow Chiartin?\" hoe demanded, a world of puizzled wonder iri bis toue. \"Wliy, everybody knows il. Fetdli Katy. She knowa it.\" At the uuexpected mention o! that namte, Aunt HIelen-for she was surit to Chris-tbis severe pie\"e o! womnan- hlood almost jumiped in lier seat, and very nearly blushed, which was a thiing ahie niever did, exeept for the failings o! others. Buit the well-starched, \"reliable\" lnurse interposed. ',That's not the wa.y to speak to youir aunt, Master Cliris. Now keep youir arma in the bed, and] lie quiet like a good boy.\" Chins eur-led hiniself into a serni- cirele and allowe(. the woman to straighten bis rumnpled bedelothes. \"But 1 want it, \" lie persisted, with a littie tremble of the lower lip. \"And 1 waut Katy, too,\" hie added alter a mornent's pause. \"Yes, Katy, too' fie repeated the words witli grow- ing satisfaction lu bis voiee, as if tliey solved a problern that had long baffied lii. childsh understandiug. But Aunt Helen rose hastily. She did uot even %vait to give him the peck that passed muster for a kiss, but with a sidelonig glanco at the lot, fiuisled littie face upon the pîllow, slie escaped fromn the roomn. Having been made feel. uneornfort- able hersel!, she determîned to, seek compensation for it by causing sorne- one else the sarne sensation. For this sIc souglit lier brother, Cliris 's father, whose lousdbold sIc hiad mnanaged this six inonths now-that is to say, ever since thc unaccouintable split beý twcen the latter and lis irresponsible young wi!e. As Helen entered, Gordon Corbett was lounginig with bis feet haif across tIe hearth, and bis golf clubs beside liim, smoking a hast cigarette before setting out for an afternoon on the links. Hie was a fair, wholesorne type of Engliali manhood, and Helen in lier less acid moments was not unlilce him. 'Well T\" he rernarked teutatively. I ' don't know wliat you will elect to do, I arn sure, \" aIe announeed, and a subtle exultation in lier mnu- ner added, -\"I arn goiug to, put you in a difficulty, and I 've made up rny mind be! oreliand to disapprove o! any linie you take.\" She proceeded witli deliberation, eyeing lier victim. between hlh-shut lids the wliile. \",Dr. Morris bas expressly forbid- den Christoplier's being allowed to fret or excite himschf over anytbing, in bis present feverisli state it is most dangerous. \"",
         "MHARTIN - Well, whats' the kiddy fretting about, thenf?\" -Apparently it is sone ridiculous Ilhing blis mlother tsuight busi, liq, calis it chartin. lIeý will isst that Katy kno\u003e wS it. Really' , he oughit to be correct«] , speaking of lus eiders in sueih fal 1 bar termos. * An embharrassed look cae nto Corbett's face at miention or his wife 's niante. Ile saw wvhithecr H1elen i's re- marks were tending, and beganj Io bliister. - (an 't you wiomni lfid out what it is lie wants since he 's so set on itf Or take his attention off on toso- thing eisc. Good heavens I buy hinm a shopful of toyB, but don 't cornet peu- tering nie on inyv only free ttfteru-ooni ini the, whoie blessed we,\" le jerked out an elbow irritably ndbrought the bag of golf-stick.s riittling to the floor. Hlen watelied him grab tim up again before an- nibilating his somewliat trite sug- gestion. \"Christopher bias hiad two -whole ceupib,'mrdsful of toys on the floor by bis bed,\" she said. \"le wants noue of tbieim.\" \"Weil, eau 't you sing to him, or play with him, or somnethinigi\" \"I have no time; besides, bilidrenl get on my nerves. \" There was such finality in bier toules that hie for-bore any further bluta as to bier actions, and turned witli great- er anrnoyanee upon a third party. \"What's the nurse for, then? Cian't she amuse hlm? Doesn 't shc know what lis mother used to play ai with him?1\" iJelen atiffened visibly. \"You forget,\" she said with freez- ing dignîty, \"that when 1 took over the management of thia househlod 1 dismisscd ail thc servants engaged by is former mistress. Ford] knoivs nothing of Kathejnc's way with Christopher. \" There waa a significant silence. \"Then you want mie to send for bis mother ? \"Indeed, 1 neyer suggested suel a thin. I erev teli you what the dotrsaid lu case youi wisb to takte a1ny initiative abouit il. It resta, 1i-11 tirely- with you.\" So saying she left the rnoîn, salis- fied tlint she was cerof resporisi- bility, for 1Helen Corbieit, thouigh ;1 nariirow, ceusorjus woma, wits fnot withouit ail scec of a siort. Thougi slie didf iot clarqe for- or urider- stand children, Sueo dliq not wishl aliv liarmr to corne tg) lier npwbuit she' wsfar fil wishing thie re-cail of» liermuhdspovdo altra. iaw. Left to himouif, Gordout CorbetI re fleeteil Iwillie stroiled ilnpdgita.. tiVely towards file window, bis bands in il poekets. and Iooked nt ai. the0 erlsp, wintry sunahinie brighteniige file London square, hlde1 is brow eleared. -\"Hang if ail! he lq ezclainied. - Neil always waa a false alalrmIaIt. A kiddyv of four wvitb ese is sure if) b)( But iat was iiuoluded l i a t - - sides\" hie prcferred flot to tbink of~, aInd hurricd off to the goif-linka al thei more quickly thiat bis conscience was; riot quite at reaýt. When hie returnedl Iate in Il affIer- noon the door flew open before leq could feed for a iachey was. Hlen who admitiedl liiiinis cager- IV. \"Gordon, wbat did you do?\"' she aake-d wih unusuial abjsen(-( of pre- amble. - dno idea it was so uirgient,\" le stammeired lamèily. -I lefi it to think abouit. Is be w'orae?\" \" There was a change about tea- lime, so 1 fetehied Dr. Morris. Ili- thinka you better send for- Katy,\"- She disotsa lIiih worthy physieian bsd spoken blis opinion iM no nieasured terme,. had iu fact or- dered ber to scud at once for, te child 's miother. but ber brother saw that shc was thoroughly frightened. and lier alarm communieatcd itself to hlm. \"Ring up ber aunt 's. H1aveý you?\" ' M.",
         "THE CÂNADIÀN MAGAZINE '\"I've doue it. They're expected home to-mnorrow middle day.\" He made sure that a vire would be lianded his vite immnediately on her arrivai and despatched the mes- %age. [t would be Sunday afternooni before lie wouid b. able te reacli the house ini Kensington. Thon lie re- turned te his atudy and sat down te J3oth young, and neithor very for- ~bearing, sue and le lad been taken witli eaeh othor, and lad entered Caily into niatrimony smre five years ago. It adl't been qute a succeus. he efeced bt t ad't beenàaa mai.r, nolther lad le been alto- gethor so ill-uaed as lie lad at lit thought. Six monthu ot Helen lad opened his eye. te several good points Îu Katy's character, and if the lat- ter's demands lad occasionally been iraional, loi lit-hearted compsny ness he could flot lielp hoping te fInd lier eacl evening as he, came hiome. And now alie vas coming; sle would answer his surumons. If onlv it would restore lier ta him lie couid b. alimait willing te lose Gliria, and lie neyer realized how muei lie trea- sured Cliria til lie lest Katy. Sa lie thouglit on and on, murren- dering hiffleif to reflectious, for lie vas of those proud, strong-willed na- tuires wlio refuse te let their minds dweli upen the unsatisfactory perieda of their lite, but the image of Raty once admitted vas not ta bo worsted. l3onny, chestnut-liaired Katyl If lie liad refused to think ef lier, sle had lier revenge nov, Hie reealled lier hiappy, lie recalled bier tearfui, quaintly serious, tantalizingly gay, in a passion et anger, sweetly penitent, or a vision of matlierheed, hugging thie child. She took posesin of lis lioart and set itis dlierds vibrating as many a day she lad sot the nursery edhoing wlien sle romped and played witl Cliris. HIe thouglit ot lier se mudli from this moment tii! the. time she arrived on the bleak Sunday atternoon tol- ieving that lie toit almost self-cen. scious as lie vent te meet lier in the hll.i le toit as thougli ele must seo \"I've been thinking ot you\" written ýthan tliey )r opeued la .iat lie miglit who aeparate ci 't improve but lie 5ev rsened. Just as o'ver, but 306",
         "CHARTIN step, evldently waiting to ascend. -Tou got my wirel\" aaked Cor- bet \u0026ni-iously. That seemed te reassure lier. She nodded, stretched out a baud to hlm with an impulsive gesture; lier eyes smliled. Then, witliout a word spo- k-eu, she follewed Helen up the stairs. Cerbett waited te give a few in- structions to the servants, then li. tee, followred iu their wake. On tie landirug lie picked up a handkerehief and put it lu hi8 pocket. \" Katy always dropped th ings, \" he reflected witii a smile. Seftly lie moneted the second flight te the. nurseries. Iu the flrst one lie found his wife's outdoer wraps th-rown loosely on the table-mumptu- oua fui,,, big black beaver, the ex- quisitely eut ceat and tiny gloves. lie lingered by them just for the, joy of touching them. How lie had missed ber 1 Re feit it nov as we realize bc\u003ew great a pain has been in the. re- action of relief. His fingers eneoun- tered the, flufty surfac. ef the. beaver. How ber hair had glowed and nestled unidej ita sweeping brim! But the~ sound of Ohis', voie drew him no furtiier, and lie erept to tlie niglit nursery deer. Katy's back vas to hlmn as aie knelt buside the. bed, fr4t Citris via in bis mother's anus and sh. vas siuothering hlm with kiuau. It se.med the child would fail asleep so, but the. baby voice, veary but triumphant, broke the. sil- ence. \"«Katy, say 'Obartin.' \" Corb.tt glanced from is vife te his aiter eagerly. Katy beuitated a moment. \"Oh, yes, 1 remember. Put your banda together, darling' Cliri preused his littie bot palina toehramidst Kty's trilla and laces, ad ahe tip-toedovr to the -lse ber owu iiauds a et be- bind tie ciild'a back. Then ber voice nose clear and tender, \"ur Fatier, wbleb art in Heaven' \"Mlartin Heaven,\" the cbildish tonesl eblmed iu. Wheu the. prayer was ended Cliris raised ene sleepy eye ever hie mo1- Ilier's alieulder and Iooked at Uleoit standing by the. fire. \"That 's Chartinh. imurmnured drowaily, and put hiii head dlowni agalu and feuleep Theugli ah. hadl enly just coinw off a long and tedious journey, Kat% wvould net relinquish lier place b\u003e' Chris. Such tea as she had was (t ou a tray beside lier, and she reachied for it witii eue band. Iler theuglits not unnraturally ran back over the. past six months, but a dleep) coutentrnent, plus a little be(- wild.rmeut, took poheson et lier as, eh.e realized sh. was one more nt berne. Ilow could sh. ever have lefi it vam wliat se asked hersel!? Wiiat a wicked vite and mether ah. had been! Gordon had been cold, aud biard, sud seif-rigliteous with lier, but ah. permitted liersell ne sucli excuses nov. Instead, ah. vent to the. etheî' extreme, aud did net allow for lier aunt's maligu influence lu the imat- ter-ier aunt, vho had dlspproved ef ber marriage from the. fint. If lier petulant anger against lier bus- band bad net found a ready and willing listener, subtly videuing the. breaeb sud suggeating retaliatlng moves, it vas more than probable tbat Katy vould hÎave kissed sud forgiven that Iast time, as ah. bad doue a dozen time. befere, But nov ahe remembened noue of tiiese details. She ouly knew that she had been iniserable durng the. wiiele six mouths' aupposed pleasur- ing. Tii. love of iusamnd and child, outraged by ber deBertion, bad risen up and reut ber heart witii longing. Siie bad arrayed pride sud a vbil wiat ah, iad moat dreaded vas ber hugbad'a cld, es, fae. For a long time one thogit had iad pow- er te steelbe backward-loekn Iieart. \"HIe let me gowitbeut avwr llke a servant givlng notice,\" sie voald. mu-rmur, \"b. doe.n't eare.- S. abe watched eut ber happy vigl,",
         "TIllE CANADIAN MAGAZINE the nurse mioving noiseleesly in and ont et times. After a long absence flie womein stole in and touehed lier on the shoulder. \"The masîter saye you're to go down for smre supper, muni.I'1 mtay up liere.\" Kety glanced et Cliris sleeping peaeefully on hie pillows. She was Trore tha.n hiaif reluctent to go down. A formeal mieel with lier huisbend and sister-in-Iew, ech one of the thrce of themn watching the other two, she lied no mind for, and] she must not betray lierseof before the time. She wae relîeved to id Hlelen ab- sent wlien she reeclied the dining- roomn, and the supper table looked in- viting after ber scenty teu. Corbett inade sme ccrnfused apologies for. H1elen'. having retired to bed ea ' ly; liedismised thecmaid wioecamneto wait on tliem, and tie two set down alone. With an aceess of colour Katy lie- came aware that she lied taken the end of the table as in former days, but as a wbole it was a very silent nival. Luckily sie fonnd herseif really liungry, whieh dispensed with the need of immediate conversation beyond \"May 1 pais yon so and se,\" \"Let me give you another slice of thie,\"1 etc. Sie kept lier attention severely to the entables, thougli she feit thet lier liusbaxxd made only e pretence of eut- ing and was watehing lier ail the lime. At lest ehe eould evoid bis gaze no longer. She pushed lier plate away. \"Oh, there,\"1 ehe said, with a shy half-laugh, \"I always was a huge eater. You see, I haven 't improved a scrap. \" \"No, you have not changed, Katy,\" lie said 8lowly. Something made hie voice quer and deep. I1e lied left his place at the table; she, too, was standing. \"And yýot?\" ehe said breathlees],y. -l have flot clianged either.\" \"Ah!\" She drew a long, sobbing breath. Ife lied takçen up his position on~ tlic hearth-rug, and littie mtore than his side face was to lier no-w. Hie saw that she lied mistaken hie meaning, but just for a second lie would flot undffeceive her. H1e turned round and looked ut lier, so lovelly in her sulent distress. \"I always loved you,\" lie said at lest, each word coming very slowly. lIe held out hie armes to lier. -11; hiaven 't altered. You won't leeve us again, Chris and me?\" fIe would have kissed lier, but lier eyes stayed him. This was no chuld- wife, but a woman witli a heert. awake. \"Gordon, are you sure you want me?\" \" Tt hurte when you aek that, Katy. But yes, my darling, yee. 7 She clung to him now, lifting up lier face for his kisses. \"Tt needn 't do,\" ehie whispered very softly. \"Put your liead down and l'Il tell you a secret. 1 never got any wire about anything, but when -we got back to Englend I juet came etraiglit home.\"",
         "BOV CLEANING PANS From the Painting by John Rus-lU. Exhibited by th, Canadian NationaI Exhitie",
         "TUE CANADIAN MAGAZINE",
         "BYGONE DAYS IN TORONTO BY MRS. W. FORYSTH- GRANT SKETCH I -COLLEGE STRE ET AND ITS TRANSFORMATION IN looking at and paasing through the great, busy thoroughf are of Cullege Street, one eau scarcely realize the changes wbich have taken place in one 's 0wn recollection. My father (John Beverley Robinson) lived, after bis marriage te Miss Hla- germnai, in what was then known as St. George's Square, iu one ot sev- eral tali gray houses with Frenchi windows on the grouud fluer, base- ment kitchens, aud sinall gardons: green shatters, of course. 'Why it was called '\"Sqluare\" 1 neyer knew. The bouses were in Beverley Street un the corner ef Grange Road, ant in consequence looked eut ou the then lovely gardens, lawns, and tries of The Grange, w-herein resided Mr. and iMrs. Williamn Boulton, son uf the Huxitourable D'Arcy Boulten, who marrieti my grantifather's sister, 'Miss Robinson; William Boulten bing a ftrst cousin of my father's. A fter the birth of my elder brother (the priment Sir John Beverley Robinson, uf New York) my father decideti te get a littie home in \"the country,\" and settleti ou a most loeuly site for a cottage in \"College Avenue\" The ravine, which ia still partly te bc mien near the University, rau down througli the site, behlnd Caer Howefll te Adelaide Strict, near thu Upper Canada Cullege. It was cross- ed by a white weoden bridge, be- tween what la now MeCaul Street anti the gate of xny father's place. Bnahthis bridge flowed a stream, crystal chear, riaing in Mlue land ou Wellh's Ilill, and when it reacbeti our fence rau inte a large pond matie witb deep, slielving banks, tormning a tiny island, which waa a gmet pisygrounti for us chidren. Brick- work wss arrangeti as a waterfall, uver wvhich flic creek, as we called it, rau in foamning glee, andi throu\u003cli the deep ravine, wlth titre. Iovely littie rustic bridge, eovcred witb wild grapevine. My tather had a regular beti made iu the creek, of cobblî- atones andj brilht-colouredl pebbles. Trhe lieuse was a perfect, bunga- low,. with a deP-1 veraudah, drap- cd with vilti grapevine, the per- fume of whicli waa delhlcleus, anti houeyl-suckle. it çvai en thei wide plateau on the north side of the ra- vine, with a broati gravel mweep in frout, and a splendid spruce trie, tapering, lu the mniddli-, surruunded by a grass ring, At thte soutli was a lawun sluping te thei ravine, with superb elm. blrch, and pine trees. On titi east site et titi house was au oelard et apple, plum. aud pear tries; on the sidi ot the hli in front ut tite verandali was a linge bet et briglit floeirs and bops, underneath whlcli, hollowed out et tit i ll. wa8 a '«root-house,\" and also lu whieit were kept smre liegùeads ot wine. At the far eut of the eurving lawu was a big mmr- merhituse, anti, Ieoking uit seeniet l1ke a very' large p lace. Te elmi trees on either side et t he stream, over thei",
         "TRE CAJNADIAN MAGAZINE dear little fountain in the centre of the *\"hoUaw)%%,' on al reckery, made perfect Gothie arceles, and the hli on tiie 8euthwest aide had also big pixie. and beeches. The fece, inost- ly hidden byv a shrubh.ry of ever- greens, was the bounidary-liu. of the Toronto Cricket Club's fieid. We ail had favourit. hales iu the feuce tiiroughi which te view the. absorb- ingly intereatiug gaines. W. kniew cricket well, 88s my father waa a fam- our erieketer, and ail eidren in tiiose da.ya were tauglit the. game. Ou the. other aide of the. soutii fence on the bill was a charming wood of tickiy-planted forest trees, and w. had a siall locked gate, by whieh we got out when going down te sec our great-uncle, Mr. William Robinson, who lived ini the whiite brick houae (ecupied for mnaxy years now by Mr. -Justice Nlaelennian. Betweeu bis houa. and the littie gate were two hbouses, one the residence of '.%r. George Jarvis, wbo afterwards mov- ed toOttawa; the other a school kept by al Mr. Abrebail, a name doubtiess familiar te mauy of tiie eider men ef tliis day. I cati remeui'ber noth- ing of the. sehool or achoolmaster b... yonid the. fact that xuy two brothera went tiiere; and netbing of Mr. Jar- via 's except a \" aoeking beat \" of dark green wood and leather, iu which we eidren were aiiowed te play on the výeraudah. Theýse bouses were on wiiat is Murray Street now. On the. narth aide of our home, wiiich was known far and near as \u003c'Sleepy Hollow,\" was a long yard reacbing eaat as far as the large bouses close ta the Con- servatory o! Music, of L-sbape, in whisui were ceai and wood shieds, stablea for cows and herses, ceachi bouse and haruesa-roorn, witii ciiicken bouses, and arnall slied for a 'Shet- land pouy, and large room in wiiich lived the coacliman and bis wife. There waa, of course, a laundry, tee. The. housei tuel! was a large bunga- low, with a long hall, openiug hli way iuto a larger space, wbure stood the. great bail steve fer the. loge, witb a huge copper barrel on top for bot water (I have it now). The draw- ing-room iiad French wÎudows open- ing an the verandali (four of them), and was cold in winter, even with the. two firepiace, but charming at ether seasons. The rooma must bave been ail of good size fromn the bulky furniture used then, and wiiici weuld b. o!ý no service whatever in these day. o! amati roams and passages. The. eilars were merely stamped earth with loose board floors, and large wooden beamas, wiiich were found perfectly sound after soa many years' service, wbien tii. aid houa. was pulled down te mnake way for thiepresenit Techuiical Sehool. A large fild withii rees was on the. east aide, tee, reaching ta Queen Street Avenue, and I eati reinember Sir Edxaund Osier liaving a pretty cottage wiiere, 1 imagine, thec Conservatory o! Music stands nowv. MiNlr. Osier had a pony carniage wbich we chidren admired greatly, \"Sleepy Iiaiiow\" was a typioSi gentlemian 's berne o! that day, but tee, far away frem lic cityl In the. Queen 's Park waa a lunatie aaylumi on the. east aide, about where the. road runs in front Grovesnor Street, a gray stone building with barred windows, and ofteu we used to stand and gaze with awe to catch a glinipse a! the. lumates. New and tiien one would escape and wander iute the. cool, green grounds o! \"Sieepy Iollow.\" 1 caui remenber being mucii frigiitened at one aild mani, wbo walked luta the. drawiug- rooni frein the, verandab, bolding an enermoua braneb o! a tree, full e! teaves, and, waving it about, began te disclajim, whil, I watclied hum, fals- ciuated, frein. the. piano steol. 1 flnaliy edged te the. deer and found someone, wiie put the. old fellow eut. Only eue building besides the Uni- versity itseif was te be seen, the. oid Medical Celiege, wbenc, issued grue- soin, tales o! the. dissecting-reom. A broad board waik led dliagonally acreas thi. park fromn the. Uuiversity« , and thia was bright with the studense",
         "BYGONE DAYS IN TrO[ONTO F7r!m an old pJhotograpA IENTRANCE TO VONGE STREET \u003cOR COLLEGE\u003e AVEM E, TOIRONTo At the timi \"f whicb Mr, Granýt w'r;tm~ tlehiLltha \u003eM rci knomon à% tCoilk\u003cz Sttt mi-, -~ 4-wn ;ri thý photogrph, a parklik. trvwy~ hde co-ry.- N- iw a -r.tn int'1,, d0,' Tephotograph \u003ehoix, College Aenne. Iooking from Yonge Stroet. The prv .\u0026 rhAf U, tha iatyo Tor,-to, ..d it waa ued for- light tiraffi, in, thi da, ti-e. Th, g.tai. smlrthni' ti.trn.wr dod at night. The Iodçe wa., .1-ilmla ti thaue gcnerajly. -etný ir th, .'tua I.. SITb(e a, ma, K,ý wsnt paYait-. ani cr an -' tl ingla track -v-y haIf ho-n",
         "THE CANADIAN MNAGAZINE iu tlowing gowna and caps, aud stalk- iing along witb dignity was Dr. Me- Caul, the l\u003eresident, always in black, snjowy\u003e white front, and stock plenti fully beý-apriikled with snuf, whlch wais a popular foriki of tokacco, sud alwsys hianging fri his coat- tai poket asilk bandana hiandker- \u003cchif. Ilewss a great frieud and ad- mirer of mny iiother's, aud very mus- ica; ie oi.poedsome sacred sougs dediosted to er and would often sit down te the. piano and sing miost sweetly Moore. 's limiortaI inelodies, and Jiked to, accompauy miy mother whoes êie sang at concerts Riven iin !orzuerly buit and oe- late Colonel Cuinber- Simcoe, we dr-ove up late at night te the Queen Street gate, only te id it locked, aud after vainly trylng te get the lodge-keeper,' a Mrs. Fitz- patrick, widow of a coacliman iu my Grandfather Hagerman 's f amily (and who, wheui alteratiens werc to be arraruged for lu the building, abso- lutely refused to be put out, aud was ailowed te reniain on for a long time) te open for us, we ail had to walk the. other way. There was only oue policeman lu the Avenue and Park, H-Iornibrook by naine, who liv- cd iu the western College Avenue lodge; his girth was enermous, aud I remember gazing at his black beit aud wouderinig how long it was. The. Park iras a resort for loafers ef every description, aud Herulbrook was very good te us children, neyer chiding us if w. walked and ran ou the grass, strlctly against erders, aud we, of course, presumcd on his good nature. Hormibroek iras a weil-known char. acter, and sunimer aud wiuter lus burly ferni, clad lu the. loni. old- â1hi puîuung atT inouth, dolug handkerchiefs ie large house, blie Library, v msa, the drai e. aixtv feet",
         "A FUNERAL AT NIGHT -pitable people, with guests galore in- ~vited to stay for the simple early clin- ner, and \"higli tea,\" then al feature ~of Toronto life. Miss Clara Perkius was one of the belles hiere, and she had the niost won- derful long hair, which was worn ini coils of lovely plaits. Fred Perkins, the eldeat son, was a magnificent akater, and. remembering his feats of skill, as 1 çvatched the performance of the Montrent professional skater last winter, 1 saw littie to elhoose be- tween thora. The fRTnily werv striek- en with consumlption, and isolation or disinfection bigknown litIelf or thouglit of ini those (lah ' v. i(-sn, then the daughter, then the mrothier, theni Iwo othier sons were stike lowri. leavung thle father, Nwho died solle few years aigo, and onq, son, who stili lives. Tbese deligbtful reminisvence, will be ntinuedl in thé P.bruarv Nuxnbér. A FUNERAL AT NIGHT By ARTHUR L.. PH1ELPIS LA'ST nliglt 1 stoode On Forest 1h11i, Rlalf-way abOve tile slee(pinig towil, Aud watched go by in bout restraunt Old folk and youug, and pale and brown. And somne searce raised their head at ail, Anld somie were weeping as they went, And others walked apart somewhat, Wondering at Death's strange sacrameut. Tire priest clasped bauds about tiie Cross, Holding it high for God'. sweet grâce; Moon glinting-s feUl on Crobs and hands And glorified the. prayung face. 1 heard tic wind stir ini the wood; I aaw the stars; and music hushed Came from the. brook--low- music, fit To play when sundered hearts are crushed. It seemed so strange that ail of it Could b. a part of Life; and yet The whole of Death's hard mystery' : My iread was bowed, nry eyes were wet. They passed me, people, priest, and dead. And olimbed beueath thre stars, the. bUt, A solemun, reverent, uilent band, With their strange duty to fulfil.",
         "THE WIZARD 0F DOMINION POLITICS B3Y GRATTON O'LEARY A SKETCH OF THE HONOURABL.E ROBERT ROGERS, MINISTER 0F PUBLIC WORKS FOR CANADA D WN at Ottawa these days the question oftenest asked is, Haeyuseen Rogerst It used te bc, Ilave yen seen Sir Wilfrid? No niatter what yen as an individual, or as a deputation, inay wish the Gev- erninent te do, it is advisable always te sec the strong man of the Cabinet. It wasSir Wilfrid in hisday. To- day it la \"Bob\" Rogers--the wizard of Dominion polities. Then who la tis man Rogers, this wizard whose magie hand is felt in every big un- dertaklng of the Governinent any- where frein Halifax te Dawson? He is a weIl-groemed, medium-sized man, juat entering hie fiftieth year. His hair la steel gray, Iikewise his mous- tache. He has keen, penetrating eyca ihat look at yen sharply from beneath ieavy black eyebrews, Mildness and iiffability of manner are two ef his chief characteristies, and lie lias the faculty of. making yen think that in yourself ini particular he lias a sincere perseniai interest. And in nine cases out of ton that sincere persona] iu- tereat la jinat what he dees have. For ne matter what his enemios may say of hlm, Bob Rogers is unswervingly loyaito hisfrienda. But back of al his milduess and courteous manner there la a power and dogged doter- mination that mnust prevail. For ho la the saine Bob Rogers who at the. age of twenty-two went ont againat 316 the Honourable Thomas Greenway fer the Mountaîn seat in the Mani- toba Legisiature, and was defeated, He is the same Bob Rogers who, six years later, tried his hand as a con- didate for the saine Legisiature, and was defeated. He la the saine Bob. Rogers who, in 1896, came out under the banner of Sir Charles Tupper on the ill-fated Remedial Bill, and, was defeated. Throe turnes and eut, meat mnen wauld say. But flot se with Bob. Rogers. And here we prove the met- tle of thie mani. Again, iii 1899, lie stood for eleetion te the Manitoba Legislature-the fourth turne as a candidate for Parliament. And lie steod well. Ho triuniphed. Hiseolc- tien marks the beginning of a career of tremendous political. power, net only in the limited field of Manitoba, where lie rernained for thirteen years, but in the great Foderal aphere, where, ever sinee hie eall to the Bor- den Cabinet, following the upheaval of 1911, hie strength has boon aeknow- ledged alike by friond and foe. The Renourable Robert Rogers came into the. Borden Cabinet natur- ally as LMinister of the Interior. But althougi lie was a Westerner, with the Western tradition as likely te hold him to that portfolio, ho seon suc- ceeded the Honourable Mfr. Monk in the stlll more important position of Minister of Publie Works.",
         "THE WIZARD 0F DOMINION POLITICS It is a far cry fromn the head of the Governmnent'a great public under. takings to the four walla of a gen- .eral store at Clearwater, Manitoba, where as a young man Mr, Rogers began lus miercantile career. And it ia a far greater cry back to the bare- foot boy who used to kick the dust ln the littie village of Lakefield, in the county of Argenteuil, Quebee. It waa iu Argenteuil that Robert Rogers wua boru, a son of thc late George Rogers, wlio was Sir John Abbot's right-hand min lu is poltical cam- paigna in the constituency thiat now seuda the Hlonourable George Il. Per- ley te Parliamient. The older villagers of Lakeview do not seemn to remember anythlng par- t icuilarly striking about young Rogers. Tet Sir John Abliot seemai to have tliought a lot of hlm. He thouglit so much of hinm that hoe advisedl hinm to ~go west wlien lie was but seventeen years old. The young man took the advlce, and, iu 1881, \"tit the trail\" for the nine million acres of land known as 'Manitoba. Hie hit the trail indeed, for it was four years before Donald A. Smnithi (Now Lord Stratti- .eoua) drove the ast spike lu the Canadian Pacifie Railway. The West at that tlime gloried lu ail its pice- turesque seml-barbarity, cliafing at the persistent yoke of approaching .elvilizatlon, careless of the fact that the buffalo wua being slauglitered by the hIdians and unserupulous wbltels at the rate of 160,000 a yoar. Whien Mr. Rogers waa cailed to the Federal arena by M.ýr. Borden and -put in control of the important De- partinent of the Interior, there were mauy within and without the party% -wlio expressed grave doubts as to has fituesa for the position. A few mnontha later those within the party were -swearing by him, while those without ~were sweariug at him, botti sure slgue that lie had \"made good.\" When -the Honourable F. D. Mionk resign- -ed the portfolio of Public 'Worka, 31r. Rogers was chosen as his succeasor, ,and thus after one yoar in Federal politics, lie found hiinseif holding what is perliaps the mnost responsiblo position lu the Governiment. Mlr. Rogers le not only referred te as the \"wizard of Canadian poli- tics,\"' lie is juat as often designatedi the \"mystery of the Governinenit.\"' Turne and again la the question ask- ed, \"Wliere doe-8 'Bob' Rogers get his powert\" Various aniswers have been given, but none lias ever full *y explained the secret of his iarvelloius auccess. As a type iu the Hloua. of (Jommous h.e stands atone. 11e la as, different iu temperamnent fromn Premn- ier Borden as it is possible for two linnan beingg to be, sud lie la utterly unlike any other miember of the (':il- inet or front-bencher on the Oppos)ýi- t ion aide. In Canadian Parliamientary hiatoryv ail the grcat leaders were weil tiu lu oratory. Mlaedonald, Tuppier, Mc kenzie, Blake, B3rown, Thompaon, Cartier. were al] formidable ilu de- bate, while lu the present Parliaiment L.aurier, Borden, Foater, and MIeiglien -periapa the fouir moat sucesaffl mien on the floor of tli. Hlouse-r, orators of a higli ordor. Wili thesee men lu debate Mir, Rogers would not attemrpt to comlpete. For lie, m1akeas ne claim Io oratory, and apparently let lias no prof ouud knowledge of British constltutional hlstory. Iu thla respect lie ia not unlike the latie Charles Stewart Parnell, who, ai. thoughi spendlng tIe gzreater part of is remarkable career in the cause of Irish self..government, kuew abeolute- ly nothing of the e-arly hiatory of Ire- lmnd. and, aecording te the testimou v of T. P. O'Connor. lie never kuew or wanted to knowv of the treasuresý of Englila literature. MNr. Rogers le not a lawyer, and lie makea no profession of knowing the subtleties of law. Ilut last session, when the intrieate clos- ure bill was introduiced, it was at once credited te the M.\\inister of Pub- lie Works, and bitterly was it. terni- ed the -Rogers gag.\" Wliat la it. thon, it may well lie asked, tlat gives the mnu his powerl Wlierein doe",
         "THE CiNADIAN MAGAZINE bis p.eciliar ability lie? The keenest observers are unable te produce the correct answer. 'Whatever the secret oft his sueceus, and whatever depths of character lie may peases that men are unable to fathotn, hie bas at least tbree traits that are outstanding and urniuistakable te tbose who know him -a knowledg. of men, fearlessness, and loyalty. It is tlis knowledge of mn and human nature that makes hlm the. greateat political. erganizer in theo country and the pepular idol ef bis party in the House ef Coem- mono. He i. conceded te be the most as4tute political observer in Parlia- ment, wlth tihe exception ef Sir 'Wil- f ridi Laurier, and this unerrlng poli- ticaliInstinct in itsl makes hilm a power in the couneiis ef hi. party. Otwardly eaim iu tiie heart of bat- tisias the. proverbial mil-pend, ho le fearlesnes peoiid With the wheie wr\u003eath of the. Opposition direct- edat hs hed, hreansin hissen absolutely unpertunbod, acceptiug hard kno\u003ccks as part of the gaine of politie, Hlm most bitter enemies con- ced. hlm the. virtue ef being a geod fighter. Loyalty la, perhaps, bis predornin- ant oliaraeteristio. He la loyal te MNaitba, heis lyal tthe West i i. loyal te Canada and tho Empire, hie la loyal te the Censervative party in ill report or good, and, best of ail, lie Îs unwaveringly loyal te isi friends. In his prosperity, his influ- ence and his power, hie has iieyer for- gotton the friends of his humble yuth. Mrinister of the Crown, ad- viser te 1-is Majesty, and strong man of the Borden \u003cJabiiuet, hie remains% \"eune of the boys\"-the saine \"Bob\" Rogers of the old days when he- had te work hard in the struggle for a livelihood. Te rend sorne press reports, oe-e would alixeit get the impression that the -Mlnister of Publie Workrs is a dark-visaged, low-brow who haunts the corridors of the Parliament Buildings, with a knite encealed lu hi. beot, roady te assassinate unsus- pooting Liborais. In reality M[r. Rog- ers la a very mild-nxannered mnan: and, unliko inost rosi fighiters, is minus the square lower jaw of Ro- bort W. Chambers heroes. Ho la por- sonally very pepular with many ef the Libersis. If ho has any great taults, they are faults commnen te the. turnes iu which hoeIlves. Over hi. claim te statesmianship mon miay dis- agro.. But there i. ne reoom te argue- that hie la an able administrator and net desorviug ef hi. title--\u003c'The Wizard ef Dominion Politicq. \"",
         "THE WIZARD OF DOMINION POLITICS TbcHonuaI ROIb-t otgrMi~r~f Pub % orks în th,~ B.rdrn tabInet",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE",
         "CANADA'S NEW PARCEL-POST BY GEORGE W. AUSTEN EVERY clams of the community has a direct interest in a cheap parcel-post, jiist as everyone has an interest ini cheap postage for letters. Business men miay stand to derive larger beniefits fromn ecap par-. cet transportation--cheaper by far ini short distances than express carrnage -than the workingman or the farni- er, but the mass of city householders and the rural population have a stake in the parcel-post qluite independent of their relation te the merchantq. The parel-post should, if its purpose carrne. true, be the most direct eut possible at the high cost of living. Biy helping to eliminate the middle- men, and their rake-off, and by pro- moting direct dicaling between the producer and consumer of foodstuffs, the parcel-po.t should be an effeetive regulator of prices. The UJnited States parcei-post. whieh has been the model for the Canadian systeni, was started on New Year's Day, 1913. Ils success was in- atantaneous. In January the num- ber of parcels mailed was 38,000,000. In April it was 60,000.000. In Sep- tember it was near 80,000,000. The people awoke to the extraordinary value of the new utillty, aud the ser- vice went froni one suceess to, an- other. The profit of the systemn for the firat year is approximately, $30.- (M0.000, aliowiug that the rates and service may be made much more fav- ourable without impairing the finan- cial status of the enterprise. There àu eertainly no reason for tbinking that the Canadian systeni Will be less sucevsful, proportionate- ,y, thlax the United States systen. The rates wilI be similar. ,x 1)pr es rates in the two ceuntries are about equai. The buyinig habits aud trad- ing opportunities of the two peoples are ailîost, identical. Even apart from the enormnous saving in trans- portationi cogs effected by a cheap parcel-post, nnd the extension of ser- vice it affords, the splendid gain te the people la shownl by the fact that the postal systemn reaches the hum- blest hazulet and trading-post in the eountry. There are nearly 14,000 poot-effice.3 in canada te which the parcel-post service will extend, white the numnber of express-served cern- munities la about 4,000, The rural route mail delivery will carry a cheap parcel system te the gate-poqt of scores of thousands of farm-houses. The eity departinent store will have new aceess te the country trade, and the farmers a chesap and direct sys- lemi of uelling smail lota of produce to city consumera without goingz te inaket or paying prohibitive toila te express comipanies. la not this an alluring picture? It msy be asked, Wby bas snch a publie utility been so long in eoming? Iu Britain, in (3ermany, in France, in Bîelgiuni, even ini China, there is cheap carniage for parcels. 'Why are Canada sud the IUited States so be- hîndhand? Anaweriug for the T'nit- ed States. when he was Poatmaster- (leneral, John Wanamaker told aru Engliah visiter that there were four reasens-the American Express Cern-",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE pany, the. Adams Express Company, the. Weils-Fargo Express Company, and the. National Express Company, Thisa reply has become historie. In Canada we have tiiree purely Cana- dian express coinpmnles, the. Domin-. ion, the. Canadian, and the. Canadian Nortiieriu, ail owned iiy the. thr.e Iead- ing railways, and it la not certain that Canadian delay la in nowise connected witii them. But penliaps the mout probable explanationii l that until a few years ago the, Canadian postal service ended ecd year ln a defloit, and it was feared a parcel-post would eznlarge it, ratier tian prove an extraordiuary source of revenue. Peniiapa it was a desire to increase the, postal income tha¶ led the. Postal Department to charge, for se many years, uixteen cents a pound, or a cent an ounce, for fourth-claas mat- ter, conslsting of gcneral merchan- dise, At first tiionglt, this appears to be almoat a prhbitory rate for any but the smals parcels. A pound was the. average welght. But for the. yesr ended March 318t, 1912, there vere, aceordlng to postal estimates, 8,385,000 parccls carried tirougi the Canadian mails. As far as it went, thie pare traffic waa an immense m\u003cney..maker for the Government. The, present United States rates are sad to b. far igiier than the cost of the. service. The. piling up of a $30, 000,000 surplus secins ample proof of this. If w. apply the, present United States rates te the Canadian traffic, fer purposes of comparison with the. cent-au-ounu. rate, we shall get a good idea of wiat a saving over the old rates will be made by the new parcel-poat. Tii. following table shows the difference: N?1ew Farcel-post. )nto te- 1-1b. 05 12 Old Rate. ... .. . 16 3 Ibs. .07 .17 .28 .36 ,5 Ibs. .09 .27 .4 .60 Winnipeg ........... .16 .48 .80 Vancouver .......... .16 .48 .80 The. injustice of the, old achedul. la sihown by the. fact that whereas under it, a pound parcel goiug ten miles bears a charge of 8ixteen cents, a po -id parcel can b. sent te Great i,' tin, New Zealand, or Newfeuud. l a for twelve cents. It la ne won- de that the. old rates have been con- sic], ed proiiibitory, and the. sendlng of more than eight million pareels lu a year, lu spite ef it, proof positive of the. dire need ef referm,. The, weiglit limit for fourth-claa matter in Canada lias been five pounds. Tii. weight limit under the ucw parcel-post wiil, at first, b. eleveai pounds. Tii. United States started with the. .leveu..pound limit over the whole systein, but after six mentis, the. Postmastr-Genral decided that the. Department could undertake a twenty-pound limît within the. first twe delivery zones-tiat la te say, within 150 miles fromn the, peint of posting. Inasmuei as tiree-fourtiis ef the. traffic is witiiin the, 15O-nile limit, this vas regarded as a big con. cession. In time the, parcel-post will carry 100-pound parcels. When the weigiit limits in force in European ceuiitries are considered, it iu fouud tiiat boti the, United States and Can- ada have been makiug quit. modest starts. Beliuni carrnes 132 pounds. G.rxuauy carnies 110 pounda,. China. lias a twenty-two-pouind limit. But it\u003e ia well te get the, organization wonlclug tiioroughly before taklug on the deliv.. cry and handling et great parcels. At present, the. differene,. of charge ou the. parcels exceeding twenty pounde weuld probably be ini fayour of the express companles. Even on a ten-pound parcel. the. express rate for a long distance is only slightly",
         "CANADA'S NEW PARCEIJ-POST Expre5s Rates. From Toronto t.-- 11lb. 5 Iba. 10 lbs. Hamilton .....*.*..\"«..25 .25 .10 Montreal ......1. ...25 .40 .45 Winnipeg ......... 30 .75 1.0 vaneelIver . .,... . .30 .80 1.35 Pare-post. Hamilton ........ .05 .09 .14 lKontreal .,..... .07 .27 .52 Winnipeg ......... .10 .46 .91 Vancouver ........12 .60 1.2-0 Tlk inilg into account the treniend- sus saving of the. new rates over both the. old parcel rates and the. express rates, is it Dlot logicai te conclude that the. Canadian people will roug. th.rnselves te thorough appreciation of the. new systemf In the United States retail merchants are getting rid ot a large part of their delivery .utfits. They deliver by parcel..posi. snd, using the. collect-on-deIivery ser- vice now attached te it,, they collect by the. me system. A C..1). sys- tom wiii net, however, b. attached Io the. Caniadian service until it la weil under way. There are morne ratiier marked dif- terences between the. Canadian par- eel-peut and the Arnerican. lier. the. Provincial boundaries are so welI pro- portioncd tiiat a zone can b. made of eseli Province, the. Maritime Pro- vinces, wiie are mncii smaller than the, Westerly Provinces, being censid- ered as one, Tii. Canadian zones wili tb.retore b. the, Maritime Provinces as one, Quebe., Outario, Manitoba. Sa.qkatchewsn, Alberta, and British Celumibia. Tiie United States De-. partaient teuud it nesar to block off nearly 5,000 unit. eacb compris- ing 1,200 square miles, and tiien group tii... into zones of 50, 150, 300. 600, 900, 1,200, 1,800, and over 1,800 miles, with special rates for eseli zone. This has resulted in a ratiier .ompli.aited system, but as it vas found n.eeenary te base the rates up-. on a mileage standard, it b.d to b. donc. O-ver eountries o! viat ares lik. the. United States snd Canada. the. short-bau! parcel eannot be n- dnIy burdened by lme on the carniage s! the, long-liant parcel. Eaeli must bear s somewhat proportionste part o! tic. cost of transportation. Thé. rates fer tii, Catnadian Provincial zones vill, of course, b. graduated a between on. Province sud another in suci a way that broadly tiie aver-. age mileage cati b. taken into accout. This will remilt, ef course, in s far higiier charge, for eseii mile, between near-by peints in two adjoining Pro-. vinces than frorn two pointe in the, saine Provinces mnucii fa er awsy. The. fiat rate principle here inumt oh- tain te that citent. liut itla is ii. possible te graduate charges on any uindLacrlrninating mathemnatical berna. The. Provincial boundary delirnitation for zones is inueii the. eaisiest sud most satistactory division of the Do- innon. Spesking in tii. Rouse o! Commons nt the last sesion o! Parliarnent, Hlonourable Mfr. Pelletier, the Post- mast.r-General, ststed that be thougiit the. Canadian service ouglit te provide for a special rate for local delivery, flxed at about s tweutY-nile radius. This weuld, heouRrt, serve to protect the country cealrs f rom undue competition froin mail-order hou.., and department stores. Tuas. much as vithin a Province, tiiero vill b. standard rates, s speciai local rate would ssem te b. nec.nary. It vould net seem oquitable te char ge as rnucii for local delivery in Toronto ns te send tiie sarne pareel to F~ort William. As three-fourths o! the. parcel-post businens viii b. witiiin 150-mile dis- tances, a specially 1ev rate vould have great advantages. It ongiit te encourage, particularly what the. par- cel..post aimas at, the, farmner te send by post into the. city eggs, drensed fowl, dairy products, sud nuy Cther commedities o! food, When tiie weight limit is raised from eleven peunds te twenty peunds, the, tven. ty..rile limit arrangement, if carried tlirough, vill b. doubled in valu. And tii. farmer siiould profit as rnucb by getting pareels quit. as iiandily !rom bis market tovu. Tu the. rural districts. the, particu-",
         "TUE CANADI\u0026N MAGAZINE lar gainera from a pareel-poat wil b. the farmers on the. rural mail de- llvery routes. Tliex, are now about 63/)00 boxes in use. About 27,185 miles of route are travefled daily; 2,525 miles tri-weekly; 410 miles aemi-weekly, aud 200 miles four times a week. The extension of the rural service hms been going ahead very fast, aud wlth a eheap parcel-poat, an added imnpetus to thie novement will b. féit. In the United States, where there are about 75,000 post-offices, over two million miles o! rural routes are travelled every day. One of the clii.! gainera from postal improve- ments in ail cases lia been the f armi- er gettlng his daily mail at hii. door. It wlll b. no different iu Canada. It iuay b. aàked, \"Wliat effeet will the new pareel-poat have on the Cana- dian express eompanies 7 \" The Unit- ed States coenpanies found tlieir smmll pareel business dropped twenty-five per cent. Mach of tlie vastly increas- epareel-post mail was newly created busines B3ut even if tlie Canadian expres companies loue some business. tliey are finaneially well able to stand it. Tlie Dominion Express Company \u003cCanadian Pacifie Bailway). the Canadian Express Comnpany (Grand Trunk Railway), and the Canadian Nortliern Express Company (Cana- dian Nortiieru Railway), made aver- age net earnings, for the year enid- ing June 30th, 1912, o! twenty-tliree per cent. on their capitalization. The foilowing coniparison shows their position: Capital- Net ization. revenue. Expres ...$2,000,000 Epes.... 1,705,200 Northeril Express . ... 1,000,000 p~er ct. of net. $645,288 31.4 283,281 16.8 192,496 19.2 Out of a total o! $10,994,418, gross receipts froin operation, the raiîways got $4,892,242 for express priviteges. On top of that, the express companies paid ont lu operating expenses, sucb os wages, equipment, buildings, taxes, $4,880.120. The net for the year, even after the railways liad taken about forty-six per cent. of the gro-a reeipts, and ail other expenses were written off, was $1,163,007, or prae- tieaily twenty-flve per cent. The. American sud Canadian ex- press and freiglit rates are, broadly speaking, about the sanie, so that a comparison between the relative dif- ference of express aud freiglit chargea in the Ujnited States sud in foreign countries will b. iuteresting. Ratio of express charge per ton, to freîght charge. Ulnited State........16. to 1 Argentine .ý.............3.2 to 1 Austria.,............... 5 toi1 Belglim........ *.........o te 1 Denmark................ 6.3 to i France.................. 7.2 to 1 Gerinany................ 3.8 to 1 Hungary................ 3.9 to 1 Netherlands..............3.6 to 1 Prensas................. 5 toi1 It is, therefore, not mueh wonder that the United States pareel-post eould cut rates away below the ex- press charges, sud still make a hand-. some profit. It lias been shown that on the small pareels, after the firat pound sud its arbitrary rate have been disposed of, the. rate cliarged la f rom six to eight times the. coat o! tlie service, Up to a distance o! 200 miles. A large reduetion xnay there- fore lie looked for iu the. Canadian rates, a!ter the parcel-poat shail have become firmly established, sud the profit ou the. operation has been elear- ly ascertained. There do.. flot seeni to bie room for doulit about the value o! the benefits te be cou! erred on Osuadian people by the new postal venture.",
         "ALL IN THE GAME BY OWEN KIL.DARE A 8long as his wife was alive Pave Pearsali wasn 't mnucli different fronm anybody elsc. fIe worked steadily at his trade of stone-cutting aud ini the evenings couldn 't get hiome soon eneugh te ait by bis fireside-whicb was an oil. steve in this csse-with bis wife sud ba\u003cby. After the wife died, though, Pave got bis simter to keep house for him and littie Wilbur, bis son. Then thirnga becamne different. Thie truth is, the sister was a little tee fanciful for Pave, sud iised te make what-nots sud otber thinga out of empty soap- boxes, Tee many cosy-corners are liable te drive a man frein home, sud so Pave got geing round the ward. It wasu 't more than a couple of years when Dave gave up cutting atone and began tending bar for NMike Flanagan, who tIen had the say iu the ward for bis party. In a few more years Flanagan went te the bad, got defeated several turnes sud was drepped from the eecutive corn- mittee. So wheu Pave saw bei, things stoed witb F¶anagan, be b.- gan puiling a few wirea, feeling hlm- self able tebe aleader. 0f course, it took menthsansd years te de aUl tIi. sud ail that time the son, little Wilbur, was growing up. Weil, Dave get te be leader of the ward, sud the minute that be was sure of being the Big Noise in the district le eut leese frem ail saloon connections and essayed tIc geutie- rnanly rôle. Weil, sir, by thc turne the son get to be about twcuty, the old man'd been leader so long that lie wouldn't lanve swapped with the. Czar ef Rus- sia so far as the steadines of the job was coucerued. Aud then Pave got te breakiug WVilbur te reguflar werk. The Kid badn't been mucîie te seheel rouind thc ward. Pave sent him up te board ing-sce ioohs and arad- c nîevs, aud when lie came back borne for good ail the people in the district turued out te feait their eyes. And it was worth it ! In these days dlown our way when a young fellow was dressed up, he lad ou a pair ef skin-tigbts that kept him standing np ail the turne fer fear somnething'd bappen sbould lie tzry Io uit down. Thien, a pea-jacket, a fried.egg sky-pieee. sud a ceiluloid collar, with a purple uecktie, sud noue o' the Sadies could resust him. But wben Wilbur PearRail showed tup it was ail up in the air with Fourth Ward fashieus, sud thc f cI- lews weut to lhock their war-paint for whatever thc uncles would give. Wilbur was kept round the ward, was enroiled a member ef the organ- ization, introdned te everybody, and uscd te trot aloug with tbe old man. Rie did this up tiil electien, wheu lie dropped bis tirst vote, after whieb le disappeared agaiu. Twe years later lie came home, transforrned by a Prince Albert. Sornetirnes bie even wore a silk bat. Iu thc meautime, thc old mn had moved inte a steop-bouse frein the old tenernent shack, which lic lad beught long ago, sud eue dlay there-",
         "TIIE CANADIAN MAGAZINE vas s little shingle stuck in the. par- leur vlndow, withi \"Wilbur Pearsall, Attorney-at-law,\" on it. And thon vo got wlse te the. proposition. Aliuest before ho had hia àiiingle eut, lie was made a member of the. law comnilttoo ef the. erganization, and the. Up vent round that if you vere iu for something smail, robbery, aecood-stoey work, or manslaughtor, you bsd te have Wilbur Pearsail in court for yen or ciao go up. Aîter a ile i practice got so big he'd only take firat-elasa murder cases and defend the, street-car cempany froim the. unjust claims of an indlacrimin- ating snd unrascuable public. 01\u003c1 Dave certainly vas ambitions for the. boy, H.e thought there vas nothing lik. him in the. vend. And the. boy vas ne feol. He had the, education and the. glad rasS, and the. first thing vo knev hoe waa right in ameng the. avel voter.. Tii. vay the. Kid vas frsming np the. gaine thos. sw.ls nover theught it ossblethat bis aneutor had evor turbanc. and pig'a-knuckie fe lnc\u003ch at Mike Planagan's. And ne wonder, for the. flit thing h. dld vas te chiange bis name from \"Wlbur Pearsail\" te \"W. Westmeath Poar- «Il.»P Evorything looked lovely, sud old Dav. vas seoing picturea of the. Kid poiis, with Bourke Cockran pining avay on the st bench lu the. rear o' tho hall. And, no use o' talking, the. Kid cortainly vas ail te the mustard nt the, talkfoats. Ho could sling Ian- wlno te bh.At the, hard~ nd had escapes or an ordinance for botter tenexuents; and that, frein the stand- peint ef practical polities, was almeat criminal. Tbey warned him, but viion h.e didn't stop aud vont aft.r the Crov 's Nest, a row of tenemients belonging to Ab. Goldman, who was \u003eway up axneng the. mighty, then vo could all hear somethiug drop. Old Dave wrote, \"Son Wilbnr, corne and se. me,\" and Son 'Wilbur beat it as quick down-town as hies benzine buggy would let him. I was mighty coe. to Day. at that turne, being a sort of private secre. tary vithout the. vriting, and 1 vas up lu the. club viien the. Kid valtzed lu te meet the. father. \"'What's the mattor with youi- asic. Dav.. \"Has that up-town air made you daffy? There ain't a day 1 don't hear about sonie nov feolish- nesa o' your'n. What'seating youi?\" The Kid gocs off on a long speech about the rigiits ef his constituent\u0026 sud the pl.dges hoe made. Tii. old mnu stqpped him. with~ \"Nov, listen te me, I been lu poli- Uics long enough te know viiat's good fer us. I put yen viiere yen are and I can put yen devu, tee. Yen get t. learu that ve ain't lu this busines for our iiealti. I\u003ern tee old te eut atone, and, 1 thiuk, vithout me, you'd b. a rnlgity bum, lavyer. I gave yen the chance ot your lifetime, sud if yen do vhat yeu're teld te do youre liale te go te the. United States Sen- ate, and, maybe, te the. White House But if yen dou't get rid e' them. daffy notions the. Party'l1 leok after yen, sud thoy nover lot up. \" \" But I oan't go back on my prom.- lacs sud pledges, \" said the Kid. \"Dou't ho childisb,\" said Da. \"If tbere's a fool that believes iu piedges h.e ought te get atuck. You got noting te de vith that. When vou're lu Dellties von izot to do what",
         "AIL IN THE GAME have a fool for a son. you got two months until election. That's enough te make good in, and if you don 't- voll, you know the consequences.\" The Kid didn't go back haif as faat as he'd corne down. The. son of a politician, he speemed to get his lik-- ing for the gaine by inheritance. But bis education made hlmi wisli for gen- tlemnanly polies-as if sucb a thing eouild bu. Geiltlernanily and ward polies is the saine stuiff with differ-. ent labels-that 's all. From what 1 learnied after, l'in sure if the Kid's nieller had been alive thon be'd neyer gone wrong. But lier. he was, adli- ing to sk aoxnebody's advice aud too suspicious to trust anybody in poli- tics, thinking ail wore crooks, iu whiei, of course, lie vas dead wrong -yeq. So he started in todo hs duty as the old mnan sair it. As 1 vas saying, bis conistituents were mostly a dead sveUl bunchithat lived aceording bo tbe fashion, and jusl then it was the fashion for theni te niake their sisIens and aunits be- liev. they were *the real things in polieis. They lad notblng but mas- meetings that were 11k. regular les- parties, with the Ovendolines aud (Iladyses splitting their dainty gloves every lime Arcblbald went te lb, bat totel 1.1 hern hem bad they were in generul and bow the. country onglit te b. run. And they all tood pat for W. Westmeath Pearsall, son of the Honourable David Pear8afl, lte of Fianagan's gin-mill. Wben it Gaine eleclion day thbv vte always absent, as they eouldn ;t make any nuey in their business ou that day and veut out of town lbe ulght befoe te bit thoe ittl 1111alls over fields aud ditcbes, or to junip over a eouple o' fences and miiont \"Iaila-lee-lee\" or smre sncb nonsense. Bu1t they ail regislered faithfully, even if lbey thouglit il more import- ant to be at lb, Country Clubi on elec- lion day insl.ad of voting. The Kid was neit to Ibis habit. and used it, but there were a few hitebes. For instance: Mr. Hilton De Renisallaer. a Watt Street banker, ne- siding on Fif lb Avenue, vas chai. Iengod by ani opposite watcher, who 11hougi1t ILaM looked a litiho plony for a capitaliat. When they took hlmi Io Ille station-hbuse, the capitalise~ was hitting everybody for a ehewN% o* tobacco and asking thein te itiformn Barney Flynn, of the Bowery, thht his friend, Spike. vas in trouble. The thing worked ail riglit other- vise, and tle Kid carried the dlis- t rict. In a day or two, those svells heard hbm they d boen voting in sweaters and overalls, and most o' themn laugh- ed but a few o' theni got dead more. Before lb. Kid could gel ahead o' thieni and stail thecm, they merc down to lie district attorney and raising a fiue row. The Kid w-as arrested and put under ten tboumand bond. The bail mas put up and w. hbouglit thal'd close the gaine. But ht ias made au issue; they tnied hiim befone an unfriendly judgé sud th. Kid mus sentenced to one yean and a fiue of one thousaud dollars. Then. was smre talk of an appeal, but the evidence mas too elear. So, lu tle morning, the. Kid ment over te the. Island. That ulght I mair Dav. aI thb. cuh. \"I vas looking fer you,\" b. says. \"Igol a tougi job before nie, aud I vaut you te help nie.\" Wbat d'you think b. mas going le dot lie bad sold everythiug and waa going to psy back all lie lad got- ten by-ob, by the vay of practical poities. Ho Èad w-rilten hlm resigna- lion frein lhe organization. \"And now m. nihrongli,\" he mald, and grabbed niy hand. \"And you pronisme me flot t e t anybody know niy whereabouits. \" I mas comnpletely laken off my feet Meore I could say auylhlng. \"But loir about the. Kid 1\" 1 final- ly gasped, sud It mas as if I lad bit hlm. H. tnmbled int a chair sud cried as I never sav a in-or a womna-cry before.",
         "TE OANADLAN MAGAZINE *'Mly bey,\" h. xnumbled te him- self. \"My boy-what a father vo beon te him! Net satisfled with giv- ing hlmi a crook for a father, 1 had to mû.k him one, too.\" \"But you're net ail througli with pohitiu?\" \"Polities?\" hie shouted. \"I pray 1 'd neyer liad anything te de with that devilisli gamo. 1 only hope that 1 ain 't tee old te b. honoat. And if l'in isparod until my son cernes home, l'Il spend ail the. rest o' m i\u003e'1f. to atone and te win hi. forgiveness. Good-night. \" I nover heard from him until ton monthz lator, just when the. Kid's time was up. Then Dave wrote to ine te moot him, I didu 't waste a minute, but chas-. ed down te the. Twenty-sixth Street dock, where the. boat frem the Island cornes i. Dave was thore, and lie looked 11k. a difforent man. Ail the awell tegs were gene. Hie looked. strong and ashealthy as ayoung fol- low, and whenl1looked at his hands 1 began te smeil a rat. \"'How 'a stoeocutting nowadays 1\" 1Iasked. \"How d'you find eutt\" hoe said and Iaughed. Then lie started i about the Kid, whethor h. would forgive him and whether ho would speak te him, un- til the. boat landed. Ahead of almoat everybody, the. Kid was coming down the. plank. Hie didn 't hurry mnucli, but came up slow and put ont his hand te me. \"l'in glad yen came down te meet me, it niakes it less lonely,\" lie said. I waited for hlm te say something to hi. father, h. lie-coulin 't see him. \"Wil-Wilbur, ain't you got a word for yeur father,\" the. old man kind o' groaned. \"Yes, 1 have a word for yen, but 1 hopedi you would spare me f rom uttering it, \" lie answered, has face going white. Then, beeomîng cooler, \"Ai't you satisfied yet with what you've done?\" lie said. \"Yen are nothing to me. Our, ways part lier. l 'in going ini seareli of my lost in- tegrity; you can go back to your poli. tics and crookedness. \" The old man just looked at huxu, with a face that was almost grayiah green. Tlien lie hurried away. Well, I liad to talk lîke a Dutch unele before I made an impression on the. Kid. Wlien I told in, how his father liad gone back to stone-cuttig tlie Kid softened considerably. And wlien 1 threw out tliat the old mnan was ail broken up and flot respons. ible, and, perliaps, liable to do any- thung, tlie boy said: \"Corne, we must, go te hlm.\", We were et tlie tenement i les than no time. Tlie door was locked, but 1 lieard liim imuid. and heard somiething cia. besides, so 1 put my shoulder to it. 1le was standig in~ front of a bit of looking-glass and tried to hide something as we foll into tlie roemn. W. didn't have te see it te know wliat it was. The Kid went up te him. \"Dad, dear old dad, can you for-. give me?\" hie said, and put liii arma around the. eld man. That was mny eue to tae a sneak, and 1 was tip-toeig to' the door, wlien the Kid said agai: \"We're going te stick together now, ain't we? Not as politicians, but juat as lionest, square men.\" The father couldn 't answer - and yen know the reason wliy flot. On mny way down those four ffighta o' stairs 1 came to the conclusion that it takes a lot of practical polities and crookedness to kilt tlie love between father and son. Ci",
         "THE UNRULY LEAVES BY PETER McARTHUR O '%ýNLY a 8ii1ghlt leverage i. need. ed to turn at new~ leaf. THw whoie trouible lies in keeping it turned. Tlhis is sa truce it is hardly worth saying, but as it is the ob)viotns moral af aur storýy it mnay as %vell be uaid at once so that we will be rid of it. Harold George was one of those conifortable youing mnen who take theielves seriously and for that rea- son instinctively cansider ali girls fri- volous. But Aima Page 's frivoiity was of the kind that pleased hlm because it set off hi. solid qualities so weil. and lie called on her su often that obi- servant people hegan in tallc of a match. 0f course, he poohpoohed sucli a possibility, but continued ta enjoy hiniseif by having a polly Urne with her whenever the copportuinity off ered. As for Alma. she liked his soeiety, and ta the beat of her know- ledge was whoily heart free. This state of affaira had existed for mauy xnonths and wouid perhaps have continued indefinitely had it not been for a chat they had one evening dur- ing the Christmas holidays. \"Oh. byv the way, \" exclaimed Alma. \"have you made any gondreou t ions for the new year f\" 4\"Well, no, I can't say I have. 're- plied I-Iarold pompously. \"What a paragan you mnuat be if yen don 't need ta reforni in anv way! Ji Bt perhaps you feel that yani wouldn't have the power ta keep) q good resolution if you made il\"- rois, Harold prided hurnseli on his qtrength of wili. and he hastened ta eýxplain. . far as that iii concernepd vole are istatkent. 1 know 1 hanve faulita, as ail mien hanve, but as they have niever eaiene anyv trouble su far 1 don 't feel the 'ee.vt of botberinig my'..soif abolit tbemn. lIowever, if youi suggest ytblingk ilu whichi I need et reforni 1 wili s1o I van do it.\" -Oh, dear, no!\" said Aima hanter- ingly. - 1 wouldn 't for the worid don auytbing ta di.turb your puise(! Yaui are so perfectly balancred that the re- mnoval af even une of your fauiltta woiild apoil your symmietry.\" Harold wa fot qujick af percep-) tion, but be realized that lie was be. ing iauighed at, and] in self defeuce hie iskeýd: \"lBut what have you decided to give uip?\" \"J eani't maike up my mimd, I have so mauy faillt. 1 doti't know where to begin.\"- At this commauplace atatement Harold lauighed uiproariotisly. as is the habito ai men wbu bave fn sense( of humour, lier air as shep made the statenient wnq 80 demnure, however. that it added ta bier charm,. and as hie stappeýd lauighing be- looked nt lier with a patronizing sensé, of satisf ae- tion that was new tn bimi. -'I dau't see what you are laugli- ing at,\" said Mima. with a siight ponit that was also bewitching. \"I arn sure there are liofa thînga that 1 shoid tuirn over a new lea f aibout.\" Harold went off into another roar of lauiglter. The idea i t his fituffy bundle af innocence having gzreat fauilt% was very absurd ta hin. When lie tiuallv stapped, sbe exclaimied :",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE - l'Il tell yen what let's do. Let us each think it over carefully and tlieri decide to turn over a new leaf about somietbing. We really s9hould, yen know. and besides it is the fash- ion Lt thia lime of vlear,\" \",Ail right; it is a bargain,\" ho While smoking bis cigar on his way home, Harold thouglit of his proposed reform and laugiied te him- self at the absurdity of it all. It was foolish of 1dmn te sllow himseif te bc led into muci nonsense by a girl, but wliat agirl shewas 1li ewas tbink- ing vaguely of giving up smoking as bis reform, but lie gradually forgot about it thinking about Alma. Hie iiad nover tliougiit niucb about lier before, but on this nigit sh. lied lu- terested him, It is true uii. was tri- voleus, but so is every womau wbe is attractive. That sh. ws young and freoli aud beautiful was beyond question, and ail she ueeded wasas mn of strong ch*racter, 11k. bimseif, ef course, to direct her and bring out tiie serieus side of ber nature. At this peint a tbeugbt atruclc him se ferclbly that lio stopped abruptly with the cigar poised in hi. liand. What if Aima waa taking bis at- tentions seriously? It waa a disturblng tliought, and lie walked slowly as lie turned it over iu his mind. He iiad always consid- ered it part et bis destiny te nlarry, but h. was waitixig for the riglit wo- mn aud merely amuslng bimseif i the ni.antime. But if Aima had learned te love him, sud it was quit. possible, h. might b. thi. cause of a cruel dlsappoixitmeut te ber. Women feel sucb things se deeply, yen know. As hé thiiuaht it ail ovèr and reealled that perhaps Aima, after ail, was the. ivoirien to make hilm happy, But be- fore dlecidinig finally be resolved te so-und the depths of ber eharacter and stop meeting her frivolity with frivolity. Just then it occurred te hlm. that iu doing that he would b. turning over a new leaf as lie lied promised to, and he chuckled over bis own olevernesa. Aima iu the meantime had cau- vassed ber failinge carefully and had decided that ber besetting sin was flirting, True, she had neyer flirted mucli witb any oue but Harold, sud bis self satisfaction was so unspeak- able that it was a teniptation to tease him. But sh. really did not love him. He. was nlot lier Prince Charmiug by any means, and se would simply have te give up flirting with lim. Full ef this noble resolution, alie awaited bis next visit. On tiie first evening of the New Year Herold attired himseîf faultless- ly aud eailed at the. Page mansien. lHe badl almost decided that Aima was the. one womau le had ever met wiiem le would care te meke bis wife, and the. impresqion WL. heightened wieii ah, swept into the. roomn te greet him sud wisii hlm tiie compliments of the seeson. He liad brought lier a box of bonbons as e New Year's gift sud was somewhat murpriued by tii. staid aud decorous way iu wiich she received it. Hi. surprise became posi- tive wheii she uaid: \"Tliauk yen se muel, M~r. George. It i. very kind ef you te bring me tus.\" Hie expected that se. would go lu. te raptures as usuel, aud tiiex the \"Mr. George!\" Tbey lied kniown each cther from. ehildhood. and sho. 1 i m .:18 i the mi it I don't er?\"",
         "THE U.NRULY LEAVES wo make himaelf ridiculous, and he iitopped in morne contusion. It was certaill\u003e annoying te have lier greet him in thia way wlien he intended te start me differently with lier. \"'Youi are flot angry at mie, are yen?\" hie asked after an uneomfort- able silence. -Certainly not. Wliat put that into your head?\" \"But yen are treating me me dif- ferenti\u003e' trom th(, way yen usually do, me--\" \"I have always treated yen pe- litel\u003e', haven't il\" \"Oh, psliaw! 1 don't mean that. Now 1 lumiat on knewing,\" lie began pettishi\u003e', but she interrupted him wlth smre aper4y \"Inulet, 'Mr. George! I never knew that yen had an\u003e' riglit to insist on aniything with me.\" \"I den't mean that,\" lie tried to .2plain, and in the nieantime lie ws~a losing hlm temper rapidly at flnding hi. plans ec\u003e upset, -\"but yen seemi mc queer te-niglit. \" \"Tlianks for the compliment, Mr. George. 7 The. iteration of \"Mr. George\" ex- aRperated him compietely, and lie tried te says\u003eomething, failed, and then started toward the deor, intend- ing to ieve the hue. But at tet moment Mrs. Page entered the. ron and wiahed hlm the complimnents ot the season. It weuid net do wo let her sec that lie was angry, m, lie .liatted witli lier for a tew minutes and gradually r.- evered him self control. In the mean- tinie Aima hait time te refleet that àlie lied rather overdone lier dleeoroum condnct and wsu anious te make up friends. To sec hlm angry wffl sme- tblng new, and it gave lier a very un- pleasant feeling about the~ heart. She didn't like wo think et losing hlm friendmhlp. Like a true weman. mli. preuiptly decided te let the. new leat she lied tnrned over rustle back te ils place and begin agulu witli the. old one. VWben lier niether ieft the reeni. mie ran up te Hlarold andi looking up ilifle ili eyeeý withi the swedeest pei tenlc pleaded : 'Don't let us quarrel, Ilareld, 1 adit 1 didn 't treat yon nirely Won 't yen let iiie sinig yen the w song 1 hiave lea.rned?\"tý Ooing Ie Ihle piano, Se played hier own Reccemipanimlent anid sanig the lait. est popular meng, one thiat gave lier an opportunity te look at hlmii r)guiqli- ly and flash ber beautifullee te aid- vantage. île wis partly minelified and more lu love thani ever bef ere ah.e reachied the last verse. lier sudden changes tromn dignity te trivelit\u003e' b.- wildered hiim, but stili mli. wam eu tiful in ail lier meeds. 'C sl!\"àe Raid, extendlng lier liand to hinm. \"We aire friendm ngain, aren't we? Butiten muet confea. yen wevre not eatythe mRne1 as usulal te mne to-niglit. Yen werp me woefully scrions. ' She did neot wilhiraiw lier liand froin hie lingering clasp, for, hic. the. impulsive creature ah.e was, ah. ever- did lier receneiliation ms ah. lied lier reforni. \"Yes, 1 was more serions than uisual,\" lie sald, atili holding lier liand, \"but that iras berause I liait made tir my mmid te turn over a niew kea . \"And it wa. because 1 litd turrned caver a new le! that 1 wa-\" Then she stopped and blushed furleumly. It weuld neyer dIo te tell hlm lier remo- intion, and ah. withdrew lier band, and bluahes beeamne lier as mueli as arniles. ''Oh, wliat was yeur resoluiteon?\" she asked gaily, trying to cever lier confusion. \" 1had made up my mnd tdisoy- er-no, I have made np mny mind-I love yen, Aima! Will yen b. MY wifet1\" -I didxi't ex.ýpect this!\" ahe whia- pered lu repi\u003e'. - But amy yen wili b. my wlf!! \"Oh, yen1 muest give m*e time te think! \" \"Tien yen (Io net love me!\" lie said blankly.",
         "DM2 THE CÂNADI I don 't know. I always liked yeu and want tobe friends. And to stop flirting with you was my goed reso- \"I1 want you to stop flfrting with me, \" he naid eagerly. 1 want you to b. lu earnest. \" '\"Oh, it is alu se sudden!\" she pro-. teted. \"Let us not turn over new leaves, but just go baok witli the old ones just as we were, yeu know, for a while. \" \"No,\" he said deggedly. -I have turned ever a new leaf and over it stays. I want you te be in'Y wife and net simply a jolly friend.\" This speech was in every way char- acteristic of hlm, and as she looked at Iimi she felt very weak and f oolish in the presence of hie firmunesa and strength. She wanted very mucli te ery and knew that was foolish, tee, AN MAGAZINE but every second she feit herseif yielding to his dominant will, and when hie suddenly clasped hier in his arma she made no resistance. After that what a trouble they b.d with their new leaveel Now that hae claimed a proprietary interest in her, Hlarold simply couldn't help meeting Alma's frivolity with frivolity and unbending cumbrously in response to hier gaiety. And she found it more delightful than ever te flirt with him ' now that their littie quarrel had made themi realize how dear they were te each other. But before the next sea- son of goed resolutions had corne around they made up their minds that it was altogether too mueh trouble to turn over two new leaves and keep thein turned. So they deeided to con- fine theingelves to, one leaf and turn* it over together. THE WINTER HILLS By J. C. M. DUNCAN ALOOF in undisturbed repose, In austere white, each high hill resta, Day prints no staiu upon their snewe, Night leans hier brow upon their crests. But when these giante rouse from eleep, They leose frem out their iron hands, The leashes of the etorms that sweep The levels of the loue white lands. Y'et patient ef the heure that bring The power that sets their pulse astir, They wait the genlus of the Spring, And shàll unbare their browe to lier. There bier first sitars shall arise; Then shahl each bihl-top be divine; The world saat climb with hepeful eyee, Those bills, and wership at hier ebrine.",
         "CURRENT EVENTS BY LINDSAY CRAWFORD TIIE defeat; o! Tamnany by the F'usionists in the New York elections has led te semne plain speaking with regard te those who voted for \"Boss\" Murphy's nomn- inees. One Ameriean journal trit.- )y observes that there is no ileed at present te celebrate the. victory with the. sound of the cornet, flute, harp, sackbut, and psaltery, as jubilation is out o! place when the past is taken into accounit. The. citizens o! a great city, lik. New York, scarcely do themuelves justice when they con- gratulate themnselvcs on ending the. scandalous rûle and ineredible cor- ruption o! Taxnmany Hall. Rather Bhould they feel ashamed o! their in- difference and inaction ini the. past. snd mû.e it impossible ini the future for any mani te cali himai! a re- spectable citizen who consorts at elee- tion times with graft.rs and corrup- tionists wbo batteii on the. vices of the. underworld. That staid month- ly, The. Foru\u0026m, peints a moral whieh applies to Canadians as well as those te whoin it is addressed: '\u003cIt is a fundamental change in the attitude o! the. people that we r.- quire, and will have, the chiange froin ignorance, indifference, and in- decency te the full knowledg. o! d.cency and duty. Lot us have don. once for ail with the shallow flii- pany tatregards seriousness in pub lieaffirsasa mere indication o! a la\u003cck e! humour, tLct us have donc with the. previncialism that parades dishonesty in politics as an immut- able and desirable condition. Lect us Mi3 have dorie with the disguisting Public standard, thant eniable anl apparcntly uipriglit eitizen Io annlounfce openlly that he will support an admnitted gang o! anafes'sd v-ote for thevir von- tiiuied spoliation o! thle ci1ty s111d the State.\" Uuertai, at the iomnrt of writing. is nearing the. end o! hi. unconistitu- tionial dictatorship. Villa, thie \u003c,rat- whilc bandit atad miariaude Ir, i4 clos- ing Ini on the Capital, and the. daysi o! the H1uerta regimie miay b. inii- bered before this mevets the eyNe Of thle reader, President ilns scorcd a great personal triumiph by,% the sa- gaeity asud judgnivnt lielhas display- ed iii the. handhing of a diflicuit pro),- 1cmi, and. above ail, by hi, rigid ad- herence to the new p)riniciples of di- ploinacy by whiehi the relations b.- tween the United States and M.xico have been governed. When thoe story o! these Mexican revolutions cornes te b. written it will place a new coin- plexion on affaira that now svvim strange and inexplainable. On ene hand are the masses of the. people struggling against an iniquitous land systein, and assertîng their nighit te fuill self -geverniinent. On the othier hand are the, landowners and foreign speculators-the latter mnostly Ani- ericans and British-who k.ep a Diaz and a Huierta in power for the. ricli concessions thiey are, able te ebtain in cichange for gr'a!t. President WiI- son's part in this dîfficult diplomatie situation will b. better understeed wh.n the. full facts corne te lighI.",
         "THE O.ANADIAN MAGh.ZIN It bias yet to b. proved that the Mexican people are incapable of self- governmeut or unable to vote inteili- gently at a free election. Dent \u0026 Soshave published a volume on thie Republics of Central and South Amn- erica, by Mr. C. Reginald Enock, that gives a freuli impression of Mexico, froin the inslde, of which the, author write. with first-iiand knowledge: 1fr. Enoek lias mucli that lu inter- eting te, say about the. relations of Europ andthe United States with teRpblie, but the. chapter on Maeico lu naturally the one which at the. present moment is of apecial in- terest. 1fr. Enock points out that iu spite of lier contiguity Wo and close commercial relations witii the, Unit- ed States Mexico stifi looks towards France as the, land cf bier ideas andi to Englanti as the. home of nxorality iu comrilsnad leadershiip ini social adtvanee. The. American, it sein, lias not exereimeti mueli influ- ence on the. strong 8panl.h permonal- ity of the. educated Mexican. 'Mr. Enock eonulders tiiat the great bulk of the Mexican people are not law]s by nature, the mestigos, wiio form the body of the nation, asking notii- lig more than Wo work andi prosper, andi the great peon cia.. being docile andi without initiative for creating political disturbance. D.aling with emigration from Eur- ope Wo the. Republics, Mfr. Enock draws attention Wo the. curions fact that a great proportion of the enu- grants are reall hunian birds cf pas- sage, wiio cross over freni Italy or Spain, gather the. harvest in Argen- te, anti the coffe. erop in Brazil, and then, with good wages in heir pockpts, return home for a period cf i the Monroe Doctrine by some colon- izing power, Mfr. Enock points out tiiat the results of the. struggle, wii.- tiier the. attack cornes f rom Oermnany or Japan, will depenti upon naval arinanents. A German colony in South Amnerica would flot, in his opin- ion, be likely te reniain permanently under tiie German flag, for the. Ger- man colonist is undoubtedly happier under a foreign flag. But te that the Pan-German would doubtiess reply: \"Give us something better than swamps, andi our colonists will show no desire Wo break away frorn the. Fa- tiierlani.\" The number of bocks andi pam- phlets dealing with national probleni. is increasing at an alarming rate. W. seeni te b. getting back once more to the, age cf tii. pamplileteers. Not a 11W.l of this output ie due to the. changeti relations between Govern- ments andi Parliaments. This is espe- cially true cf the. United Kingdom. The. party system lias not only effaceti the. private member; it is ini danger of elfacing Parliament itselL. The Hou.. cf Commons is no longer the. place from wiiici pelitical leaders sway the opinion cf the. country. TMn- isters no longer ris. Wo atidreus the. House. buit filA Uyja.- --ý4-_",
         "CURRENT EVENTS In this ferment of political contro- ver.y, however, new ideas tae root, and uew standards are created by whidi to test and shatter the. hoary dogmas of a bygone age. Those who take a broad and phulosophical view of things see in this welter of con- fusion the travail of a nation, the growing pains that attend ail per- manent progress, and the survival of the fittest ini parties and national poi- icies. ?rogreas is neyer backwards, and what political leaders to-day con- demu as minous te the nation and the, Empire, to-morrow will be acoept- ed as the. sure foundation of future prc\u003egrehs. A wonderful unity of pur- pose la revesied in the. slow growth of the. British Empire. mher. is lit- tle room for pesms, despite the. heat.d conflicts of thie ampiileteers, if the. controversieso to-day are viewed lu the. light of pat history. It la a good thing for the. individual as well as for the. nation te have its faith in the. future grouuded on the. immutable doctrine of human pro- gress. Mien still have a hauk.rlng bc- lief lu a \"Providence that shape. our ends, rough-hew them as we willE\" Tiie truth of all this is revealed in the. latest book on Goîwin Smith. The, sage o! The. Grange saw blue ruin in ever:y moxement with which lie was out of harmony, and leaders of pub- lie opinio-men wiio the venld now nowsweethe. conscous or unconscious instruments of a blgh destiny in the. evolution of national lfe-vere in his erratic juâgmeut lit- tle better than tricksters aud adveu- turers conspiring te ruin the. British nation aud te overthrev the. ritish Empir. The. Irish leader ha. very littlé amuse of humour. He i. digity per- souifed. No ene could imgn Jh Redinond telling a story to illustrate a peint. 'Wiie, tiierefore, h.e drew a picture of the. Irish ship-the Home Rule cause-.ent.ring the harbour after w.atherng msny storma, and .alled for \"Full speed ahead!\" an- cient mariner. of a superstitious tuirn of iiiid shook tlieir stolid hieadâa t sueh reekless Celtic darinig, wii po- liticai opponenta laughed and seized uipon tiie figure of speech to point a moral of their own, Full speed ahiead for a uhip) .nterning harbour could only end in disaster. What fate was iii store for tii. third Home Rul. Iiill Ula-'Iter at the. moment appear- ed te b. the. only serious obstacle to the realization cf Irish Naitioniit8 hopes. Tii. Liberal coalition vas stili impervious te external assaults. Jied] Fate eeased to (log the. footateps of Irish agitation? In 1886 Mr. Cham- berlain wrecked Gladston\u0026.a hope. and led the, secelson f rom the Lib- eral ranks that placed the. Goverui- muent lu a minority. The. Parnell- O'Siiea divorce proceedinge and the. aplit ini the. Irih Party dug the. grave cf Glad8tone', second bill. Would Fate lie more kind ini 1913? WVith consummate skill that hiad von the admiration of veteran parliamientar- ian. Mr. Redmoud lied nnuvered his ship te tii. harbour miouth sud waited for a favouring tide te cast suohor in port. And then tii. unex- peoted happ.ued as it alvaya doe. lu Ireland. Close observers lid long miarked \"Jim\" barkin out a. s factor te b. reekoued within l an Irish Partis- ment. Few dreanit that Ljarkin, sud flot Canson, vould prove te b. the. chie! menace te tiie paage of tiie third Home Rule Bill, Sir Edward Carson ha. liee» indulging iu a hype- tiietical rebeflion, but the. advent cf Larkiu enta deeper lute the. body politi.. Carsoulsm i. a paasing phase of an expirnug cause that will have ne roenurrection under Home Rul. Larkinism la Nationalisni lu travail Whtvrblemishes may b. found lu Larkini.m-aud it is cond.mned lu eqnally .trong ternis by Roman Cath- oU.c biahopsand Soeiajist leaders-it means tiie awakening of Nationalist Iretand by tiie fairy godmotiier, De- nioeracy. Larkinlani is et once the",
         "TEE CANADIÂN MAGAZINE despair both of Redmondismn anc Carsonismn It gives the. lie te tiiE Uter bogie of religious oppressior wider Remie ule. Lt proves whal every Irishmnan knows iu us heari that the. linei.o e leavage ini an Iish Parlisment will be economie, flot re- ligieus, It offers hope of the. con- sumnmatien of the. dream of the yeung Irelanders iu 1848, of a union of North sud Southi on a platfermn fromn whicii seetsilan differences will b. banisiied. Foer Mr. Redmond it mneans muoli an.xiety as to the. fate ef the Iome uie Bill, sud at the best the knowledge that iu bis fIrst Parlia- ment on College Green he will repre- ment the past sufferiugs, but not the future hopes, ef lis. ceuntry. The. day for whieh Michael Davitt lenged aud prayed lias breke iu the Green Ile and the fifrt beginnings ef bis platform of national democraey are beiug set up iu the, Irish metrepelis. The Irish Nationadist Party bias play- Pda stupid gaine in relation te Lar-. kmn. Not a single member, uer a sin- gle Irish newspaper has espeused the cause ot the. strikers iu Dublin. This is iu strange ceutrast te the Englisli press, where the. cause of the. work ers ha. received sympathetie treat- meut at the hands of ail parties. Not se Lrelaud. Labour aud the Irishi Natl\u003cmallst Party have parted in the heur ef testing, and no efforts ef dipleniaey eau alter the. destiuy of thi. two forces which fate lias de- ceed shail lie wide spart. The. approaehing celebratien of the hundred years of peso, between Eng- Iii-speaking peepleshl et boa. the. fleedgates of discussion a. te the. fu- ture relations betweeu Canada aud the. Empire on eue hand, sud between the, United States sud the Empire on the. ether. Mr. J. Ells Barker and Sir Gilbert Parker, amoug a lieut of writens ou the subjeet, have written I advecating an Angle.American uuion-s defensive alliance agaii i al] the. rest of msnkind. Commnun' *of bleed, speech and political instii tiens tomi the. basi4s ef bis dlaim, 1 closer union between the Empire a' *the. Republie. By seine in the. Un ed States Mr. Barker s articles a eniticized as \"the. akimmiali lin. of pmejeeted assault, in cennection wl Britishi Imperial tedematien, upon t centinental independence ef the Un ed States.\" Writing tmom an Ai enican stsndpoînt, Mr. Delos Baker asks, \" Why wene these anti.] written?\" fie preceeds to ausw his own inquiry by disputing t] Britishi prenises that between the ty peeples tiiere is a community ef bloo speech, and political institution \"If,\" he says, \"Mr. Barker thini our people are Angle-Saxons, 1 siiould walk down Breadway an read tihe names on tii. store-front He should saunter through the. Boy ery wîth epen eyes and cars sud no tribu. Let hi read tii. naines lu tii peil-beeks ef New York, Piiiladelphii Pittsburg, Cincinnati, Cleveland, C3h cage, St. Louis, Milwaukee,' St. Psu Minneapolis, New Orleans, and Sa Francisco, and rememben that a lamu shame et the. Engliali patrnnnies bN long te varieties such as ýnalattoi quadreons, octeneons, wiio bear ne al fection te their Anglo-Saxon ancestor ot the. days of slsvemy, sud cheriali n pride lu their admixture ef Anglc Saxou blood, The farinersand inS! ket-gardenens et the United States ar more than hait German or of Germnai descent.\" Atter mncli more in thi strain, 'Mn. Banker questions the righý ot Cauada te enter a tedematien oi British nations. \"If this sciieme oi Britishi Impemial federation is te 1,4 pressed. Canada lias cenie te the part inug et the. ways. Siie wibl have te be. ceme American, er else carry lier Bri- tish affiliation te some otiier sud more cengenial continent.",
         "TOWARDS EVENING From the Painting by Adre Lapie,",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE",
         "THE YEAR BOOK 0F CANADIAN ART11 Con\u003epiled by the Arts and Letters Club of Toronto. London arud T'o- ronito: .1. M. Dent alid Sonis. T II introduction to tins volumle srts forthl concisely ils objeci: advert-ised ats at progressive, suc(cesa- fui peoplE., but so f'ar nlo attemlpt hbas beenvi made t o review thiir aehevmeitsin thoise» fields iii wich the. finet of othervi couit ries lias long been establislied. To sup- ply thie deficiency., tiai volumei la pub- liahed, * Thfý arts represented are literature, architecture, miusie, paint- ing. sculpture, and] the, book shows whalii progresa was made in thpese varlous arts during 1912 and 1913. In every instance the subject treatedl was a.ssignied to ici per-son regarded as the mnost capable, ivithi i reenît1 thiat there are in ail thirty . ,i ~r- ticles, essays, and sketes, and ecdi ie xnay b. considered vs thc Nvork of au] expert, A few of the sulbjeets, for instance, are: '\u003cCarnadian Ilistory and Iiiography.,\" Fec-aa dianL] Literai uire,\" , v. y - Fic.- tion', 0CoalMsi1n narlo.\" -Flicr.en Statev of Oralnd Operai Mu Cana,\"0:1 - Canadttiani A rt ,\" 1.Architectural Pvel1opmewnt in Canir- ada.\" T- r are flfty-two illustra- tionis, m1ost of tbenii fuillipage in sixf. Tihe booXk is well printed-i on guod paper, atid it is airtisticailly% arranged anld bounld. As ail tic contribuions were gratutitous, ih was possible te publislh the book at f1w low prive of one dollakr. MY LIFE \\VITl1 TIE EKM ront1o: The Malemillan oman T ' RIS Lage volume, profuse l heu1lsive. inde,. la, a remîilt of several . vears of life wlth andl amongst fliv Eskimlo trîbes of tie far No rthl, Wrltteni withoutf any effort to be ro- marntic or senrsational, il nevertlieless, la undi(onblted(ly' the most fascinating accounit yet publishied o! travel1 and exploration ini Archie regions. Per-",
         "TUJE CANAPIAN MAGAZINE .MR. ALAN SULLIVAN Atho h eWMIIPaMIIiTJ. Ofu01-But and other T.I,* hchispubiaedyJ.M. Det \u0026Son. hapa the. mnot interesting chapter, e.railyfrom an anthropological poinit of view, is the. aecount of the dliscovery of the \"Blond\" Eskimo, the. amall band of about a thoiisand, who inhabit Victoria Land. Tiie au- thor had paid a visit to the. Dolphin and Union Straits Eskimo, a race of hospitable, virtuous, peaee-loving peo- ple, and fromn tiiem had received ac- counts of the village on Victoria Ia- land. Wishing to visit tus village, 1-- -iii,n. and uDon ar- were only a few Christians, althoug some missionaries had been at wor there for more than a decade; bi on hie returil in July of the f olici ing year lie found to hie amazemei that every man, woman, and chii] had been converted. The change 1 attributes to fashion, it having witl in the year been thouglit advisable i adopt the new f ashion and becon Christians, as had other tribes. 1 this connection lie maIres the. singuli observation that ail races of men ha, some form of religion, and that t] Iower one goes in the mcale of humi culture the more religion one fm The volume contaiiis nxany absorbii ehapters, and one can imagine t-. difficulties encountered when on u~ expedition it was found necessary travel 400 miles to Point Barrc because Sergeant Fitzgerald, of t Northwest Mouxited Police, woiu flot give them, a supply of mnateb (an article they had forgotten) u less they would remain near the bu racks and under police protecti( There are many other trying expe enees and hair-breadth escapes, that altogether the volume is inten ly interesting as well as instructi' THE PASSING 0F OUL-I-B3 BY ALA1N SULLiv»TN. Toronto: T'. Dent and Sons. T RIS volume of short tales b Canadian writer is notewoi because it gives another iiistancE the. encouragement the publishers M. Dent and Sons) are lendinj writers in this country who seek 1 lie support. The. tales are mostl: life in the Canadian nortii cour a country familiar to the. autiior. of them, \"Tiie Training of Chiliq appeared originally in The Ca\u003cna, Magaine.With each tale is an bropriate poem by the author. Pinqiini nf OuIi-I-But\" la. itselt-",
         "THE lIBRARY TABLE DY 11aPNSEN Hoo BqIURNETr. To. ronito: William ig. F('~ a a of the New York 1 lild 18 amJ big jmbuit tevry'oi w01(j ktiows TF. Teinbaroii as tie wvaif will be delight.di Io sie ux \"corne ilt o hus oýwn\"ý later 011. AS ai idown-righit likeable character this on.e is hiard Io beat. Even ait that ùw1y lige heo iiad ani allinilg grill-ii grinl whicli otnl- ed Ilp huas muuoth aild shlow. I his Sound, ielilthy, yountg teethl a lot .)i them-ri. Anid evenl at filai early g people liked fo see themi. It was sheer grit that earried thus fellow of nii ,education on) to ai tesae.1 was to thait nesaer' dana.tat they appredlated bis cheerfuinus. his gift of slang, anid his wvay of inakillg fnienidi. T'ie. shabbyv thirdi-rate Iorig-us whichl Ile be tuok himaiielf iii these days of comlparative affluience wais a poil decal happier for his preserice. It was tb4a shaibbv. boarding-house that posse thiat fressure beyond pr-ice,-Lýittle Anu, fo whun TP. Tfembaroin, 11ke tiie sensible feUlow he waa, loat 118 bepart for good and al. It needed somiething quit. uinumnual iii the way of wvoiio to b. T. Tembaroiiis match. A lu Little Ann, with lier English daisy fac- and tue forget-me-.nut blue eyes, which made her look liike a niiee baby of a uingularly serious and ubserving mind, wcas thiat unusual person. In-. \u003cleed ah. was, as the young men in the boarding-bouse used devoutly fo observe, \"il wunder.\" 8h.e was a use- fui littie persun, too, as well as a god- deass. '\"She mended their sfeka and sewed buttons on for tbem with a tlrm frankneaa which could not b. persuaded into meaning anlythinig more sentimental tbaii a fixed habit of repairing anything which needed it, and which, while at first bewilder- ing li ifs sineerity, ended by redue- ing the. youths to a dust of devo- tion.\" When fate brought it about that T. Tembarom, to his by no nieans unqu11alitivd aiftou wals fuuîid Io b. Ille possof' an anicient inIIe and a f;kabullus incme ad anl ini- heiritanice, 11n Eîmglandi su important thiat lh. ktad Wo Il-liveo the spot, Eg Iand, lu p01t if mIildly,. haLd the. sur- Prise of, hor hif, Lalte-r on lad wlwn-i shv hal got 4)%ver t1h. first shock, deiliglhtd Ili T. T!nrobut she cold rwver fairly b. II saill 11 get Used fo hmliiii i .Ianig mas of anl exçotiv tp.Aai 111ilgu pannoed ouf T. Tomn- baroni wýas reçot thi. wiIds of NwYorki, buti niot befure li. mod outmIt god over t here, TU'1E'- FROi)NTIER K 0iFI TUE11 11 E A RTF Trnsatdby rdrc Lees froni tii. ,reb o! Vielor Marguierite. Tor-oIIo: 1flnry rwe T111., if( a novel based on the. AïracoPiMia wa, AFrelioh girl, Martba Ehiangé,'ý visita tue tOwNV o! Manburg- .111d tuer. metutt a (1er- ianii duefur nam11ed Ot fo RudhIleimrer. Nofwithstaniding their different tem- p-riien'lts, ilataunialities, religionis, habits, Matha ad Otto fell desper- ately iu love witbi each other. Their parentls object Ioeuusyf a mrar- niage fraughtl with w) mai;ny difficul- ties, but the. yOungJ culire defer.- minecd. Martha go. s a bride Il .Marburg, but ifo b.! or. the ouf- break o! war slie returns Wo hier falt berS rou0f aIL Ainiiens to become a mlotber, TlleIii. huabandl joins tile inxed- ical corps o! tiie Prussiani armyi, and iii time enfers France and, natural- ly, tue humew of his wife anid littie child. Buit thi. war bas engenidered a terrible animiosity aginart tue Prus- slana, and Martha and Otto find that thieir early romiantic attacieret will not witbstand their present clashing seimienits, and seeordingly there is ilow between therrn no bond of sym- pathy exeept the. child, Niartha ne- turns to Marburg and takes the ebild with ber, althougli ah. nebelled great- ly againat going. The situation, how-",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE ever, ie impossible, SO that Martha soon finde lierseif agreeing to a peti- tien for divorce. Skie goes back te lier native country, taking the child witli ler. The father 's hope is that by having the ehid with hin for a time every year hie will grow up with German ambitions and a love for the traditions of hie father 's people. Al of whîili suggeste a sequel. It is a good study in racial animosity. THE STORY 0F WAIITSTILL BAX-,TER BY KATJE DOUGLAS WiGeQm. Toronte: William Briggs.. T HIS i a departure frein the racy teof stery by the author who l'ils become famous as the creator of Rebecca, Polly, the Birde, Penelope, and Timothy, and many readiers may net id it raey enougli. However, it ie a pretty, gentie, placid story. Waitstill Baxter and her sister, Pat- ty, lived with their miserly old f a- ther, and, thougli they did their duty te the old curxnudgeon, found lif e a thankiess task. Patty made a run- away marriage, while WaitstiUl went te the man skie knew adored lier and offered te become his wife. Tisi man, who waa the good and truc Ivery Beynten, was an excellent son te a mother who lied lost lier memery and who eventually died. HAGAR BY M\u0026ARY JOHNSTON. Toronto: Wil- liamn Briggs. ARBYIEWER of thisenovel ak gar is a keen advocate of equal suf- frage, and wkien skie ie on the peint of maîrriage skie telle the mian that while skie is determined te mnake the adventure with hi ske lias no inten- tien of giving up lier work in the cause of \"woman'e riglite.\" \"I wieh a chil4, \" sesays , \"when it needs me, and wlien it needs me 1 shal bie there. \" The reviewer asks, Ho about haif a dozen? Haif a doz( ehildren would not give Hagar mui tîme te pursue hier work for weme One ehild, of course, would net be bad. A woman eould manage one i riglit; and I suppose soims wom\u003c weuld feel that in the one they we~ fulfiling their whole duty te God ai man. But there is anether phase Hagar 's philosophy. Skie says, wish a child when it needs me.\" SI doce ndt say, \"I wish a child when need ît.\" Mest wemen need net child, but chidren; and that is iii where Hagzar came to the stumblin block in heér desire te serve lier ov' sex and at the saine time carry oi te soîne degree at least, the wlic functien of womanhood. It je au i teresting novel, with a sliglit love el ment compared with the buoyant i mance by the saine wrter--'\" Have and te Hold.\" THE DAIRK FLOWER By JoaN- GÀl4swowriîv. Londe: William Heinemann. Toronto. T Copp, Clark Company. the kind, again, that one cannet C scribe. One lias te be a reader Galsworthy te appreciate the peculi grace and subtlety of his art. F hie work je genuine art, net se mu the thing itself as the way\\ it is doi which, of course, is everything. HIE we have a youtli, a youing Qif o youtlî, walking along HoIywell on afterneen in early June. Hie ie the way te read te his tutor an ese on Oliver Cromwell. At the tutoi home there je Anne Stormer, t tuter 'e wife, witi lier brown lia lier deep-set ice-green eyes und, black lashes. This wexnan is ocH, thougli skie lias but thirty-six ye, -many years eider than the you whoin skie growe te love. The b becomes an easy prey; hie very adequacy of thought and expressi",
         "THE LIBRARY TABLE tuaking him ail the more touchiiiig. The dark flower-paission--wa.s il[ a-bud wvitini hiiut. Buit his Wals a dlivided aliae.Becauise, ais iue1k louldave il, thlere was allso bv hils ,ýide aiIy litie glirl, \\\\11o (.lixbed reswitli Iiiiii, al litiel gil %who hlad rippinig hiair, mid mwhos4e \\%un.e of astuniri1g forget-me1-inot blue. A il wheni Anastorier heoard youith culit Io youith she stood nsideý. ier tragedy is ail the more bitinig beoiause it is lived under the satirleal oyes of lier enliginlatical lisa D. lid lie cure under. the distilnguisheed irolny 91, bis regard. Onice we fixid hlmii lookiug at hier, anid ait a supreme momientoo, alid it almlost soems as if! thait sualve ironly was ail thlere was to hi. ont 1e hiand on the edge of has .oa1t poeket-out of thle icture, as il were-was nervouisl closinig and un- elosing. \" That suggestive hatid is ail we are ever to kniow ofho lio\\ e feit. But if it were necessary at thia; timne of day it would be sufficient to prove Mr. Galsworthiy the supreme alrtist. THE LADY ELEOT BY NORANt HINSDAuLE PiTMAN. To- ronto: Henry Frowdle. TH'sils he soryof a Cbinese girl ed\" mnarriage and of the terrible or- deals of lier lover, wlio braves thle hiorrors of Buddhlst yrnyIn or. der to save lis sweetheart fromi the faite arranged for lier by al wicked priest. Tlie authior- la a i)rofessor of Euglish in Peking Normal School, and lie lias many opportunities to study at first hand Clii2nese condi- tions. The story deals with a time prior to thc recent \"awa-kening\" of China, but even in the development of the romance one heuars rumblinga of an upproaehing upheaval. The il- lustratiorna are Chinese in claracter, and evidently they are the work of native Chinese artists. JACK UIIA.NTY 13v IIUJL]iE1rr VOOTSER. Toronito: ThO Mus.son1 Book Company. T BIs Canadlin writ.er's novels are ;b1v ai othier thiinga, full of ac- ti'oi ou olour. Ile devals wil theo Nortll couffir a ls iU hev knowm il, alld ]lis ehrateiztin are s al rie \\NelI donce. Il 1s suilse of' the dramlatile is nlot ovrrflebeas t limes blis iniciduints beoorne molodramatfie, buIt onle shlouid riebrof courses, thlat lie writes abIoult al eountry aud e'lasa of people wliose lifeý and la- ter is made up1 Ilargelyv of mlelodramla. 1l) tls story he ti hrows al Veil of myv- stery arounid Iiis hevro, for Iaek ('hianty oni a ralft floats inito thle story ln ili veryv filrst chlapter and fails ln love with ar Cranlston, daugliter of tliv Hudson . s Bay Conpnytrd- er uit, Fort Cheever. Juack formlerlyv worked lu a banjk ini Nozitreal. Short- ly after Ilis departure for tlie Woods iinothier clerk ini thie baiik steals ten thousand dollars, leaving the impres- sion bellind that lcoIim Piers (otherwiae Jack Chanty) la the thief. When thie guilty man und Jack Chunty corne face to face!, ut Fort Cheever, nieither kniowing tdie other to be within a thousand miles, the melodrarna begins, but it is thirilling mud picturesque. -' Book-laIte Seinn\"is the titie of ani iiuteresting booklet dealing with the hitrart, and usefuillcss of tIe book-plute. WVhile book-plates have heen iiiiluse alinlost ever since books themseives have been printed, thieir popuilarity and value hlave in- creased ti*,reendouslyI -within recent y ea rs. Now that ev1ery scbool and ,ollege possesses a librury, the uise of the book-plate ia invaluable hecauise without it many volumes would be iost. Tt is a mnucI more dignified mark thuan that of thc commouplace rubber stumnp. (Liondon, 49 Gt. Port- land Street : hIenry A. Ward).",
         "MÂK-E SUaz OF I The late Wilbur Sanders, o! Mon- tana, once United States Senator from that Stat., rode into a Montana min- ing town one afternoon and found the entire population about te lyneli a man wlio liad been stealing ore. Sanders puslied his way into the crowd. \"Stop this!\" lie tliundered. \"Stop thisi 1 proteet! There lias been too mue1 of this mort of thing in Mon- ~tinn. -We must break up this habit GRATu»E' A patroniziflg young lord was 8 ed opposite the'late James Me) Whistler at dinner one eveniug. During a luil in the conversa, lie adjusted his monocle and lea forward toward the artist. \"Aw y' know, Mr. W\\histler,'1 drawled, \"Ipahssed your house mawflifg. \" Thanik yon, \" said Whistler qi ly. \"Thank yen, very mueli. London Tit-Bits. \"OLD UlSE AND WR General Marion Maus lias a I and delicate taste in literature, at a recent dinner at Vancouver 1 racks, discussing a popular nove littie 'wortli, General Maus said: \"The pathos of the book la r( bathos. It reminds me of a privi widow. The~ good woman was a: to sell ler lieusehold furniture, rugs, plated ware, and wliat not. sbe was gomng over these articles .- eibed witli tears. a host of ii EWICE-TOL",
         "TWICE-TOLD TALES GENIUS AND MARRIÂGE \"The married life of a genius is usually unhappy-so is that of hie wife.\"' The speaker was Miss H1elen Gould, who was diseussing marriage in gen- eraL. \" To be lte wife of a genius is bad,\" site eaid, \"but to be the hus- band of one is mueit worse. At a musicale I heard a lady say: \" 'Who Îs that nman with the soft- bosomted shirt and Windsor tie?' \"' He is the husband of the won- derful contralto, Vivavoce,' her com- panion answered. \" 'Yes,' said the other, 'but who wus lie before his marriage?' Gooo-NîirrT The neatness of the New England housekeeper is a matter of conunon remark, and husbands iii that part of the country are supposed to ap- preciate their advantages. A bit of dialogue reported as fol- lows shows that there may be an- other side to the matter: \"Martita, have you wiped the sink dry yet?\" asked the fariner, as lie made final preparations for the niight. \"Yes, Josiahi,\" she replied. \"WVhy. do you ask 1\" \"WelI, 1 did want a drink, but 1 guess 1 can get along until, iorn- ing. \"-Everybody's, A DouBiLE-EDGED QUESTION The late Bishop Fowler was pre- siding at a Methodist (Jonference when lie made a ruling that displeas- ed a prominent 'Methodist edîtor who was preselit. The editor eprang to bis feet and paraphrased a verse from the Ninety- frst Psalm: \"Deliver me from the snare of the fowler!\" he shouted. Before lie could go further Bishop Fowler calmly broke in and complet-. ed the quotation: \"And from the nol- some pestilence! \" And the editor had nothing more to say-The iSatur- day Post. A CusSUAVE Lord Crewe, who telle many a good Story, relates the following concerni- ig hie father, bite late Lord Ilough- ton., In a second-hand dealer's shop in \\\\ardour Street onie day Lord llougbton saw and admired a por- trait of an admirai in f ull uniforin. Ile offereod £,5 for it, but the dealer refused to part with il for less than £7 1Os. As neither would give way the picture reinainedl where il was. Not long afterwards, while visiting at a country bouse, Lord H1ougliton saw the picture hiarging in the dining- room. Fle went towards it with an e-xclaimation of' surprise. - Hu1l1o! what have you got hereï -\" Oh titat ie a portrait that bas just been be- queatited to us,\" replied hie host, a rather vulgar, boasting mnan. -11; ia the portrait of one of Nelson 's ad- mnirais, an ancestor of ours.\" \"Was lie, inideed?\" commented Lord H1ougliton. \" A montit ago lie was wvithin two pouiids leu of becoming one of mine.' '-The Tatlr. \"An' h2@. yoebumband thiàruorninW, M, m. Tarmon ? -h 0hhe'â. f' b.d. Thc. dovtur aid hi. temperait.re ha. gon to one hundred and fifty.- -Nae. n.yo,~ made atk. Sand,', tern- rleattirt cou1d newr h am muckle am one hunt(red and tt: at 1-t' no in thi. wed'-ltoMer",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE TrîE M.uzzL=r WoLvEs \"The wolves were upon us,\" lie ielated to the girl lie was trying to imipress. \"Their liowling penetrated to our very marrow. We fled for our lives. But each second we knew that the ravenous pack was gaining ou us. Closer, closer-at last tliey were so close that we could feel their muzzles ~against our legs so that-\" \"Ah,\" uiglied the lady, greatly re- lieved. \"Ilow glad you must have been that they lad their miuzzles on!t\"Evterybody's Magazine. 11AVE SNows, DE\u0026u A young Montrcaler went to Lon- ~don last winter and was making a ,cail upoii a pretty young womaui whom lie lad met there for tlie first timne. \"Do yen have reindeer in Can- ada?\" asked the young lady. \"No, darling,\" lie answered. \"At this season it always snows.\"-h MI-oit real Herald. WA\u0026NTD TO SWAP Two Kansas City lawyers, wh\u003c names are witlileld for obvious r, sons, deelare that thley were presý when the following incident oeci red : Unele Mose was a clironie thief vw usually managed to keep withiin 1 petty-larceny limit. One time lie m~ calculated, however, and was sent trial on a charge of grand larceny. ',Have you a lawyer, Mose?1\" a! ed the court. ' 'No, sali.'' \"Well, to be perfeetly fair, Ill i point a couple. Mr. Joues and ! Brown will act as counsel.\" 'Wliat's dat? \" \"Act as your lawyers-consi with tliem and prepare to tell me wl ther you are guilty or flot guilty.\" \" Yas, sah. \" Mose talked to lii attorneys for few moments in husky whispers. T judgecauglit only the word alibi, s( eral times repeated. Then Mose aro scratched hi8 liead, and addressed t court \"Jedge, yoli Honah,\" lie sa: \"Cou 'se Ah's only an igu 'ant n- gali, an' Ah don' want toh both yoh Honali, but Ah would suttir like toli trade, yoh Honali, one dese yeali lawyers foli a witness.\" FJverijbody's Magazîne. MUST IlUxuRY UJ Mr. ' harles Leacli, M.P., the a thor of a determined effort to curti the lengtli of Parliamentary speecb in the British Commons, was ait o time a noted Congregationalist mi ister. One of lis stories concerus \"Passive Resister,\" wlio, speaking a crowded meeting about bis favoi: ite topic, apologised to the cliairri for the lengtli of diseourse by sa iug: \" Sir, 1 am not speaking at pr( eut to this inagnificent audience, I a speakiug to posterity! \" \" Then hur up, old chap 1\" was the chairmar audible retort, \"or the young be gars will be liere before you've fi ished t\"",
         "CANÂDIÂN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER 29 - has - the taste,** a certain\"zest and piquancy of flavor yoi C-an' find in any other cheese. Besides it beig so damnty a delicacy in itself, it can be served in dozens of tasty ways. A t all Gro.et s- $C. ? .Pkt, Maautactured by- U .h g e rm l Pa cking C ., Zngersoll - OntA T HERE\u003eS no pleasure in .buying candy that mnay prove a disappointmient. The very certainty of get- tmng candy that wîll mieet your high anticipations of deliciousness makes it worth while to always in- sist upon -Ë-4e Bonbons and Chocolates. They are macle right here in Toronto. 130-132 Yorgeg Street, Toronto SOI-- Ai..,:. E-ey-h.ru The body-buildîng power of BOVRIL proved go be from 10 to 20 thunes th1e amnount maen. In a series of remarkable experiments conduicted under the direct contvoi of one of the foremost phy-iologists of the day, an amount of Bovril proportionate to the smiall black oblong bas been proved to produce an increase in flesh and muscle corresponding to this large outline oblong, showing the body- building power of Bovril to be from 10 to 20 times the amnount taken. I cold weikrâuatbâer Bovril is the concentrated Zoodness of the best of beef. In cold weatber, a cup of bot Bovril warms the whole body and forti- fies the systemn against the encroacbments of disease-it builds up the weak Constitution and strengthens tbe strong one. Buy a bottle to-day.",
         "CÂNÂDIÂN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER obbyTIreai The World's Best 'I is now \"Made i Canada \" in tis 1 Million Dollar DOMINION Tire Fact T HE demnand across the Line for the I Tread \" Tire keeps four great Ar factories busy. Its superiority has beeri demonstrated both there and here in Carna We have secured the Canaia4an rights to patented designs and exrclusive processes whIi mmade U, S \" Nobby Treads \" the world's best. erected the big factory you see below, and eq, with duplicates of ail the special machines uaed ini great factories of the U. S. Tire Comnpany. The product of this factory, the DOMINION Tre;ad,\" is certainly th2e best tire that has ever be on Canadian soif, and bas no superior in ai country. It has the smre absolutely Non-Skid IlNobb3 whic'h was worked oçut in co-operation b\u003e' theM",
         "CÂNADIÂN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER 13 Robu8t Healdth rincipally upon the sturdy foundation of Right Food. -st-then nutrition to meet the law of daily waste and repair of ad nerve ceils. But,-the food must contain all the essential here cannot be robust health. preservatives are not permitted by the pure food laws ; but the ?rohibit miliers from Ieaving out of some kinds of flour certain 2eat berry which coutain vital minerai salts-grow-n in the grains id necessary for the normal balance of body, brain and nerves. food i isible for many common ailments. food i",
         "82 \u003cJNÂDIÂN MAGAZINE ÂDVEBTIBER Ail Speed Record, Are made on the UNDERWOOE ATthe annuat typewriting conte! for the World 's Championshi held ini New York City on Oct. 2ý 1913. Margaret B. Owen usiDg thi Underwood Typewriter wrote 792 words in one hour-a net speed aft4 deducting 5 words for every error, d Record for 8Yeats, Allwon onte UnIerwoed 125 words a minute. Words For 19ar6 Frt Mir7 ,Elet\u003een Undenoood operalors in ihi$ 1907 Rose E. Fritz.......87 contasi wrote over 100 words a minute. 1908 Rose L. Fritz.......7 190 Rose L. Frit,.......95 1910 M.. Masdl United Typ\u003eewriteir Q) Ltd. 191 0 7aI TORONTO 1 193 Zgare B wen ...125OFFICES IN ALL CANADIAN CITIE DAME FASHION'S DECREES ___are as rigid inrn atters of correspondence as they are in matters of dress. Even more so, in fact, because one's letters must convey the i personality of the writer. Women who rightly regard their correspondence as à particular social pleasure, are careful to use BARBxR-ELLIS",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER",
         "GÂNADIÂN MAGAZINE ADVERTISEE 10 Rodders' Name and Rodgers' Q)ualit: lhe test of time and are better known a.nd morE after generations of use than ever before reqire cutlery of any kind and wish the very best, Ltion of Rodgers' that has been growing for 250 years tisfy you that Rodgers' is the best to buy. Joseph Rodgers \u0026 Son\u0026, Limited Cullers Io Ht. Majesug SHEFFIELD, ENGLAY4D \u003en Copies Would Save Your",
         "CANÂDIÂN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER . .. ..... of the\" \"Rgulation\" WMUMF W Styles. M 1Home Billiards-- \u0026y on. \"Made in Canada\" 'Tables! Play the royal gamne of billiards on tables miadé in Canada. The makers of the celebrated Brunswick Billiard Tables offer you a splendid oppor- to secure any size or style of table ait low cost and on easy terms. These masterpiece tables have held undisputed supremacy for more than sixty years. The nine BRUNSWICK on a billiard table is the symlol of highest excellence. BRUNSWICK illiard Tables - Ideal Gifts As a birthday gift for mari or boy, a Brunswick Billiard Table heads thelisýt. It wiIl le a lifetime of finest entertainment. r Famous \"Baby Grand\" and \"Convertible\" Styles Int addition to our many splendid styles of regulation-size tables, we offer a variety of ,u styles Ii special home sizes. Brnwck \"Baby G~rand\" Styles of Billiard, or Pocket- Biliuard Tables are made of Mahogany, ,ith inaddesign. Richly fiaished. tlnexcelled playing qualities. Sizes 3 x 6, 3,k x 7, 4 x S. The illustration at Ofaesosone o thbe \"Baby Grands.\" Busik\" Convertible \" Styles of Billiard or Pocket-l3illiard Tables can be used in any rooun. Tbey hadoe Dining Tables Library Tables or Daienports when not in use for billiard playitig. Sizes 3 x 6 x7 qalinplavingqualitiest0 BabyGranid.\" daeii Canada A Year to Pay lae T roughout the World Complet. Pl.aying Outfit Fre. $Wc ilad Tables are MADE IN CANADA Any size or style of table cari be purchased on easy edecuiey by tIie %%orld's eue experts. Eacb terms. We spread the paynients over an entu-e year. ý xmlofexpert cabinet work, Fitted wvitb The prc of each table includes copiplete high-wad 'eteclbated Mnnarch Quick-Acting Cusb. TPlaying Outfit, Cues, BalIs, Bridge, Rack, h.lk. glspr1cai ngcqualities, scien- A ssorteil Tipa, Lightning Cue Clamps, Markers, Lover, 1htutini datail. Fursbe in Mahogany, Billiard Brusb, Rules, Book on \"How to Play,\" Etc. D.pt. N. BranchE",
         "36 CÂNÂDIÂN MAGAZINE ADVERTmSER Aski Your Grocer For Aseai JBrasgd Coffee -use it for breakfast tomorrow -and note the satisfied smile as your husba-nd enjoys his morrnng cup. 145 Chase QL Sanborn, Nontreal. gqn -THE \"UPTON\" FLAVOR- W.. in ams and llies is the motdeli- cious thtcati be obtained, because thesu Goods are made from only the purest of Fruits under the most hygien- ic conditions-The natural f Iavor of frcsh fruits. Try an order of UPTON'S on your next Grocer-y List",
         "CÂNADIAN MAGAZINE ÂDVEBTISER 37 \"Eat. Bread\" 0f course you should \"eat more bread\" and less meat-but be sure your bread contains.ail the body-building material in the whole wheat grain prepared in a digestible form. The only bread that fulfils ail these requirements is Shredded Wheat Biscuit the natural, elemental food, flot \"treated\" or comnpounded with aniything-contains no yeast, nio bakrng powder, no chemîcals of any kînd- JU8t pure, whole wheat steamn-cooked, shredded and baked. Served with hot mnilk à makes a nourishing, satisfying dish for a cold day. AIwayg heet the. Bisuit in~ the. oven to r.stor. crispues. Two Shredd.d Wheat Biscuits with hot miUk or cream wili supply ail the, en.rgy ne.d.d for a haif day'. work. Try TRISCUIT, the, Shredded Wheat Wafer, for luncheon with butter, chocs. or marnmilade. Made only by CMANADIN SHREDDED WHEAT COMPANY, Limit.d, NIAGARA FALLS, ONT. TORONTO OFFICE: 49 WELLINGTON STREET E.",
         "88 \u003cJÂNADIÂN MAGAZINE ADVERTISEE Most Important of al MAPLE LEAF LABEL A food that is at onice ap- petising, nourishing and easy to digest. Do you sometimes overlook thi s important purchas e? COWA 'l' q ;",
         "CÂNÂDIÂN MAGAZINE ÂDVERTISER 39 6ier4e rrGobinaé îo Ya ?izos of\u003eete Your Longing For Music Easily Satisfied Fromn a rag-time with its irresistible lilt, to, a woods-poemns of MacDowell's is a long stop. You may enjoy cither, or very Iikely both. In any event you can satisfy your taste if only you Possess a Gerbard Heintzman P LAYER PIANO (Wkich anyoize can play-ANYONE) Why'go througb the rest of your ie with a Ionging for music? Why 'lot satisfy that longing for music now ? Y011 can produce any miusic on the GERHARD HEINTZMAN. You cati put into that music your own feeling-your own intrepretation ; it's WAonderful what a power this puts into your untrained hands. Every day you put off getting this great boon is a day lost. 'Your old instrument taken in part payment-convenient termns arranged. Send for art b9oklet giving fullest information. Our on/y City salesroomnS are GERHARD-IHEINTZMÀN, Limited - 41-43 Queen St. West, TORONTO (Opposite City Hall) Sal.srooms in Hamnilton next to Poot Office.",
         "40 CÂNÂDIÂN MAGAZINE ÂDVERTISER Have you seen the new TOOKE Shirts with the This is",
         "CÂNADIAN MAGAZINE ÂDVERTISER 41 ~AND HEALTH TO ROTH MOTHER AND OHILO Recoord of Ovor Slxty-FivO Yoare. )r over sixty-five yesrs Um. Wla- l'a Bootldng 8yrup lias been usedM motiier. for thoir children while jýý king. Ar. yon dluturbed st aight broken of your reut by a icelcild. Brang and erying with pain of Out- Teethl If so send at once and g et jI Dttie of \"1Mn. Wînslowa 's oothing '\u003e for Children Toething. The I Wle in calculable. It will relieve the m* little sufferer immedistely. De- dupon it, motheru, thero inano mis. ýe@ tiie Btomaeh and Bowels, cures 'd Colle, sottens the Guins, re- s es Inflammation, and gives tone .Onervy to the whole system. \"Mr.OR N PPR Iteeting in rup\"n or eae- Insulre yourself wjith are \u003copy' sharp, non..smudging, je th pros ptln of ne f tii Ist. Save mnoney with the carbon pape! that is aIlvays et and bout femile physiclans and uniform, acts the samne in dr weaterorwet, doesn't dry 'ses i tiie United States, and le for out nor skin over, and whowe remarkale durability by ail druggiots thoghu; h makes one sheet Kood for at least lOOletters Forclean, thronhoutpermnanent, reliable records- 'M. Priee twentiy-tlve cents a bot writefor Vottr F-REfE Shedt Note Be sure and Mli for 1'r\u0026. Win. F. S. WEBSTER CO., 303 Cent\"»s St.,Iuo.Eu W's EoothIng Byrup.*\" Makels o! Str Brad g,.star j!= M.l ____________________________________ UnItmI Tfflwriter Ce.,. Ltd., 7-9 Adlola St.E.Toatu ~UALTY ersus STYLE A well dressed Gentlemen is more particular about the quality of his clothes than he is of the style. VICKERMANS Serges, Woirstedi and Ch.4leviots have a history dating back over 120 years and are acknowleddgd throughout the world as the best goods produed B. VICKERMAN \u0026 SON'S L TD. The Name Trade Mark every 3 yards beISBET \u0026 AULD, LIMITED - - TORONTO Wholesale Sellitg Agents in Canada",
         "CÂNÂIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTIBER T HERE'S an air of quiet elegance and good taste about Penmans Hosiery which men and women of refinement are. quick ta note. Penmans Hosieryý is knil-to-Jorm -wilhoul-arseam --the Penman wag, which imsures velvety comfort, longer wear and lasting shape- hiness while it makus ripping and darning mere memories associated wîth ordmnaiy hose. You can buy this vastly better hosiery at the",
         "CÂNADIÂN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER 43 Office is Complete d 71 *Standard Lock- it ta yourself and a sanitary recepti- thes. The D. L. er possess a quality, ýd appearance cliffer- r ta those of the .ach Locker is a unit. .abinets of any size ts; you can add to The Cromwell Of sturdy simplicity in design, with the strength and weight of each piece in the right place, the Cromwell is a pat- tern of wonderful superiority. Finished bright, it has the ap- pearance of sterling. Like ail 1847 ROGERS BROS. ýSYilver Plate that Wears\" it is made ini the heaviest grade of silver plate and 's sold with an unquahlfed guarantee macle possible by an actual test of over 65 years. Most Popular for Gifts",
         "44 CANÂDIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER DO YOU KNOW TIIAT THE PRESENT RUSH SETTIERS TO CANADA REPRESENTS A NEW SETTIER EVERY MINUTE 0F OUR WAKINO IIOURS? Have you ever CONSIDERED what makes CANADA suc/s an A TTRA CTIVE FIELD for SETTLEMENT? The Canada of today is a land of Peace and Plenty, a place of Sunshine and Big Crops, a country whose soil speils WHEAT and out of whose farms thousands are growing rich. the",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTJSER",
         "46 CANADIÂN11 MA(\u003eAZINE ADVERTISE, THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE Makes this Grand Offer to You Subsc 'ribe for the Canadian Magazine for two years at the regular priCC and receive a lot 33 x 120 feet at East New Hazelton, Free ( with the exception of a small fee to cover cost of surveying, delivery of deed, etc.). Each and Every New Subscriber wiIl Receive a Lot New Hazelton Station, on Grand Truuk Pacifîc Railway Reservation now open. You must hurry if you want a clioice lots Grasp This Opportunity NOW. There are no strings to this of fer. The reputation of The Canadian Magazine ÎS Y\u003clur ample guarantee that every staternent made here is genuinely true. East new Hazelton adjoins the weII establishcd town of New Hazelton, in a di5tr'ct Îmmensely wealthy in coal and, and a variety of ruinerais, and fringed by soute of the fn5 productive farm country ini the world. This is No Fake Scheme 1 Manager Prensium Department, Jt wiII s;tand a thorough investigation. 302 Webster Building, Thse Canadiams Magnzine is ini the publishing businessqYn no lýndlv @end meconnplete information in regard in the real estate bu4iness, but is offering the*e lots as a ~cI t tlot, in last.NewHiazelton you àre offc*rinig inducement ta' get your, suitsenptioti. your Magazine as a special inducement. INVESTFG4T£ THIS OFFER NOW Naine -ý...... -........ ... Write or Phione Main 2978, Manager Premlum Dept. Addruss...,-................... ..... ....... The Canadian ldagalae, 302 Websiter Building, Pliont .... 53 Yenu Street, Toronto.",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINIE ÂDYEERTISER 4 The latest figure can only be obtained by Proper corseting. T/he latesi \"La Diva\" French Models made in Silk Knit ýo Peau de Suede, Ti îcots, Ticots % Elastïques, Tangos, Slip-on Elastic Corsets, Linen Mesli, Etc., are the last word of thse corset »mkers art. Sold at reasonable prices by leading dealers throughout Canada, Australia, Etc. If your dealer cannot supply you a request to us will bring you a copy of our catalogue and the name of our nearest custoiner. The Dominion Corset Co. - - Quebec The Don =*ion Corset Co. Quebec",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTIBER ' STYLE er Plate",
         "CÂNADIÂN MAGAZINE. ADVEBTIME eW;i;\u0026m 1,ShavingSoeps end you w~iI 6e, Ivin lme because they give a quick and coplous lather that 'I speedily softens the beard and remains cool and moist as long as you need it. Vi Filer because they prepare the beard perfectly for the razor ~and make shaving a relax- ation. j il orybecause yogi will anticipt ~ony your shave with a smile of satisfaction and flot with a frown of annoyance. IvIn 6Perbecause they will make your Off er i razor and yourself the best of Suit Case Sets friends and leave a happyface In order that those soft and velvety as a hoy's. wihou e tie requisites may have an opportu- nity to try some of them, we have IVI .ecuse80 îtti isre-prepared very attractive sets of PkMOl~y oapSuit Case Sets\" and \"Women'a ÀOIM quired to make a big, thick, suit case set.\". These are hand-",
         "50 CANÂDIÂN MÂGÂZINE ÂDVEBTIBER See Your Pimples .1 Rid 5,of ail skin disorders must begmn with the smetics, etc., will do no material good. The and there the remedy must be applied. esire quick action and at the same time ac mies s blood purifier, then Stuart's Calcium Calcium Wafers 'ay Like Mauic.\" Just",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ÂDVE1TIBER The Varnish That Makes It Easy To Keep Floors Clean This wonderful' durable varnish protects and keeps beautifut your linoleum and hardwood floors under the severest use. Mopping and scrubbing won't hurt floors finished with Liquid Granite. Lt imparts a smooth, g1\u0026os s y \u003e:t surface so tough and elastic that soap and water won't dim its -4*R lustre or lesson its OTHER'd urability. An Id9al Finish for Linoleum Liquid Granite gives perfect Other celebrated Berry Brothers proÇtection to linoleumn and oi products are Luxeberry White Ný EniameI, unequalied for bedroos clt, besides being the best ý.bath roomns, etc.; Luxeberry Woo varnish to put on wood floors. 'Finish, for interior woodwork; t ~ eal ppledandlats orLuxeberry Spar Varnisfr, for I sesy pleanlstfo natural woods exposed to severe Years. outside weather. It is especially good for floors Fifty-six year's experience in var- were war is excessive, such as in nish making stand as the guarantee kicens and pantries. Liquid Graq- of these finishes. ikeeps your linoleum from havink Your dealer seils Berry Brother's tha won, aded appearance common Varnishes. Ask hîim about them or Wihunvarnished floors. write us direct. BERRY BROTHERS, INCORPORATED JVorld's Largest Varnish Meerm Sinc r858, W.JJoerville, Ontario.",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER __ _The Extr",
         "Z iCANWI)L]N MAGÂZINE ADVERTISER tis the 1 a I",
         "54 CANÂDIÀN MAGAZINE ADVEBTISEB Pic $650. _--",
         "OÂNÂDIAN MAGAZINE ÂDVERTISEE 5 .e ail Flutter and Confusion Office Specialty Systein Desk bas none of the disadvan- es of the ordinary fiat desk and the antiquated roll desk- m\u003ee of the inconveniences that unfailmngly arise from a 1 desk top. vertical file drawer for correspondence and matters pend- Ar drawer in which to keep business facts and figures of ir interest, and three drawers of vaied sizes for misceil- ,tems. these file drawers for current records Icaves a clear desk-top mits of concentrated attention upon the subject in band. sans quicker and better work. See, then adopt the System Desk. .di and demonstrated ai our showrooms. Catao or Represeotative at your requett. HEAD OFFVICE: 97 Wellington Street West, TORONTO EqUipment Stores: Montroa, Ottavr.affz Wing, Regina, Calgar~y,",
         "56 OAKADIÀNl MÂQÂZIE ÂDVERTISER Clark's Pork and Beau The value of BEANS as a strength producing food needs no demonstration. Their preparation in appe- tising form is however a matter entailing considerable labor in the ordinary kitchen. CLARK'S PORK and BEANS save you the time and the trouble. They are prepared only from the finest bearis conxbined with delicate sauces made from the purest ingredients in a factory equipped with the most modern apliances. They Are Cooked Ready. Sfrnply Warm Up The Can Before Opening.",
         "CANÂDIÂN MAGAZINE ADVEIRTISER 57 U nder clothing flot Underwear CEETREH\" Undorclotbing has arned itanano. It is clothing. It is 111-fashloned and sixaped to fit in the 2aklug. \"CEETEE\" makes the outoe [of)thng ar abst and ls always \"CHETREH\" Underclothng la FOR HANDKFrRCHIEF, TOILET \u0026 BATH. )r people who are paxticular about DLGTULERSIO leir appoarance, health and comfort. EG FUL RFESI . 1 \" CEETEE \" Underclothing is made onIlLAUA KP , Naew oan d Motra the softest, finest Australian M-rino Wool _______\u0026_ KEMP,_New_____________________ wool is put through careful and thorough uents of comubing ani scouring that çotuoves dparticle oi foreign matter and leave ever3 Las,soft aud dlean as hunianly possible. ~EETEE \" Underclothmtý is so soft that itwmi.1Ps.\".\" ua ut irrtate even an infant s skin. Ail jon Fathbun* Pa.cuivy7txe hlltted together (not sewvn) nwking oach Fatem usdecle'Yh ent practically one piece with no s,-anls. It bco deteainOffice Bak a rpgh ts Eýry armýýti. shaped Shoadoe aeÀmm ~t form,Y tus rendering it comfortable, easy in ____be ox f50\u00261ý ar, snd perfect fitting. YouJîat..d r 10 15 2\u002625». lese are the rossons why \" CE E T E E\" SdlÂfjïI b..E 10W 10 MJN. rthng is in a dlass by itself, and i, ogHd . K. MFG. CO.. Syacu.. N. Y. Wli'n l'y the ,Rest Peope. SONd Iy Mec Best Dealers. BI\u003cUT GAMES FOR 10 CENTI ChesS. Checkers, Fox and Geese. Nino Mon, Morris, Auth Manufcturd byIntroduction Ga'ne, Spanish Prsn Dominoes; a C- URBUL C. f alt Lintedwhlw ' samseen and the whole t.hing iot only 1 ~. URIUL C. fGàtIJilt Bnd .Oc todav and ztail oight garnie.-L. A. 'GAUIt HEATHCOTE, ONTARIO. ~Ai8u tmp.nufacturers of Turnbuir's U~dAMEW destroys the poison producung \"h-Cass R\"JdUdewa orY G U T r in the colon, prevents r \"dies a.nd Cilr.Turnuat forldae clinto ofF 1UtI%1IeU cr s freedomtron is Bads t01 Infants, adTýCEnbus toftoe adeet age.alc ;ustio oo cruain n ev SheeqKni Seaer oas.information. TE URT 0L 1t.2. OloverdaIs 17\u003e B ., I ý - - 1 WHFM Y01112 FYFQ NFF CAl Lors, ce \u003eIN,",
         "GÂNÂDIÂN MÂGÂZIn« ADVERTISER",
         "CANADIÂN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER 59 of discriminating tastes \u003ere and more delighting .ends with gifts of 1 Swan\" ens. Practical presents rule and in selecting :s this year you can a more practical one more uni- appreciated, ! \"Swan.\" d MABIE, New York Fountperis meet every requirement of the mnost fastidjous so completely that thorough satisfaction is assured. Writes with a velvety touch and an easy, eyen, steady flow; will not leak or Mlot your fingers. Ini making Up your Christmap list re- member almost everbody needs a foun- tain pen and everbody wants the hest. At all jewelers, stationers and druggists,ýey where. Stanidard $2.50 atd up., \"Sàifety 3O0 and up, with - Little Windou B $ 3.50 and up. Write for fflustrated folder. 124 York St., Toronto ndo., Exigland ris Sydney Brussels LEC",
         "10 OÂNÀDIÂN MÂGÂZINE ÂDVERTISER If I Ate That, I Would Die You Will Neyer Fear Food If You Go to a Dinner Carry ing One Little Stuart's Dyspepsia Tablet« You needn't pass up ail those savory dishes just because you are nîraid of what the stomach will say to them, Armed with a box of Stuart's Dyspepsia Tablets, you can bid defiance to the most cantank- erous stomnach anxd be assured that your food will be perfectly digested ini spite of the stomach's objections. a",
         "CÂNADIÂN. MAGAZINE 1INVERTI8ER el ,et KODAK, Id interest and zest 'to \u003eur winter evenings. Make the most of' the fun of sh.-ight work and the fascina- ri pf developing and prînting. No dark room by the Kodak' stem-and every step simple, SY, understandable. ýýet a copy of our interesting and instructive littie î At Home with the Kodak.\" It shows many ak hme portraitsý and how to make them. Free at 'dealers, or by mail. AN KODAK CO., Limited, TORONTO. St. Viateur R C. Gkurch, Montreat Roofed wtith ASBES TOSLA TE. Public Buildings are Best Protected by Roofs of From the4 huge \"Dominion Building\" ln the Toronto Exhibition Grounds, and the new 'Machinery Hll' li thi. Ottawa Fair Grounds, te the flttie Publie Shelter recently erected on Fletcher's Field, Montreni, ail kinds of Public Buildings, all bver Canada, are being roofed with ASBESTOSLATE. Railway Stations, School Houses, Hosptas. Churches. Towvn Halls, Power Plants, Icirels, or l.\u003eusc- these are some of the rnany buildings on which ASBESTOSLÂTE is giving perfect service. Made of Portland Cernent and Asbestos, fbrmed under enormous pressure into \"Sh'f 1es\" of varions shapes, sizes and ,,I.,,-ASBESTO AýTEO..ake,, roofs that are absolutely fire and weather proof\u003e bandsoe in ap- pearance and practically everlastmng. If yen are interested in any public building, or are plan. ning to bnild for vourseilf write for full particulars and samples of ÂSBÉSTOSLATE, te Departreent C. M. Asbestos Manufacturing Co., Limited Addr.u.: E. T. Bank Building, 263 SL Jams Street, Montv.àl Factory at Lachine, P. Q. \u003cnear Montreal). L illi",
         "63 CAITÂDIÂN MAGAZINE ÂDVERTIBER May W. Send You This Book FR El 'Why Man of Toda is only 50?o Efficieni This book, wnitten by a well kno' pbyuicw.n, is a niost interesting treatiso a subject of great importance: that keeping Up to \"Concert pitch\" and se\u003c ing that 1 00% of efficncy so nocesE to meet sxicceoufully the business or 80 requirements of the present age. You wiII leounsmomething about youl that you nover Imew before by res\u003c this book, which wi11 be forwarcbed m~ out cost if you mention The Canadian Y. azme. sp Chas. A. Tyrrell, M.D. Room 353. 280 Coleoge St, Toronto, 0",
         "CÂNÂDIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTI8ER 63 id are the owners of \"ROSS\" Rifles- e somthing to say 'this is the same make of rifle which won the King's Bisley, England, and the individual Palma Trophy at Camp Perry, Ohio, i..\" -no other rifle ever achieved this dual success. 'ýoss\" Sporting Rifles are not ouly moat accurate and powerful but they .emely speedy, an important point in big gamne shootiiig. The \"ROSS\" action is the safest and quickest made. Fancy placing five shots in .conds in a strip 4 feet 6 juches by 5 ince iether for yourse1f or as a gift, you canuot get a better rifle. 'oss .28o Higkh Velocity Rifle $55. on. ROSS .280 SpOrting Cartridge $7.o pet i0o. Other Ross Model.vfrom $25.oo. 'f your dealer can not supply you, write for illustrated catalogue and full information ta 'S RIFLE CO. - Quebec, Can. AFTER the day's work- a bottIt of 0'Keefe's \"Pilsener\" Lager. çUitci a ilu r uiay -der a case frein",
         "64 GNÂDIÂN MÂGÂZINE ÂDVERTISR - y Traveller's Departm( * Subscribers to the Canadian Maga who are coeitemplating a trip for k~ Pý ness or- pleasure, either at home abroad, are invited to write us for information concemmig route,hotls, Suggestions for travel can be four the following pages, and should fu informiation b. desired it can be",
         "*65 CÂNADIÂN MAGAZINE, ÂDVERTISER iner Cruise th \"FRANCONIA\"an \"LACONliA\" S. 150 TONS \u003cTwn Scrows). (BUILT IN 1911-12). The. Nowost Stearners ttii.h Meclitrratkeau-Egyptian Servce and THE POPULAR 44'dé ~ tJ 20,000 TONS STEAMER CA O IV (Tw;n Screw, diterranean-Egyptian' Adriatic Service. \"'FRANCONIÂ\" Janu*ry Sth, 1914, \"LACONIA\" J...1,7 ZZsd, 1914 -CARONIA\" jauuary 31st, 1914 'FANCONIA' February 24tk, 1914f 'CARONIA\" Mlarch 17ti, 1914 ColLag at MADEIRA, GIBRALTAR, ALGIERS moAco or GENOA. NAPLES. ALIZANDRIA nad ADRIATIC PORTS. Faanooia Fsbruary will moi Procnd t. Eayet Stopovers Permitted. A la Carte Without Extra Charge Raturn te AniCrioa by Sunard srvces Fro ein sUterrBIBan \u0026 £Çypt; Fr081 Southiaton te Canada. Frein Livrrpol te New Yorkt or Bouton LUSITANIA and MAURETANIA Fastest Steames lin the Worid and CAISONSA. CARMANIA. CAMPANIA ppassasse Uoolced fr081 Londont and Parle. Tours Un Spaln, aise Threiagh Europe Oenerally. Round lte Warld Trips, $4SS Firet Stas; 588 Second BlaUM AGENTS FOI R M. .N.ce in * l TES ST.ESpi 'A-S CANADA Apply for illustratsi bokiste te",
         "SI OAIiÂDIAN MAGAZINE ÂDVERTI8ER FAA-KL\"L ..U % H TRA",
         "CÂNADI AN MAGAZINE ÂDVEBTISEB 6T idiness and Staunch Seaworthiness Are well known attributes of the DIAN NORTHERN STEAMSH IPS S. \"Royal Edward\" \"Royal George\" ;teamers in the British-Cafladlafl Service, which have created a new appointinent and exclusive f eatures ini ail classes of accommodation. WINTER SAILINGS Ç. T IOHIN. N.B. Frore BRISTOL",
         "OÀNÂDIÂN MAGAZINE, ADVERTISER iEN Pacifie Railway offers to the trn iid equipment second to none. operate their Compartmeflt 0 dard Sicepers, Dining Cars, ( Canadian Pacifie own and a line Pacifie cari ticket yo- ,- you to travel over éy on their own trains a .ZAVEI",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER As the Birds Southward FIy the Trend of Travel is along the Southern Raiiway- Premier Carrier of the South Open Witer, Delightful Clin-ate, Outdoor Life, Golfing, Tennis, Riding, Motorig, Complete RecreatiOn at- -lita, Ga., Aiken, S.C., Charles- PANAMA CAN' S.C., Sumnierville, s.c., coium- Up-to-date through Pulli bia, S.C., Savannahi Ga., including ])rawing Rooi h. Brunswick, Ga., Jackson- Roomn cars. Soutbern ville, Fia.. an)d al] ing car Service. S FLORIDA WINTEt USORTS Stop-over privileges are Direct Line ta Atlanta, Winter-Tourist Tickets Ga , Birmingham, Ala., N.C , and other points i New Orleans and of the Sky. \" No extra Witer 2iurist TicAs nm on Ofl . I*r fu inform- ation, latrriec bookleis. etc., ommu?îicete -11h eWther of the foU owing; SOUTHERN RAILWAY OFFICES NEw Vo'uc-AIex S. Tbhwe.tt, E. P. A. 264 Fitth Ave. MONTEAL PQ.-G W.Carer.Trav, Passenger Aget, S. LwreceBoulevard. nan Service, in and State Railway din- allowed on ýý at Asheville, u n the \"Land .harge. n Screw Line New York ta Bermuda Go TBERMUDA 40 Hours f rom Frost to Flower's Twin Screw S. S. \"Bermudian\" 10518 ton@ Displace.m.nt. ,Suites de luxe with private battis. Orchestra. Le; electric fans; wireless telegraphy, sutimarine signallUng. Fastest, er Ianiing passangers at the dock in Bermuda witIhout transfer. winter 60 degrees. Golf, Tennis, Boating-, Bathing and Cyciing. Ly a: 10 ar. .W YORK AND WEST INDIA UNE \"1Guiana\" and other Steamers fortnightly for St. Thomas, St. Croix, S aune, Domnika, Martinique, St. Lucia, Barbadoes and Demerara, F Tho@.. Cook \u0026 Son, 65 yog St-, R. M- MOI' 'nto ste., S. J. Sharp, 19 Adelaide St. East, o.tAoei Navigation Co., Toonto.",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISEE ore, are reaaiiy on b",
         "CÂNÂDIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER lie Allan Line, Ste amship Co., Ltd. LARGEST STEAMERS CANADIAN ROUTE LIVERPOOL - GLASGOW - HAVRE - LONDON ST. JOHN, N.B.7to LIVERPOOL-ROYAL MAIL SERVICE Saturday 3 januiary GRANIPIAN Wednesday, 4 February MrWednesday, 21 januaryl1 VICTORIAN tg 18 t HALIFAX, N.S. ta LIVERPOOL-ROYAL MAIL SERVICES VIAN Wedneqday, 7 January 1CORSICAN Saturday 24 january Saturday, 17 el 1 ALSATIAN 94 31 e PORTLAND, ME. to GLASGOW N Thursday, 1 -January 1 SICILIAN Thursday, 12 Febriiary el 15 le 1NUMIDIAN le 26 e BOSTON, MAS rsday, 8 january et 22 le JOHN, N.B. to: irsday, 1 january 'RIAN q LONDON S'IAN Thursday, 5 Fe \"t 19 Thursday, Turbine S.S.\" arnished steame Ij,,es rngers.",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVEBTISEE THE DOUBLE TRACK WAY THROUGH CANADA Fast Limited Trains are operated between Portland, Me., Boston, Mass., Montreal, Que., New York, N.Y., and Toronto in the East, to Chicago, 111. in the West, and through connecting lines, all points in the Southern and Western States and Western Canada are reached. FINE EQUIF\u003eMENT The equipment on the trains of the Grand Trunk is of the highest standard. Electrie lighted Pullman Sleeping Cars on night trains and high-grade Parlor- Library, Dining and Parlor-Library-Cafe Cars on day trains. Handsome Club Compartment Cars are operated on night trains between Montreal and Toronto. Trains leave Montreal at 10.30 p.m., and Toronto at 10.45 p.m. THE \"INTERNATIONAL\" LIMITED The train de luxe, runs every day in the year between Montreal, Toronto, Hamilton, London, Detroit and Chicago. This train is one of the finest and fastest long distance trains in the world. The Chateau Laurier The Fort Garry The new $2,500,000 hotel, situated Located in Winnipeg, on the same in the heart of Ottawa, Ont., the site as old \"Fort Garry'\" of Indian capital of Canada, is one of the finest days. Centrally located. 300 roons. hotels on the continent. Aceeommo- dation, 350 rooms. Rates, $2.00 and Cost 2,000,000. The latest in otel upwards. European plan. construction. European plan.",
         "CÂNÂDIÂN MAGAZINE ÂDVERTI8EIR .1 u WYPT end the NIL£ class Tours to the ORIENT including Egypt the ,y Land, Greece, etc. Cultured leadership; samail )artiea. Frequent departures until March. Pro- IILE STEAMERS leave Cairo every few days during n for the Firet and Second Cataracts, the Sudan, ulurious private steamrers and dahabeahs for id private parties. 3OUTH AMERUCA sud prehistori. Attractive tour including Panama, 4. Program 45. VINTER CRUISES Canal, West Indics, Orient-India, Mediterranean, ýe World. Booking and fuIt information for ALL Programi 43. YItOITERRANEAN 'e Short Tours, including Algeria, Tunisia, the Ita1y, London, Paris, etc., leave at traquent in- ,ttu Mardi. Program 37. EUROPE rd Summer Tours comprising Tours de Lure and d Short Vacation Tours. Aso a special series at Pies. Program 32. Send for Pogram dcaired complet. chai of 155 Offices I parts of the world furmishes ialbd facilitiez for travelers. 108. COOK \u0026 SON EAL-530) St. Catherine Street West FO-Traders Bank Bldg., 65 Yonge St. Of (4 offies) BOSTON, PEIILÂDELPHIÂ, \u0026Go SA FANCISCO, LOS ANGELES. HOME AN4D .ABROAD WhaI You See on thle Peanma Canal The tropical amn usng out of the. Pacifc over the thaïtched huts of the. natIes; rare flowoes in splendid Pro- fusion; monkeys and parrots ehateig i the irees of the. dense, dank, junéle sud the. wonderful Canal, practically compLet snd with shipa passing through -ail tii.,.you will sec and more too, on NORTH GERMAN LLOYD PaamCmna-Wesl\u003clIesCMuses Juix. 14 Cuba, Panuma. Jamaica, Porto Rico, Bahama-22 day. ..... . $160 UP Feb. il Cuba, jamaies, Panama Venezula. T7in ac BabdaMrisue. \u0026fmsPat Risc. Bhas2% M s.....$175 up Mac. 19 Cuba, Panma, J=ama Poto Ric- 21 day... . . . . ....... 60U Cnuse te biemade by thý elaudldisubP 4 \"Gromer Ku,8.urat\" Wîîte for booket '*To ibe Cana] and Ca bea\" OILDCHSSCO..Gca.Agta.,5DroadwaY.N.Y Aj È. Clauenius \u0026 Co.. Cbicsao Jý Central Nati..I El., St Louis",
         "74 CÂN,\u0026DIÂN MÂGÂZINE ÂDVERTISER Take a coaà--a-nd-four' aon6 the \"divine Grand Canyon is a bc On one side a f orest c other a sudden wall thc ,t below. You look e Dolor and weird forms. is Earth a ns zî-veral iT and the airinei land's safety. chasms, just Ov the pixie inule-bac River, a ing trips the desei",
         "CANÂDIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER 75 BEAUTIFUL ~~RK gS~Ein the i ~E XT RE ME ~. Private Suites with B~ath, Up-to-date in every respect. In the healthiest part of the town, Cuisine excellent, Sanitation perfect. B00K L ET can be ohtai..d f\u0026on. Th. Canadian Magazin, Toronto, Canada. toACe is the vie from Parker's Hotel, Na les ?ln h frgrud h 4 ilresid..ce of Nals let Suburb; beyond the City and the B3ay. A magnificent panorama of unîntmuted loveliness with Vesuvius- rey Beacon of Anti- quity Stili keeipng watch and ward aver the MOST BEAUTIFUL CITY in the WORLD, ite'à notice Sdeliîons stréngth- p of Oxo can be prepared- 1Oxo Cubes. Prime beef coun- The wonderful food-inven- i'es tine - saves trouble. ICO eCu'be Wl-A, 6d '0 Start Any 7une, 1- y- ý Either Dir Eurorc.M eraef~ Travelers' Cheeks Goffl - «'\"",
         "CANÂDIAN 'MAGAZINE ADVERTISER 11JULIAN SALE.\" Fine Leather Goods TRAVIEL STEAMER C- WTH A WARDROBI TRUI The~ com~pact size ma the \"Berth-high\" stea: dogm r wardrobe trunk as",
         "CANADIÂN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER 1 1 3RIGHT HOME %~ SHAPPY HOME Zayo Lamp is one thing needed a cheerful and pleasant home. amp 7hite light is the best 7es, and its attractive --so1id brasa, nickel akes it an ornament in hted without removing r shade. Easy to clean Simple, durable and RESULTS USE ITE OIL it alt cef Points. I There is nothing quite so appctizing for Breakfast as Fearman's Star Brand Bacon. and at the prosent prics there is nothing more economical. Ask your Grocer for",
         "78 4JOAÂDIÂN MAGAZINE ÂDVEBTIBER __ Read what this Mother says: 'diI arn the mother of eleveni chi and bave brought themn a11 u Robinson's \"Patent\" Barley, sinc were a, fortnight old; they -E fine healthy, babies. My baby i just seven weeks old, and irn] daily. A friend of mine had e delicate baby which was gi-a wasting away, and she tried s kinds of food, and when I saw recornmended her the 'Patent' E and it is almost wonderful ho child bas improved since taki 1 have recommended it to 5 tuse Robinson's 'Patent' E SE Y it is unequalled.\" Goal Mrs. A .Goal 12 Mount Ash Roa Sydenhamu Hill *B\"MIMAI London, tart the Ne.w Year Right plenty of fresh air and exercise, eat plain, 5omne food and get plenty of sleep. A b( Pile ini digestirng",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ÂDVERTI8EB 79 Had we been satisfied to let the public do the \"proving\"-we could have marketed the \"R u s se11-XKn ig htV inq4uantities twelve months ago. ]But we pref erred .to prove it ourselves. Thousands of dollars and months of time were spent la re- finlug every detail of the Rus sel 'to a point where f urther ilnprovement couidnfot beforeseen._ The new Russell-Knight you buy to-day is a proven product '-free front every elemnent of uncertainty encountered in the purchase of most I1Cw cars. Former owners of other high-priced cars best appreciate the sterling merits of the Russeil-Knight. Their letters are offered in evidence. \"4-28,\" 1914 1142\"1914 3-Paaf.esger Roadster ...$3,200 3-Passenger Phaeton.. . S000 6-~seaeronin.... 250 7-Passenger Touring $5,00 All quotations F.O.B. West Toronto, Ru\u003essell Motor, Car Co., Limited liead Office and Factory, West Toronto BMuiast. et:. Toronto, Hamsilton. Nontreul, Winnipeg, Calgary, Vancouver, and Melbourne, Australie MJ1ade up Io a standard, not d\u003cwin ta a price.\" No. 5 Hall, Quebec, Nov. 25, 1913 Russell Motor Car Co., Ltd. West Toronto Dear Sirs. The \"Six\" 1 bought from you iast spring is the ninth car that I have had, the iast four being Russells, s0 I can speak freely from a few year's experience. The first Russell 1 hadwas a Model \"R.\" exchanging that for a \"38\". Both gave great satisfaction. My son is driving the \"M8\" now. lIn thi. car 1 thouglit 1 had the st word in motors but the 'Six' ixsuperioriti everyway. The last Russeils were about perfect but this \"Six\" ix a winner, We have taken numerous long tours but have neyer had the slightest trouble. It is the most com- fortable car I ever rode- in and my friends ail say the sanie, for it îx easier riding than an eiectric and more comfortable. The heatiâg system ix perfect. The second last car, a \"*3\u0026\" neyer had the engine opened ait the time 1 drove it and the \"Six\" seemns tc, more than equai that record. The engine runs botter and quieter and each dsy it rune more smoothiy. The car itseif glides aiong without a shock. It ix also very easy on tires and gasoline and so far as trouble goes, I don't know what the word rosans. It is great to think that this beautiful caris produoed in tins country. In mny es- timnation it but-classes sny, car moade or tmported into Canada to-day. Very truiy yours (NANMr ON PtEqiUKt\u003et",
         ";0 CÂN.ADIAN MAGAZINE ADVEILTIBER THE GROWING CUSTOM 0F MeLAUGlILIN VEIIICLES SE AR after year brings increased dernands for McLaughlin products. Year after year par- y ticular people are don anding that exclusive- ness of design, finish and execution in buggies and cutters that has dxaracterized McLaughlin Vehicles for nearly haif a century. Al that is new and beautiful-quality-grace--dignity- the extreme difference in body design without being bizarre, are poignant features of that perfection that desig'nates McLaughlin workmanship. A McLaughlin Vehicle represnts the best that can be had. The good name tb.y bear bas couic wi*I\u003e the years of service and splendid satisfaction given to çustornors. You can make no mistake in the purchase of one of our Vehicles. The uauie is a guarantee for ail that is new and everythiug that la best. McLaughlin products sell th.mselves. AGENTS IN EVERY LOCALJTY",
         "CÂNÂDIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTIBER si \u003eÇLughlin \u003e£odel M24 TWO PASSENGER. ROADSTER, $19260 F. 0. B. OSHAWA )ST bAST ING GIET tmore lasting and satisfying gift than a beautiful car that is so designed that it is simplicity itself. is nothing about our B-24 that any woman, even most delicato physique, cannot run with case .ssurance of safcty. Then the superb finish and y of the car itself will appeal to the woman of d taste. Ail 1914 ?Eod.ls e3uaotric1tr ig1hted \u0026Md etavteé. vice stations are located in ail principal Cities from Coast to Coast, in charge of competent men, who have been trained ini ail branuches utomobile factý\u003ery. This service is of inestimable value to the man Ks a car. Every .McLaughlin-Buick owner wifl receive prompt anid service, the kind that will insure him the motoring pleasure lie Write for Lilerature. WGlIIN CARRIAGE CO., Limited, OSHAWA EDMONTON; VNOVR VANCOUVER.",
         "82 GÂNÂDIÂN mÂGÂZiNE ÂDVERTISEB VwAlw# 1250 Completedy Equippedi. o. b. Toledo. Duty paia1. With elecric sarter andi genrlr4i.\u003c25 Awarded \"First Position\" at the World's Greatest Automobile Show THE extraordinary supremacy of the 1914 Overiand lias been offlclally recognlzed by the. Automobile Chamber of Commerce. Because the. Willys.Overland Company dld a greater volumn of busi- ness during 1913 than any other firm in this organization, it was awarded the position of honor at the. great National 1914 Automobile Show in the Grand Centrai Palace, New York City. Do you know that the. 1914 Overland is to-day the most souglit after car of its type in the. entire cl'vilized world? Even ln Detroit, the automobile hub of the world, there are more Overlands belng sold than any other car of this type. The Overland lias made, established and won for Toledo wilh Ils Indhdidual plants adone, the titie of the. second greatest automobile city in the world. lias it ever occurred to you that tbere must b. some substantial reason for such unparalleled succesa ? There is, and lier. it is. No otlwr factory i the ,oorld con 3ulld a cai the equal of duc 19 14 Overland for less thar $1.500 Our Price-$1,250 Thec motor is larger-but the price is lotver. The. wheelbase is longer-but the price is short,,. The tires are larger-but the. price 18 The new car lbas elciric lighI3 throughoui -even under the dash-bnt the. price 18 loio. It is magniflcently finished ini dark Brewster green, with rumiug boards and wheels to match, trimmed in. polished nickel ani aluminum-but the. price iS lower. Then tiiere is a larger tonneau, a jeweicd Stewart Speedomneter-a larger steering wheel, and deeper upholstery- but the, price is lower. There ~Is an Overland deaier near you. Se. hlm today. Luterature on request. Please address .Dept. .ý The Willys-Overland Company, Toledo, Ohio",
         "(JÂNADIÂN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER 83 'HE \" Sovereign \" 1913414 Model, is the 6.'only hot water boiler made that, will irn hard or soft coal or wood, and produce imuch heat therefrom as if it had been 'lit to burn that one kind of fuel, only. The \"Sovereign'. burns hard or soft coal or wood. Large fiarcd flues; a \"baffled\" fire travel and the larger ~St section arc the. featuresýJ that give the \"Sovereign\" creased heating efficiency l over the usual diesign of ýt Watcr boiler, and adapt it for burning any kind of )ai or wood.. Consult ou,' nea.rest representativ.e before youd /inally close arramgements regart#giw the heating of an\u003e' house, Pr building, in 2I)/ich you are interested Il is a Mistake to allouw specificatioins to hefilled on the assuisption that one good hot ivater boiter is \u003cSUgood asakother. -T'he \"Sos'erez*gs\" is superior in sezveralfeatures ofconstruction, the importance and efficae\u003e' ofwsvkch are quic-ki' recognized. [aylor:W Forbes Company, Limited ToOItO-1MKin St West Montreal-246 Craig St. West Vancouvr-107O Homer St. CtPh'4tead Office and Works. St. John, NB-W. H. Campbell, 16 Water Street ?:'b:CTh. Mechanics Supply Company Winnipeg-The Vulcan Iron Works, Limlted _ia5P D. McLaren, Llinited, 622 Nineth Ave. Hamilton, Ont.-W. W. Taylor, 17 Stanley Ave.",
         "CÂNÂDIAN MAGAZINE ÂDVERTI8ER SELL YOUR ME. Many unsuccessful manusci-.pts simply need * , , revision to make themn available. This I ca Forernost firms publish my own books, and recently editor for a leading magazine. Refe jack London, Winston Churchill, John Burn Address: EDITOR, 149 Wet 86th St., New Y. For Whooping Cough Spasmodic Croup Aithma, Sor. Tlsront Cols atah RTH N \"Uàed wh leyou sieep -S\"E O L R A simple, safe and effective tresament, avoiding drugs. rBear the script nanms of Vaporized Cresolene stops the paroxysm sof Whoopin g Stewart Hartshorn on label. Cougb and relieves spasmodic Croup at once. Get lImproved,\" no tacks requlired. It is a BOON to sufferers fromn Asthrna. Wo oes rnRgr The air carryngthe antiseptic vapor, inspired wvitb _______________ every breath, mksbreathfig easy, soothes the sore throat and stops the cough, assuring restful nigbts. Cresolene relieves the bronchial complications of Scar- let Fever and Measles and is a valusable aid in the treat- ent of ptieria. Cresolen beut recxnmendation is its 30 year ofCOi- successful use. Send us postal for Descri-ptive Uookiet. Ak.ld4t For Sae by a!! Pruggits. toof at-o Try Cresolene nispi Throat Tablets for the ir- VS .l' ritated throat, cmoe of ipe elm bark, licorice, d.A\u0026 dru ggist or foai us,10cnsi tmsTH RICO M \"'th The. VÂPO-CRESOLENE CO.. fr2c",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER 85 Victrola XVI 1 MaloganY or Oak $250 ie Vîctrola make Holidays happy :he Winter even- )right and cheery trola in your home mneans pleas- veryone, every day in the year. c Victrolas in a great variety of styles and at prices e IlHis Master's Voice \" dealer in your town and :e music on the Victrola. Victor Records are 90c for",
         "86 CÂNADIÂN MAGAZINE ÂIJVERTISER F OTF the children against theý effeets cDf sun, wind and cold upon the skin and complexion, just as you may lortify yourself, by using for ail toilet and bath purposes FAI1RI SOA P C It is good soap -clean, white, j ý m'1Tour niome( ensive \"IiaveYou a Liffle'Faî-ry 9",
         "CANADIÂN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER 87 THE RTFOIID V iR-E INSURANCE COMPANY i the commng of Hartford Fire Ix Company begin,ý i year of its e . During al \"s it has flot nptly paid everj lual loss, but 1914 Trhe Hartford stands isur- today with large assets Sthe and ample financial re- ~xist- sources, the leader aniong these fire insurance companies. only But its proudest asset is ~in- its reputation for comn- has mercial honor and good Isfac- faith. It will seli you iders honest and safe insur- Ltons ance. Is flot this the tory. Company you want? 1-AK 1rVUKI",
         "88 CÂNÂDIAN MAGAZINE ADVEBTIBSER Nose to reduce ti Up, .' to.use this",
         "Ifil -He's Big Ail Over And Good Ail Through It for endle.s set- o \"off-days,\" no [s four years of been one long -dot accuracy. ; say that he does nrk for less pay lock alive. talion, over 3, 000 à qM T1hI r e Venl-inch 1, black,' d hands; keys-all ['s mnaster droi) of out--365 times-helIl guarantee to tell you the time o day with on-the-dot accuracy. He's nmade the same guarantee over 3, 000, 000 times and made good every time. He'11 mnake gond for you. More than $8,000,000 has passed over good dealers' counters for iBig -Ben ard his brothers-strong cvi- dence of miert and popularity. He'll getyVn up either of TWO WAYS-with one long, steady, five-minutie ring if yon need a good big call, or on te/w ir tai/ment pian, wvith short ringLs one-haîf- Minute apart for ten minutes,' so you'JI wake up gradlua/ô', and hc'lI stop short in the mliddle of a tap dujring cithier cail if you want to shut hiîn off. ]3ig Ben is a mighty pleasant looking fellow. His big, open, honest face and his, gentle tick-tick have earved him a place in thous- ands of parori. No \"complaniy\" is ton grand to sneer at Big Ben-4 lie wins friends everywhere. The next tine you go to towfl cali at your deaiées and ask to sec Big B3en. If your dealer hasn't him, send a money order for $3.00U to Westeiox, Lia Salle, Illinois, and he'll corne to you duty prepaid. The word, \"Madle in La Salle, Imois, by Jflestc/ox,' staniped across his back, is the best alarrn clock insorance that anyone can buy.- It [s Big Ben's \"mark\"- proof that you're buying the truc, thoroughbred of the dlock wvorld.",
         "lear bOund 4 ood digestion are many a man's EUH SReason\" a forms: ist be welI boiled. soluble powder. A"
      ],
      "lang" : [
         "eng"
      ],
      "note" : [
         "Monthly",
         "Index for v. 42 in v. 42, no. 1, CIHM no. 8_06251_249."
      ],
      "published" : [
         "Toronto : Ontario Pub. Co., [1914]"
      ],
      "type" : "document",
      "title" : [
         "The Canadian magazine"
      ]
   },
   "version" : "0.4"
}
{
   "doc" : {
      "lang" : [
         "eng"
      ],
      "published" : [
         "Toronto : Ontario Pub. Co., [1917]"
      ],
      "note" : [
         "Monthly",
         "Index for v. 48 in v. 48, no. 1, CIHM no. 8_06251_285."
      ],
